Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB757.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 139.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be presumed that:
(a) Tangible personal property shipped or brought to this state by the purchaser;[ or]
(b) Digital property delivered or transferred electronically into this state; or
(c) A service provided to a purchaser in this state;
was purchased from a retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in this state.
(2) (a) A marketplace provider that makes retail sales on its own behalf or facilitates retail sales of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services that are delivered, [or ]transferred electronically, or
provided to a purchaser in this state for one (1) or more marketplace retailers that in any sales
combination exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) [or reaches two hundred (200) or more
separate transactions in the immediately preceding calendar year or current calendar year ]shall be
subject to this section.
(b) The marketplace provider shall:
1. Register for a sales and use tax permit number to report and remit the tax due; and
2. Collect tax imposed under this chapter;
no later than the first day of the calendar month that is at the most sixty (60) days after the[either]
threshold in paragraph (a) of this subsection is reached.
(c) The marketplace provider may register for:
1. A single sales and use tax permit number to report and remit all the tax due on the marketplace
provider's direct sales and sales the marketplace provider facilitates for one (1) or more
marketplace retailers; or
2. a. One (1) sales and use tax permit number to report and remit the tax due on the
marketplace provider's direct sales; and
b. One (1) additional sales and use tax permit number to report and remit the tax due on all
sales the marketplace provider facilitates for one (1) or more marketplace retailers.
(d) 1. If the marketplace provider elects to report and remit the tax due on a single sales and use tax
permit number as provided in paragraph (c)1. of this subsection, the marketplace provider shall,
upon request of the department, provide a separate breakdown of receipts from the marketplace
provider's direct sales and the sales the marketplace provider facilitates for the preceding fiscal
year ending June 30.
2. The department may request the breakdown of receipts no more than once annually.
(e) The marketplace provider shall collect Kentucky tax on the entire sales price or purchase price paid by a
purchaser on each retail sale subject to tax under this chapter that is made on its own behalf or that is
facilitated by the marketplace provider, regardless of whether the seller would have been required to
collect the tax had the retail sale not been facilitated by the marketplace provider.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the marketplace provider of liability for collecting but
failing to remit the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(4) (a) The marketplace provider shall be subject to audit on all sales made on its own behalf and on all sales
facilitated by the marketplace provider.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The marketplace retailer shall be relieved of all liability for the collection and remittance of the sales or
use tax on sales facilitated by the marketplace provider.
(5) No class action may be brought against a marketplace provider on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any
way related to an overpayment of tax collected by the marketplace provider.
Section 2. KRS 131.183 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except for the addition to tax required when an underpayment of estimated tax occurs under KRS
141.044 and 141.305, all taxes payable to the Commonwealth not paid at the time prescribed by statute
shall accrue interest at the tax interest rate.
(b) 1. a. Except as provided by subparagraph 2 of this paragraph, the tax interest rate shall be equal
to the adjusted prime rate charged by banks rounded to the nearest full percent as adjusted
by subsection (2) of this section.
b. The commissioner of revenue shall adjust the tax interest rate not later than November 15
of each year if the adjusted prime rate charged by banks during September of that year,
rounded to the nearest full percent, is at least one (1) percentage point more or less than
the tax interest rate which is then in effect. The adjusted tax interest rate shall become
effective on January 1 of the immediately succeeding year.
2. For additional tax billed in accordance with KRS 136.180(2), the tax interest rate shall be equal
to the federal short-term rate applicable to each quarter of the period that begins on the date the
protest was filed by the taxpayer under KRS 131.110 and ends on the due date of the tax as
stated on the final tax bill. The federal short-term rate for each quarter shall be the federal short-
term rate determined by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 6621(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986 or equivalent section in case of amendment. The two percent (2%)
adjustment provided by subsection (2)(a) of this section shall not apply to the interest rate
determined under this subparagraph.
(2) (a) [1. All taxes payable to the Commonwealth that have not been paid at the time prescribed by statute
shall accrue interest at the tax interest rate as determined in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section until May 1, 2008.
2. Beginning on May 1, 2008, ]All taxes payable to the Commonwealth that have not been paid at
the time prescribed by statute shall accrue interest at the tax interest rate as determined in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section plus two percent (2%).
(b) 1. [Interest shall be allowed and paid upon any overpayment as defined in KRS 134.580 in respect
of any of the taxes provided for in Chapters 131, 132, 134, 136, 137, 138, 139, 140, 141, 142,
143, 143A, and 243 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and KRS 160.613 and 160.614 at the rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section until May 1, 2008.
2. Beginning on May 1, 2008, ]Interest shall be allowed and paid upon any overpayment as defined
in KRS 134.580 at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section minus two percent (2%).
2.[3.] [Effective for refunds issued after April 24, 2008, ]Except for the provisions of KRS 138.351,
141.044(2), and 141.235(3)[,] and subsection (3) of this section, interest authorized under this
subsection shall begin to accrue sixty (60) days after the latest of:
a. The due date of the return;
b. The date the return was filed;
c. The date the tax was paid;
d. The last day prescribed by law for filing the return; or
e. The date an amended return claiming a refund is filed.
(c) In no case shall interest be paid in an amount less than five dollars ($5).
(d) A[No] refund shall not be made of any estimated tax paid unless:
1. a. An application is made by the taxpayer or officer authorized to make the request on a
form prescribed by the department; and
b. It is determined that the estimated tax was paid to the department in error; or

CHAPTER 161 3
2. A return is filed as required by KRS Chapter 141.
(3) [Effective for refund claims filed on or after July 15, 1992, ]If any overpayment of the tax imposed under KRS
Chapter 141 results from a carryback of a [net operating loss or a ]net capital loss, the overpayment shall be
deemed to have been made on the date the claim for refund was filed. Interest authorized under subsection (2)
of this section shall begin to accrue ninety (90) days from the date the claim for refund was filed.
(4) [No ]Interest shall not be allowed or paid on any sales tax refund as provided by KRS 139.536.
(5) For purposes of this section, any addition to tax provided in KRS 141.044 and 141.305 shall be considered a
penalty.
Section 3. KRS 141.044 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, every corporation and limited liability pass-through
entity subject to taxation under KRS 141.040 and 141.0401 shall make estimated tax payments if the taxes
imposed by KRS 141.040 and 141.0401 for the taxable year can reasonably be expected to exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000).
(2) Estimated tax payments for the taxes imposed under KRS 141.040 and 141.0401 shall be made at the same
time and calculated in the same manner as estimated tax payments for federal income tax purposes under 26
U.S.C. sec. 6655, except:
(a) The estimated liabilities for the taxes imposed under KRS 141.040 and 141.0401 shall be used to make
the estimated payments;
(b) Any provisions in 26 U.S.C. sec. 6655 that apply for federal tax purposes but do not apply to the taxes
imposed under KRS 141.040 and 141.0401;
(c) The addition to tax identified by 26 U.S.C. sec. 6655(a) shall instead be considered a penalty under
KRS 131.180;
(d) The tax interest rate identified under KRS 131.183 shall be used to determine the underpayment rate
instead of the rate under 26 U.S.C. sec. 6621;
(e) Any waiver of penalties shall be performed as provided in KRS 131.175; and
(f) 1. A refund of taxes collected under this section shall include interest at the tax interest rate as
defined in KRS 131.010[(6)].
2. Interest shall not begin to accrue until ninety (90) days after the latest of:
a. The due date of the return;
b. The date the return was filed;
c. The date the tax was paid;
d. The last day prescribed by law for filing the return; or
e. The date an amended return claiming a refund is filed.
3. A[No] refund shall not be made of any estimated tax paid unless:
a. i. An application is made by the taxpayer or officer authorized to make the request
on a form prescribed by the department; and
ii. It is determined that the estimated tax was paid to the department in error; or
b. A return is filed as required by this chapter.
(3) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
implement this section.
Section 4. KRS 96.895 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Book value" means original cost unadjusted for depreciation as reflected in the TVA's books of
account;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) "Fund" means the regional development agency assistance fund established in subsection (4) of this
section;
(c) "Fund-eligible county" means one (1) of Adair, Allen, Ballard, Barren, Bell, Butler, Caldwell,
Calloway, Carlisle, Christian, Clinton, Cumberland, Edmonson, Fulton, Graves, Grayson, Harlan, Hart,
Henderson, Hickman, Livingston, Logan, Lyon, Marshall, McCracken, McCreary, Metcalfe, Monroe,
Muhlenberg, Ohio, Russell, Simpson, Todd, Trigg, Union, Warren, Wayne, Webster, or Whitley
Counties;
(d) "Regional development agency" or "agency" means a special purpose governmental entity as defined in
KRS 65A.010(9) that is designated by a fiscal court to receive a payment pursuant to this section;
(e) "TVA" means the Tennessee Valley Authority; and
(f) "TVA property" means land owned by the United States and in the custody of the TVA, together with
improvements that have a fixed situs on the land, including work in progress but excluding temporary
construction facilities, if these improvements either:
1. Were in existence when title to the land on which they are situated was acquired by the United
States; or
2. Are allocated by the TVA or determined by it to be allocable to power. However, manufacturing
machinery as interpreted by the Department of Revenue for franchise tax determination; ash
disposal systems; and coal handling facilities, including railroads, cranes and hoists, and crushing
and conveying equipment, shall be excluded.
(2) Book value shall be determined, for purposes of applying this section, as of the June 30 used by the TVA in
computing the annual payment to the Commonwealth that is subject to redistribution by the Commonwealth.
(3) Except for payments made directly by the TVA to counties, the total fiscal year payment received by the
Commonwealth of Kentucky from the TVA, as authorized by Section 13 of the Tennessee Valley Authority
Act, as amended, shall be prorated thirty percent (30%) to the general fund of the Commonwealth and seventy
percent (70%) among counties, cities, and school districts, as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this
section.
(4) (a) The regional development agency assistance fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Department for Local Government for the purpose of providing
funding to agencies that are designated to receive funding in a given fiscal year by the fiscal court of
each fund-eligible county through the Regional Development Agency Assistance Program established
in KRS 96.905.
(c) The fund shall only receive the moneys transferred from the general fund pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not
lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the fund shall
become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.
(5) (a) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, a portion of the total fiscal year payment received by
the Commonwealth that is allocated to the general fund shall be transferred from the general fund to the
regional development agency assistance fund established in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) This portion shall be equal to six million dollars ($6,000,000).
(c) Distribution of these moneys shall be made by dividing the amount in paragraph (b) of this subsection
equally among each fund-eligible county.
(6) The payment to each county, city, and school district shall be determined by the proportion that the book value
of TVA property in such taxing district, multiplied by the current tax rate, bears to the total of the book values
of TVA property in all such taxing districts in the Commonwealth, multiplied by their respective tax rates.
However, for purposes of this calculation, each public school district shall have its tax rate increased by thirty
cents ($0.30).
(7) (a) As soon as practicable after the amount of payment to be made to the Commonwealth is finally
determined by the TVA, the Department of Revenue shall determine the book value of TVA property in
each county, city, and school district and shall prorate the payments allocated to counties, cities, and

CHAPTER 161 5
school districts under subsection (3) of this section among the distributees as provided in subsection (6)
of this section.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall:
1. Certify the payment due each county, city, and school district, including the amount distributed
to the county under subsection (5) of this section, to the Finance and Administration Cabinet; and
2. Notify the Department for Local Government of that certification.
(c) Upon certification by the Department of Revenue, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make
the payment to such district.
(8) In each fiscal year, after the Department of Revenue has calculated the prorated payment amount that is due to
each county, city, and school district under subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the Department for Local
Government shall notify in writing the fiscal court of each fund-eligible county regarding the amount that the
county, city, and school district shall receive for the fiscal year, including the amount distributed to the county
under subsection (5) of this section.
(9) No amount shall be taken from the fund to pay administrative expenses by the Department for Local
Government.
(10) All agencies receiving funds under this section shall provide a written report annually, no later than October 1,
to the fiscal court that designated it for payment and to the Department for Local Government[Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue]. The report shall describe how the funds were expended and the
results of the use of funds in terms of economic development and job creation.
(11) No later than December 1 of each year, the Department for Local Government shall report to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue the total amount of funds distributed to each agency for the fiscal year, how each agency expended
the funds, and the results of the use of funds in terms of economic development and job creation.
Section 5. KRS 154.30-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Commonwealth shall offer three (3) tax increment financing participation programs. The first
program, the criteria and details of which are set forth in KRS 154.30-040, relates to a pledge of state
real property ad valorem taxes only. The second program, the criteria and details of which are set forth
in KRS 154.30-050, is the Signature Projects Program. The third program, the criteria and details of
which are set forth in KRS 154.30-060, relates to the pledge of state tax revenues to support mixed-use
development in blighted urban areas.
(b) 1. The programs under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall sunset on the effective date of this
section of this Act, and new applications shall not be submitted or considered for approval
after the effective date of this section of this Act.
2. Projects approved prior to the effective date of this section of this Act shall continue to be
governed in accordance with the tax incentive agreement's terms and conditions as set forth in
KRS 154.30-070.
3. Tax incentive agreements related to the programs under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
not be amended or have activation date extensions approved by the Commonwealth after the
effective date of this section of this Act.
(2) (a) A city or county that has established a development area pursuant to KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and
65.7053, or an agency designated as the entity managing a development area established pursuant to
KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053, may submit an application to the authority requesting that the
Commonwealth participate in a project, before the effective date of this section of this Act.
1. The application shall identify the specific program under which state participation is being
requested and shall include the following attachments, in addition to any requirements developed
by the authority pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection:
a. A copy of the ordinance adopted by the city or county establishing the development area;
b. A copy of the local participation agreement; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
c. Data and information supporting the determinations and findings required by KRS
65.7049.
2. The staff of the authority shall review the application to determine if the applicant has met all of
the statutory and regulatory requirements established by this subchapter and shall notify the
applicant in writing of its determination. This review shall be preliminary in nature and shall not
constitute approval of the request. All applications for participation by the Commonwealth shall
be reviewed by the authority for approval.
3. a. Applications meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting participation by
the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-040, along with any supporting materials,
shall be referred by the staff of the authority to the authority for consideration.
b. i. Applicants meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting
participation by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-050(3)(b) or 154.30-
060 shall be required to submit a report prepared by an independent consultant or
financial adviser as described in subsection (6) of this section for the application to
be complete. The staff of the authority shall notify the applicants of the report
requirements and shall provide information regarding the contents and
requirements for the report at the same time it notifies the applicant of the results of
its preliminary review.
ii. Upon receipt and review of the report, the staff of the authority shall refer the
application and supporting information to the authority for consideration.
(b) Additional standards and requirements for the application process shall be established by the authority
through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) (a) The authority may request any materials and make any inquiries concerning an application that the
authority deems necessary.
(b) The authority shall, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, establish commercially reasonable limitations on the financing costs that may be
recovered under the provisions of KRS 154.30-050.
(4) Upon review of an application and other information available, the authority may pledge all or a portion of the
state real property ad valorem tax incremental revenue of the Commonwealth or state tax revenues attributable
to the footprint of the project, as limited by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060, whichever is
applicable.
(a) If incremental revenues are pledged from less than one hundred percent (100%) of the footprint of the
project, a description of the included portion of the development area shall be provided.
(b) State tax revenues from the development area that have not been pledged to projects within the
development area may be used to support other economic development projects or tourism projects
approved under KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860, provided that state tax revenues shall not be
pledged more than once during the existence of the development area. Thus, state tax revenues pledged
to support increment bonds issued for the development area, or a project in the development area shall
not be pledged to support any other development area, project, program, development, or undertaking
during the life of the development area. If less than one hundred percent (100%) of incremental
revenues are pledged pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, the remaining incremental revenues
shall not be used to support other economic development projects or tourism projects approved under
KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860.
(5) The pledge of incremental state real property ad valorem tax revenues or state tax revenues of the
Commonwealth by the authority shall be implemented through the execution of a tax incentive agreement
between the Commonwealth and the agency, city, or county, as the case may be, in accordance with KRS
154.30-070.
(6) (a) The authority shall engage the services of a qualified independent outside consultant or financial
adviser to analyze the data related to the project and the development area and prepare the report
required by subsection (2) of this section. The report shall include the following:

CHAPTER 161 7
1. The estimated approved public infrastructure costs for the project and, if relevant, approved
signature project costs, financing costs, and costs associated with land preparation, demolition,
and clearance;
2. The feasibility of the project, taking into account the scope and location of the project;
3. The estimated amount of local tax revenues and state tax revenues, as applicable, that would be
generated by the project over the period, which may be up to twenty (20) years or thirty (30)
years, as applicable, from the activation date;
4. The estimated amount of local tax revenues and state tax revenues, as applicable, that would be
displaced within the Commonwealth, for the purpose of quantifying economic activity which is
being shifted over the same period as that set forth in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. The
projections for displaced activity shall include economic activity that is lost to the
Commonwealth as a result of the project, as well as economic activity that is diverted to the
project that formerly took place at existing establishments within the Commonwealth prior to the
commencement date of the project;
5. The estimated amount of local and state old revenues that would have been generated in the
footprint of the project in the absence of the project, computed over the same time period as set
forth in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph;
6. In the process of estimating the revenues and impacts prescribed in subparagraphs 3. and 4. of
this paragraph, the independent outside consultant shall not consider any of the following:
a. Revenues or economic impacts associated with any projects within the development area
where the new project will be located; and
b. Revenues or economic impacts associated with economic development projects and
approved Kentucky Tourism Development Act projects under KRS Chapter 148;
7. The relationship of the estimated incremental revenues to the financing needs, including any
increment bonds, of the project;
8. When estimating the fiscal impact of the project, the consultant shall evaluate the amount of
revenue estimated in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph and shall deduct the amounts estimated in
subparagraphs 4. and 5. of this paragraph. The resulting difference shall be compared to the
estimated incremental revenues to determine the presence or absence of a positive fiscal impact;
and
9. A determination that the project will not occur if not for the designation of the development area,
the granting of incremental revenues by the taxing district or districts, other than the
Commonwealth, and the granting of the state tax incremental revenues.
(b) 1. The independent consultant or financial advisor shall consult with the Office of State Budget
Director, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the development of the report.
2. The Office of State Budget Director and the staff of the authority, in collaboration with the
independent consultant or financial advisor, shall agree on a methodology to be used and
assumptions to be made by the independent consultant or financial consultant in preparing its
report.
3. On the basis of the independent consultant's report and the other materials provided, prior to any
approval of a project by the authority, the Office of State Budget Director and the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall certify to the authority whether there is a projected net positive
economic impact to the Commonwealth and the expected amount of state tax incremental
revenues from the project.
4. The city, county, or agency making the application shall pay all costs associated with the
independent consultant's or financial advisor's report.
Section 6. KRS 141.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) "Adjusted gross income," in the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means the amount calculated in
KRS 141.019;
(2) "Captive real estate investment trust" means a real estate investment trust as defined in Section 856 of the
Internal Revenue Code that meets the following requirements:
(a) 1. The shares or other ownership interests of the real estate investment trust are not regularly traded
on an established securities market; or
2. The real estate investment trust does not have enough shareholders or owners to be required to
register with the Securities and Exchange Commission;
(b) 1. The maximum amount of stock or other ownership interest that is owned or constructively
owned by a corporation equals or exceeds:
a. Twenty-five percent (25%), if the corporation does not occupy property owned,
constructively owned, or controlled by the real estate investment trust; or
b. Ten percent (10%), if the corporation occupies property owned, constructively owned, or
controlled by the real estate investment trust.
The total ownership interest of a corporation shall be determined by aggregating all interests
owned or constructively owned by a corporation; and
2. For the purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Corporation" means a corporation taxable under KRS 141.040, and includes an affiliated
group as defined in KRS 141.200, that is required to file a consolidated return pursuant to
KRS 141.200; and
b. "Owned or constructively owned" means owning shares or having an ownership interest
in the real estate investment trust, or owning an interest in an entity that owns shares or
has an ownership interest in the real estate investment trust. Constructive ownership shall
be determined by looking across multiple layers of a multilayer pass-through structure;
and
(c) The real estate investment trust is not owned by another real estate investment trust;
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department;
(4) "Corporation" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(5) "Critical infrastructure" means property and equipment owned or used by communications networks, electric
generation, transmission or distribution systems, gas distribution systems, or water or wastewater pipelines that
service multiple customers or citizens, including but not limited to real and personal property such as
buildings, offices, lines, poles, pipes, structures, or equipment;
(6) "Declared state disaster or emergency" means a disaster or emergency event for which:
(a) The Governor has declared a state of emergency pursuant to KRS 39A.100; or
(b) A presidential declaration of a federal major disaster or emergency has been issued;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(8) "Dependent" means those persons defined as dependents in the Internal Revenue Code;
(9) "Disaster or emergency-related work" means repairing, renovating, installing, building, or rendering services
that are essential to the restoration of critical infrastructure that has been damaged, impaired, or destroyed by a
declared state disaster or emergency;
(10) "Disaster response business" means any entity:
(a) That has no presence in the state and conducts no business in the state, except for disaster or
emergency-related work during a disaster response period;
(b) Whose services are requested by a registered business or by a state or local government for purposes of
performing disaster or emergency-related work in the state during a disaster response period; and
(c) That has no registrations, tax filings, or nexus in this state other than disaster or emergency-related
work during the calendar year immediately preceding the declared state disaster or emergency;

CHAPTER 161 9
(11) "Disaster response employee" means an employee who does not work or reside in the state, except for disaster
or emergency-related work during the disaster response period;
(12) "Disaster response period" means a period that begins ten (10) days prior to the first day of the Governor's
declaration under KRS 39A.100, or the President's declaration of a federal major disaster or emergency,
whichever occurs first, and that extends thirty (30) calendar days after the declared state disaster or
emergency;
(13) "Doing business in this state" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Being organized under the laws of this state;
(b) Having a commercial domicile in this state;
(c) Owning or leasing property in this state;
(d) Having one (1) or more individuals performing services in this state;
(e) Maintaining an interest in a pass-through entity doing business in this state;
(f) Deriving income from or attributable to sources within this state, including deriving income directly or
indirectly from a trust doing business in this state, or deriving income directly or indirectly from a
single-member limited liability company that is doing business in this state and is disregarded as an
entity separate from its single member for federal income tax purposes; or
(g) Directing activities at Kentucky customers for the purpose of selling them goods or services.
Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted in a manner that goes beyond the limitations imposed and
protections provided by the United States Constitution or Pub. L. No. 86-272;
(14) "Employee" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(15) "Employer" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(16) "Fiduciary" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(17) "Financial institution" means:
(a) A national bank organized as a body corporate and existing or in the process of organizing as a national
bank association pursuant to the provisions of the National Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. secs. 21 et seq., in
effect on December 31, 1997, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date;
(b) Any bank or trust company incorporated or organized under the laws of any state, except a banker's
bank organized under KRS 286.3-135;
(c) Any corporation organized under the provisions of 12 U.S.C. secs. 611 to 631, in effect on December
31, 1997, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date, or any corporation organized
after December 31, 1997, that meets the requirements of 12 U.S.C. secs. 611 to 631, in effect on
December 31, 1997; or
(d) Any agency or branch of a foreign depository as defined in 12 U.S.C. sec. 3101, in effect on December
31, 1997, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date, or any agency or branch of a
foreign depository established after December 31, 1997, that meets the requirements of 12 U.S.C. sec.
3101 in effect on December 31, 1997;
(18) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(24) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(19) "Gross income":
(a) In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, has the same meaning as in Section 61 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(b) In the case of corporations, means the amount calculated in KRS 141.039;
(20) "Individual" means a natural person;
(21) "Internal Revenue Code" means for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026[2025], the Internal
Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 2025[2024], exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that
date, other than amendments that extend provisions in effect on December 31, 2024, that would otherwise
terminate;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(22) "Limited liability pass-through entity" means any pass-through entity that affords any of its partners, members,
shareholders, or owners, through function of the laws of this state or laws recognized by this state, protection
from general liability for actions of the entity;
(23) "Modified gross income" means the greater of:
(a) Adjusted gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 62, including any amendments in effect on
December 31 of the taxable year, and adjusted as follows:
1. Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political subdivisions
thereof; and
2. Include lump-sum pension distributions taxed under the special transition rules of Pub. L. No.
104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2); or
(b) Adjusted gross income as defined in subsection (1) of this section and adjusted to include lump-sum
pension distributions taxed under the special transition rules of Pub. L. No. 104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2);
(24) "Net income":
(a) In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means the amount calculated in KRS 141.019; and
(b) In the case of corporations, means the amount calculated in KRS 141.039;
(25) "Nonresident" means any individual not a resident of this state;
(26) "Number of withholding exemptions claimed" means the number of withholding exemptions claimed in a
withholding exemption certificate in effect under KRS 141.325, except that if no such certificate is in effect,
the number of withholding exemptions claimed shall be considered to be zero;
(27) "Part-year resident" means any individual that has established or abandoned Kentucky residency during the
calendar year;
(28) "Pass-through entity" means any partnership, S corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, limited partnership, or similar entity recognized by the laws of this state that is not taxed for
federal purposes at the entity level, but instead passes to each partner, member, shareholder, or owner their
proportionate share of income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and any other similar attributes;
(29) "Payroll period" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(b) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(30) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(31) "Registered business" means a business entity that owns or otherwise possesses critical infrastructure and that
is registered to do business in the state prior to the declared state disaster or emergency;
(32) "Resident" means an individual domiciled within this state or an individual who is not domiciled in this state,
but maintains a place of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one hundred eighty-three
(183) days of the taxable year in this state;
(33) "S corporation" has the same meaning as in Section 1361(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(34) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any
territory or possession of the United States;
(35) "Taxable net income":
(a) In the case of corporations that are taxable in this state, means "net income" as defined in subsection
(24) of this section;
(b) In the case of corporations that are taxable in this state and taxable in another state, means "net income"
as defined in subsection (24) of this section and as allocated and apportioned under KRS 141.120;
(c) For homeowners' associations as defined in Section 528(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, means
"taxable income" as defined in Section 528(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (21) of this section, the Internal Revenue Code sections referred to in this
paragraph shall be those code sections in effect for the applicable tax year; and
(d) For a corporation that meets the requirements established under Section 856 of the Internal Revenue
Code to be a real estate investment trust, means "real estate investment trust taxable income" as defined

CHAPTER 161 11
in Section 857(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that a captive real estate investment trust
shall not be allowed any deduction for dividends paid;
(36) "Taxable year" means the calendar year or fiscal year ending during such calendar year, upon the basis of
which net income is computed, and in the case of a return made for a fractional part of a year under the
provisions of this chapter or under administrative regulations prescribed by the commissioner, "taxable year"
means the period for which the return is made; and
(37) "Wages" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and includes other income
subject to withholding as provided in Section 3401(f) and Section 3402(k), (o), (p), (q), and (s) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
Section 7. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of those taxpayers the
deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky Constitution and the Constitution
and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad Retirement Act of 1937 as
amended and which are subject to federal income tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS 6.505, 16.545, 21.360,
61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610, and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue
Service or the federal courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal income tax;
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit brought against a
manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by
a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before January 1, 2018, exclude
up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from
pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude up to thirty-one thousand
one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1035 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum distribution from pension or
profit-sharing plans qualifying for the income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of
the Internal Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement account as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code; and any disability pension
distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans" means
any trust or other entity created or organized under a written retirement plan and forming
part of a stock bonus, pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and includes plans qualified or
unqualified under Section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement
accounts as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net income from an S
corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock
tax imposed under KRS 136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net income from an S
corporation related to a qualified subchapter S subsidiary subject to the franchise tax
imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S corporation or its qualified
subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital
stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal income tax
purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for election training or for
working at election booths in state, county, and local primaries or regular or special elections;
(j) Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent domain;
(k) 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces who are on active duty
and who are killed in the line of duty, for the year during which the death occurred and the year
prior to the year during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall include all federal and
state death benefits payable to the estate or any beneficiaries;
(l) Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces while on active duty;
(m) 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167 or 168; and
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(n) Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(o) Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of property owned by a Kentucky
community property trust occurring for federal income tax purposes as a result of the death of the
predeceasing spouse;
(p) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and 278, related to the tax
treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated
with those loans for taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;[ and]
(q) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11, 2023, allow the same
treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15
U.S.C. sec. 9009c, related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those grants, and
tax attributes associated with those grants;[ and]
(r) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026:
1. Include the amount deducted for domestic research or experimental expenditures under 26
U.S.C. sec. 174A; and
2. Exclude the amount deducted for domestic research or experimental expenditures under 26
U.S.C. sec. 174, as that section existed on December 31, 2024;
(s) Include the amount deducted for any qualified film or television production, any qualified live
theatrical production, and any qualified sound recording production under 26 U.S.C. sec. 181; and
(t) Include interest deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 139L for amounts paid to a qualified lender on any
qualified real estate loan; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the deductions allowed
individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering losses allowed under Section
165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;

CHAPTER 161 13
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable under KRS 140.090(1)(h)
in calculating the value of the distributive shares of the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with
the income return a statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and any other deductions in lieu
thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or establishment which has been
determined by the courts or an agency established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing
the civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership and full and equal
enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to any person
because of race, color, religion, national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a
deduction for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or establishment or any
organization operated solely for charitable or educational purposes which restricts membership to
persons of the same religion or denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
established and maintained;[ and]
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS 141.081 instead of itemized
deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63 and as modified by this section;
(j) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec.
163(h)(3) as qualified residence interest shall be limited to the amount of interest paid or accrued
during the taxable year on the acquisition indebtedness of the principal residence of the taxpayer and
shall not be claimed for more than one (1) qualified residence;
(k) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 224 for qualified tips;
(l) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 225 for qualified overtime compensation; and
(m) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 163(h)(4) for qualified passenger vehicle loan interest.
Section 8. KRS 141.039 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of corporations:
(1) Gross income shall be calculated by adjusting federal gross income as defined in Section 61 of the Internal
Revenue Code as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky Constitution and the Constitution
and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude all dividend income;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude fifty percent (50%) of gross income derived from any disposal of coal covered by Section
631(c) of the Internal Revenue Code if the corporation does not claim any deduction for percentage
depletion, or for expenditures attributable to the making and administering of the contract under which
such disposition occurs or to the preservation of the economic interests retained under such contract;
(e) Include the amount calculated under KRS 141.205;
(f) Ignore the provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code in computing gross income;
(g) Include the amount of deprecation deduction calculated under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167 or 168;
(h) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and 278, related to the tax
treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated
with those loans for taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;[ and]
(i) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11, 2023, allow the same
treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15
U.S.C. sec. 9009c, related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those grants, and
tax attributes associated with those grants;[ and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
]
(j) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026:
1. Include the amount deducted for domestic research or experimental expenditures under 26
U.S.C. sec. 174A; and
2. Exclude the amount deducted for domestic research or experimental expenditures under 26
U.S.C. sec. 174, as that section existed on December 31, 2024;
(k) Include the amount deducted for any qualified film or television production, any qualified live
theatrical production, and any qualified sound recording production under 26 U.S.C. sec. 181;
(l) Include interest deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 139L for amounts paid to a qualified lender on any
qualified real estate loan; and
(m) For purposes of determining the limitation on business interest under 26 U.S.C. sec. 163(j), the
provisions of that section in effect on December 31, 2024, exclusive of any amendments made
subsequent to that date, shall be used; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from gross income:
(a) The deduction for depreciation allowed by KRS 141.0101;
(b) Any amount paid for vouchers or similar instruments that provide health insurance coverage to
employees or their families;
(c) All the deductions from gross income allowed corporations by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code,
as modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
1. Any deduction for a state tax which is computed, in whole or in part, by reference to gross or net
income and which is paid or accrued to any state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, or to any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof;
2. The deductions contained in Sections 243, 245, and 247 of the Internal Revenue Code;
3. The provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be ignored in computing net
income;
4. Any deduction directly or indirectly allocable to income which is either exempt from taxation or
otherwise not taxed under the provisions of this chapter, except for deductions allowed under
Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and 278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans
and deductions attributable to those loans for taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020,
but before January 1, 2022; and deductions allowed under Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15
U.S.C. sec. 9009c, related to the tax treatment of restaurant revitalization grants and deductions
attributable to those grants for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before
March 11, 2023. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the same item to be
deducted more than once;
5. Any deduction for amounts paid to any club, organization, or establishment which has been
determined by the courts or an agency established by the General Assembly and charged with
enforcing the civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or
accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, or sex, except
nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction for amounts paid to any religious or
denominational club, group, or establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable
or educational purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is established and
maintained;
6. Any deduction prohibited by KRS 141.205; and
7. Any dividends-paid deduction of any captive real estate investment trust; and
(d) 1. A deferred tax deduction in an amount computed in accordance with this paragraph.
2. For purposes of this paragraph:

CHAPTER 161 15
a. "Net deferred tax asset" means that deferred tax assets exceed the deferred tax liabilities
of the combined group, as computed in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America; and
b. "Net deferred tax liability" means deferred tax liabilities that exceed the deferred tax
assets of a combined group as defined in KRS 141.202, as computed in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
3. Only publicly traded companies, including affiliated corporations participating in the filing of a
publicly traded company's financial statements prepared in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America, as of January 1, 2019, shall be
eligible for this deduction.
4. If the provisions of KRS 141.202 result in an aggregate increase to the member's net deferred tax
liability, an aggregate decrease to the member's net deferred tax asset, or an aggregate change
from a net deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax liability, the combined group shall be entitled
to a deduction, as determined in this paragraph.
5. For ten (10) years beginning with the combined group's first taxable year beginning on or after
January 1, 2028[2026], a combined group shall be entitled to a deduction from the combined
group's entire net income equal to one-tenth (1/10) of the amount necessary to offset the increase
in the net deferred tax liability, decrease in the net deferred tax asset, or aggregate change from a
net deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax liability. The increase in the net deferred tax liability,
decrease in the net deferred tax asset, or the aggregate change from a net deferred tax asset to a
net deferred tax liability shall be computed based on the change that would result from the
imposition of the combined reporting requirement under KRS 141.202, but for the deduction
provided under this paragraph as of June 27, 2019.
6. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph shall be converted to
the annual deferred tax deduction amount, as follows:
a. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph shall be divided
by the tax rate determined under KRS 141.040;
b. The resulting amount shall be further divided by the apportionment factor determined by
KRS 141.120 or 141.121 that was used by the combined group in the calculation of the
deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities as described in subparagraph 5. of this
paragraph; and
c. The resulting amount represents the total net deferred tax deduction available over the ten
(10) year period as described in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph.
7. The deduction calculated under this paragraph shall not be adjusted as a result of any events
happening subsequent to the calculation, including but not limited to any disposition or
abandonment of assets. The deduction shall be calculated without regard to the federal tax effect
and shall not alter the tax basis of any asset. If the deduction under this section is greater than the
combined group's entire Kentucky net income, any excess deduction shall be carried forward and
applied as a deduction to the combined group's entire net income in future taxable years until
fully utilized.
8. Any combined group intending to claim a deduction under this paragraph shall file a
statement with the department on or before July 1, 2019. The statement shall specify the total
amount of the deduction which the combined group claims on the form, including calculations
and other information supporting the total amounts of the deduction as required by the
department. No deduction shall be allowed under this paragraph for any taxable year, except
to the extent claimed on the timely filed statement in accordance with this paragraph.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 138 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts" means the total sum of entry fees collected by a fantasy
contest service provider from all fantasy contest participants entering a fantasy contest, less winnings
paid to fantasy contest participants in the contest;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) "Athlete":
1. Means a professional or amateur competitor in a real-world lawful sporting event or an
organized video game competition that is:
a. Regulated by a sports governing body; and
b. Held between players who play individually or as a team; and
2. Includes equine competitors;
(c) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(d) "Fantasy contest":
1. Means any online fantasy or simulated game or contest that meets the following conditions:
a. There are no fewer than two (2) fantasy contest participants;
i. All fantasy contest participants are natural persons; and
ii. A fantasy contest service provider shall not be construed to be a participant;
b. i. The values of all prizes offered to winning fantasy contest participants are
established and made known to fantasy contest participants in advance of the
contest;
ii. Multiple winning participants may share a prize; and
iii. Prizes may consist of fixed amounts, tiered payouts, or other conditional bonus
payouts, provided that all prize structures are disclosed in advance by the fantasy
contest service provider;
c. All winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge and skill of the fantasy contest
participant and are determined predominantly by the accumulated statistical
performance or finishing position of multiple athletes across one (1) or more real-world
sporting events;
d. Fantasy contest participants assemble a fictional entry or roster of actual athletes and
exercise management or selection control over the roster;
e. Fantasy contest participants compete for prizes awarded by a fantasy contest service
provider based on terms and conditions published by the fantasy contest service
provider and made known to the fantasy contest participant in advance of the contest;
f. Winning outcomes are determined by clearly established scoring criteria based on one
(1) or more statistical results of the performance of an individual athlete, including but
not limited to a fantasy score;
g. A winning outcome is not based:
i. On the score, point spread, or outcome of a single real-world team or
combination of teams; or
ii. Solely on any single performance of an individual athlete or participant in any
single actual event; and
h. The game or contest does not violate any provision of federal law;
2. Includes contests in which fantasy contest participants compete against each other; and
3. Does not include any fantasy contest:
a. Without a fantasy contest entry fee; or
b. Betting against the fantasy contest service provider;
(e) "Fantasy contest entry fee" means the cash or cash equivalent that is required to be paid by a
fantasy contest participant in advance to a fantasy contest service provider in order to participate in a
fantasy contest;
(f) "Fantasy contest participant" means a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older who is:

CHAPTER 161 17
1. Kentucky resident who participates in a fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest service
provider; and
2. Not a Kentucky resident who participates in a fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest
service provider while in Kentucky; and
(g) "Fantasy contest service provider":
1. Means a person or entity that offers fantasy contests to the general public; and
2. Does not include an internet service provider or a provider of mobile data services merely as a
result of that provider's transporting of general traffic that may include a fantasy contest.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the Commonwealth shall impose and collect a tax at a rate of twelve percent
(12%) of the fantasy contest service provider's adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts. The accrual method
of accounting shall be used for purposes of calculating the amount of tax owed by the licensee.
(3) The tax imposed by subsection (2) of this section is due and payable monthly and shall be remitted to the
department on or before the twentieth day of the next succeeding calendar month.
(4) The fantasy contest service provider's payment shall be accompanied by a return prescribed by the
department indicating the amount of tax due for the previous calendar month as well as any other
information the department shall require through an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) Any fantasy contest service provider who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the
uniform civil penalties imposed under KRS 131.180.
(6) In every case, any tax not paid on or before the due date shall bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined
in KRS 131.010 from the due date until the date of payment.
(7) It is the purpose and intent of the General Assembly to levy taxes on persons engaged in the operations of
fantasy contests. It is not the intent of the General Assembly to legalize these activities.
Section 10. KRS 2.015 is amended to read as follows:
Persons of the age of eighteen (18) years are of the age of majority for all purposes in this Commonwealth except for:
(1) The purchase of alcoholic beverages;
(2) Participating in fantasy sports contests; and
(3) For purposes of care and treatment of children with disabilities[,];
for which twenty-one (21) years is the age of majority, all other statutes to the contrary notwithstanding.
Section 11. KRS 139.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise provides:
(1) (a) "Admissions" means the fees paid for:
1. The right of entrance to a display, program, sporting event, music concert, performance, play,
show, movie, exhibit, fair, or other entertainment or amusement event or venue; and
2. The privilege of using facilities or participating in an event or activity, including but not limited
to:
a. Bowling centers;
b. Skating rinks;
c. Health spas;
d. Swimming pools;
e. Tennis courts;
f. Weight training facilities;
g. Fitness and recreational sports centers; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
h. Golf courses, both public and private;
regardless of whether the fee paid is per use or in any other form, including but not limited to an
initiation fee, monthly fee, membership fee, or combination thereof.
(b) "Admissions" does not include:
1. Any fee paid to enter or participate in a fishing tournament; or
2. Any fee paid for the use of a boat ramp for the purpose of allowing boats to be launched into or
hauled out from the water;
(2) "Advertising and promotional direct mail" means direct mail the primary purpose of which is to attract public
attention to a product, person, business, or organization, or to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial
support for a product, person, business, or organization. As used in this definition, "product" means tangible
personal property, an item transferred electronically, or a service;
(3) "Business" includes any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by that person with the
object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect;
(4) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(5) (a) "Cosmetic surgery services" means modifications to all areas of the head, neck, and body to enhance
appearance through surgical and medical techniques.
(b) "Cosmetic surgery services" does not include surgery services that are medically necessary to
reconstruct or correct dysfunctional areas of the face and body due to birth disorders, trauma, burns, or
disease;
(6) "Data brokering services" means the act of collecting, aggregating, and analyzing personal data for sale to
a third party while possession of the personal data is maintained by the person providing the data brokering
services or by the third party, wherever located, regardless of whether the charge for the services provided is
on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(8)[(7)] (a) "Digital audio-visual works" means a series of related images which, when shown in succession,
impart an impression of motion, with accompanying sounds, if any.
(b) "Digital audio-visual works" includes movies, motion pictures, musical videos, news and entertainment
programs, and live events.
(c) "Digital audio-visual works" does[shall] not include video greeting cards, video games, and electronic
games;
(9)[(8)] (a) "Digital audio works" means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or
other sounds.
(b) "Digital audio works" includes ringtones, recorded or live songs, music, readings of books or other
written materials, speeches, or other sound recordings.
(c) "Digital audio works" does[shall] not include audio greeting cards sent by electronic mail;
(10)[(9)] (a) "Digital books" means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as
books, including any literary work expressed in words, numbers, or other verbal or numerical symbols
or indicia if the literary work is generally recognized in the ordinary or usual sense as a book.
(b) "Digital books" does[shall] not include digital audio-visual works, digital audio works, periodicals,
magazines, newspapers, or other news or information products, chat rooms, or weblogs;
(11)[(10)] (a) "Digital code" means a code which provides a purchaser with a right to obtain one (1) or more
types of digital property. A "digital code" may be obtained by any means, including electronic mail
messaging or by tangible means, regardless of the code's designation as a song code, video code, or
book code.
(b) "Digital code" does[shall] not include a code that represents:
1. A stored monetary value that is deducted from a total as it is used by the purchaser; or

CHAPTER 161 19
2. A redeemable card, gift card, or gift certificate that entitles the holder to select specific types of
digital property;
(12)[(11)] (a) "Digital property" means any of the following which is transferred electronically:
1. Digital audio works;
2. Digital books;
3. Finished artwork;
4. Digital photographs;
5. Periodicals;
6. Newspapers;
7. Magazines;
8. Video greeting cards;
9. Audio greeting cards;
10. Video games;
11. Electronic games; or
12. Any digital code related to this property.
(b) "Digital property" does[shall] not include digital audio-visual works or satellite radio programming;
(13)[(12)] (a) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other
delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipient.
(b) "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the
direct mail retailer for inclusion in the package containing the printed material.
(c) "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;
(14)[(13)] "Directly used in the manufacturing or industrial processing process" means the process that
commences with the movement of raw materials from storage into a continuous, unbroken, integrated process
and ends when the finished product is packaged and ready for sale;
(15)[(14)] (a) "Executive employee recruitment services" means services provided by a person to locate
potential candidates to fill open senior-level management positions.
(b) "Executive employee recruitment services" includes but is not limited to making a detailed list of client
requirements, researching and identifying potential candidates, performing prescreening interviews, and
providing contract and salary negotiations;
(16)[(15)] (a) "Extended warranty services" means services provided through a service contract agreement
between the contract provider and the purchaser where the purchaser agrees to pay compensation for the
contract and the provider agrees to repair, replace, support, or maintain tangible personal property,
digital property, real property, or prewritten computer software access services according to the terms
of the contract.
(b) "Extended warranty services" does not include the sale of a service contract agreement for tangible
personal property to be used by a small telephone utility as defined in KRS 278.516 or a Tier III CMRS
provider as defined in KRS 65.7621 to deliver communications services as defined in KRS 136.602 or
broadband;
(17)[(16)] (a) "Finished artwork" means final art that is used for actual reproduction by photomechanical or
other processes or for display purposes.
(b) "Finished artwork" includes:
1. Assemblies;
2. Charts;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Designs;
4. Drawings;
5. Graphs;
6. Illustrative materials;
7. Lettering;
8. Mechanicals;
9. Paintings; and
10. Paste-ups;
(18)[(17)] (a) "Gross receipts" and "sales price" mean the total amount or consideration, including cash, credit,
property, and services, for which tangible personal property, digital property, or services are sold,
leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction for
any of the following:
1. The retailer's cost of the tangible personal property, digital property, or services sold;
2. The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to
the retailer, all taxes imposed on the retailer, or any other expense of the retailer;
3. Charges by the retailer for any services necessary to complete the sale;
4. Delivery charges, which are defined as charges by the retailer for the preparation and delivery to
a location designated by the purchaser including transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
5. Any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by the retailer, other than credit for
tangible personal property or digital property traded when the tangible personal property or
digital property traded is of like kind and character to the property purchased and the property
traded is held by the retailer for resale; and
6. The amount charged for labor or services rendered in installing or applying the tangible personal
property, digital property, or service sold.
(b) "Gross receipts" and "sales price"[ shall] include consideration received by the retailer from a third
party if:
1. The retailer actually receives consideration from a third party and the consideration is directly
related to a price reduction or discount on the sale to the purchaser;
2. The retailer has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;
3. The amount of consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the retailer at
the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and
4. One (1) of the following criteria is met:
a. The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the retailer to
claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is
authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third
party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is
presented;
b. The price reduction or discount is identified as a third-party price reduction or discount on
the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation
presented by the purchaser; or
c. The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the retailer as a member of a group or
organization entitled to a price reduction or discount. A "preferred customer" card that is
available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group.
(c) "Gross receipts" and "sales price" do[shall] not include:
1. Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party and that are
allowed by a retailer and taken by a purchaser on a sale;

CHAPTER 161 21
2. Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal
property, digital property, or services, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of
sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
3. Any taxes legally imposed directly on the purchaser that are separately stated on the invoice, bill
of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; or
4. Local alcohol regulatory license fees authorized under KRS 243.075 that are separately stated on
the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser.
(d) As used in this subsection, "third party" means a person other than the purchaser;
(19)[(18)] "In this state" or "in the state" means within the exterior limits of the Commonwealth and includes all
territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America;
(20)[(19)] "Industrial processing" includes:
(a) Refining;
(b) Extraction of minerals, ores, coal, clay, stone, petroleum, or natural gas;
(c) Mining, quarrying, fabricating, and industrial assembling;
(d) The processing and packaging of raw materials, in-process materials, and finished products; and
(e) The processing and packaging of farm and dairy products for sale;
(21)[(20)] (a) "Lease or rental" means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property for a
fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease or rental includes[shall include] future options to:
1. Purchase the property; or
2. Extend the terms of the agreement and agreements covering trailers where the amount of
consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount realized upon sale or
disposition of the property as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 7701(h)(1).
(b) "Lease or rental" does[shall] not include:
1. A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment
plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments;
2. A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of
title upon completion of the required payments and payment of an option price that does not
exceed the greater of one hundred dollars ($100) or one percent (1%) of the total required
payments; or
3. Providing tangible personal property and an operator for the tangible personal property for a
fixed or indeterminate period of time. To qualify for this exclusion, the operator must be
necessary for the equipment to perform as designed, and the operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or setup the tangible personal property.
(c) This definition shall apply regardless of the classification of a transaction under generally accepted
accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, or other provisions of federal, state, or local law;
(22)[(21)] (a) "Lobbying services" means the act of promoting or securing passage of legislation or an attempt
to influence or sway a public official or other public servant toward a desired action, including but not
limited to the support of or opposition to a project or the passage, amendment, defeat, approval, or veto
of any legislation, regulation, rule, or ordinance.[;]
(b) "Lobbying services" includes but is not limited to the performance of activities described as executive
agency lobbying activities as defined in KRS 11A.201, activities described under the definition of lobby
in KRS 6.611, and any similar activities performed at the local, state, or federal levels;
(23)[(22)] (a) "Machinery for new and expanded industry" means machinery:
1. Directly used in the manufacturing or industrial processing process of:
a. Tangible personal property at a plant facility;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
b. Distilled spirits or wine at a plant facility or on the premises of a distiller, rectifier,
winery, or small farm winery licensed under KRS 243.030 that includes a retail
establishment on the premises; or
c. Malt beverages at a plant facility or on the premises of a brewer or microbrewery licensed
under KRS 243.040 that includes a retail establishment;
2. Which is incorporated for the first time into:
a. A plant facility established in this state; or
b. Licensed premises located in this state; and
3. Which does not replace machinery in the plant facility or licensed premises unless that
machinery purchased to replace existing machinery:
a. Increases the consumption of recycled materials at the plant facility by not less than ten
percent (10%);
b. Performs different functions;
c. Is used to manufacture a different product; or
d. Has a greater productive capacity, as measured in units of production, than the machinery
being replaced.
(b) "Machinery for new and expanded industry" does not include repair, replacement, or spare parts of any
kind, regardless of whether the purchase of repair, replacement, or spare parts is required by the
manufacturer or seller as a condition of sale or as a condition of warranty;
(24)[(23)] "Manufacturing" means any process through which material having little or no commercial value for its
intended use before processing has appreciable commercial value for its intended use after processing by the
machinery;
(25)[(24)] "Marketplace" means any physical or electronic means through which one (1) or more retailers may
advertise and sell tangible personal property, digital property, or services, or lease tangible personal property
or digital property, such as a catalog, internet website, or television or radio broadcast, regardless of whether
the tangible personal property, digital property, or retailer is physically present in this state;
(26)[(25)] (a) "Marketplace provider" means a person, including any affiliate of the person, that facilitates a
retail sale by satisfying subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph as follows:
1. The person directly or indirectly:
a. Lists, makes available, or advertises tangible personal property, digital property, or
services for sale by a marketplace retailer in a marketplace owned, operated, or controlled
by the person;
b. Facilitates the sale of a marketplace retailer's product through a marketplace by
transmitting or otherwise communicating an offer or acceptance of a retail sale of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services between a marketplace retailer and a
purchaser in a forum including a shop, store, booth, catalog, internet site, or similar
forum;
c. Owns, rents, licenses, makes available, or operates any electronic or physical
infrastructure or any property, process, method, copyright, trademark, or patent that
connects marketplace retailers to purchasers for the purpose of making retail sales of
tangible personal property, digital property, or services;
d. Provides a marketplace for making retail sales of tangible personal property, digital
property, or services, or otherwise facilitates retail sales of tangible personal property,
digital property, or services, regardless of ownership or control of the tangible personal
property, digital property, or services, that are the subject of the retail sale;
e. Provides software development or research and development activities related to any
activity described in this subparagraph, if the software development or research and
development activities are directly related to the physical or electronic marketplace
provided by a marketplace provider;

CHAPTER 161 23
f. Provides or offers fulfillment or storage services for a marketplace retailer;
g. Sets prices for a marketplace retailer's sale of tangible personal property, digital property,
or services;
h. Provides or offers customer service to a marketplace retailer or a marketplace retailer's
customers, or accepts or assists with taking orders, returns, or exchanges of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services sold by a marketplace retailer; or
i. Brands or otherwise identifies sales as those of the marketplace provider; and
2. The person directly or indirectly:
a. Collects the sales price or purchase price of a retail sale of tangible personal property,
digital property, or services;
b. Provides payment processing services for a retail sale of tangible personal property,
digital property, or services;
c. Through terms and conditions, agreements, or arrangements with a third party, collects
payment in connection with a retail sale of tangible personal property, digital property, or
services from a purchaser and transmits that payment to the marketplace retailer,
regardless of whether the person collecting and transmitting the payment receives
compensation or other consideration in exchange for the service; or
d. Provides a virtual currency that purchasers are allowed or required to use to purchase
tangible personal property, digital property, or services.
(b) "Marketplace provider" includes but is not limited to a person that satisfies the requirements of this
subsection through the ownership, operation, or control of a digital distribution service, digital
distribution platform, online portal, or application store;
(27)[(26)] "Marketplace retailer" means a seller that makes retail sales through any marketplace owned, operated,
or controlled by a marketplace provider;
(28)[(27)] (a) "Occasional sale" includes:
1. A sale of tangible personal property or digital property not held or used by a seller in the course
of an activity for which he or she is required to hold a seller's permit, provided such sale is not
one (1) of a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute an activity
requiring the holding of a seller's permit. In the case of the sale of the entire, or a substantial
portion of the nonretail assets of the seller, the number of previous sales of similar assets shall be
disregarded in determining whether or not the current sale or sales shall qualify as an occasional
sale; or
2. Any transfer of all or substantially all the tangible personal property or digital property held or
used by a person in the course of such an activity when after such transfer the real or ultimate
ownership of such property is substantially similar to that which existed before such transfer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or other persons holding an
interest in a corporation or other entity are regarded as having the "real or ultimate ownership" of the
tangible personal property or digital property of such corporation or other entity;
(29)[(28)] (a) "Other direct mail" means any direct mail that is not advertising and promotional direct mail,
regardless of whether advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same mailing.
(b) "Other direct mail" includes but is not limited to:
1. Transactional direct mail that contains personal information specific to the addressee, including
but not limited to invoices, bills, statements of account, and payroll advices;
2. Any legally required mailings, including but not limited to privacy notices, tax reports, and
stockholder reports; and
3. Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or former shareholders, customers,
employees, or agents, including but not limited to newsletters and informational pieces.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) "Other direct mail" does not include the development of billing information or the provision of any data
processing service that is more than incidental to the production of printed material;
(30)[(29)] "Person" includes any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal
organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, cooperative, assignee,
governmental unit or agency, or any other group or combination acting as a unit;
(31)[(30)] "Permanent," as the term applies to digital property, means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified
length of time;
(32)[(31)] (a) "Photography and photofinishing services" means:
1. The taking, developing, or printing of an original photograph; or
2. Image editing, including shadow removal, tone adjustments, vertical and horizontal alignment
and cropping, composite image creation, formatting, watermarking printing, and delivery of an
original photograph in the form of tangible personal property, digital property, or other media.
(b) "Photography and photofinishing services" does not include photography services necessary for medical
or dental health;
(33)[(32)] "Plant facility" means a single location that is exclusively dedicated to manufacturing or industrial
processing activities. A location shall be deemed to be exclusively dedicated to manufacturing or industrial
processing activities even if retail sales are made there, provided that the retail sales are incidental to the
manufacturing or industrial processing activities occurring at the location. The term "plant facility" does[shall]
not include any restaurant, grocery store, shopping center, or other retail establishment;
(34)[(33)] (a) "Prewritten computer software" means:
1. Computer software, including prewritten upgrades, that are not designed and developed by the
author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser;
2. Software designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific
purchaser when it is sold to a person other than the original purchaser; or
3. Any portion of prewritten computer software that is modified or enhanced in any manner, where
the modification or enhancement is designed and developed to the specifications of a specific
purchaser, unless there is a reasonable, separately stated charge on an invoice or other statement
of the price to the purchaser for the modification or enhancement.
(b) When a person modifies or enhances computer software of which the person is not the author or creator,
the person shall be deemed to be the author or creator only of the modifications or enhancements the
person actually made.
(c) The combining of two (2) or more prewritten computer software programs or portions thereof does not
cause the combination to be other than prewritten computer software;
(35)[(34)] "Prewritten computer software access services" means the right of access to prewritten computer
software where the object of the transaction is to use the prewritten computer software while possession of the
prewritten computer software is maintained by the seller or a third party, wherever located, regardless of
whether the charge for the access or use is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis;
(36)[(35)] (a) "Purchase" means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, barter, lease, or rental,
conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of:
1. Tangible personal property;
2. An extended warranty service;
3. Digital property transferred electronically; or
4. Services included in KRS 139.200;
for a consideration.
(b) "Purchase" includes:
1. When performed outside this state or when the customer gives a resale certificate, the producing,
fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for a consideration

CHAPTER 161 25
for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the producing,
fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting;
2. A transaction whereby the possession of tangible personal property or digital property is
transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price; and
3. A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible personal property or digital
property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or
of any publication;
(37)[(36)] "Recycled materials" means materials which have been recovered or diverted from the solid waste
stream and reused or returned to use in the form of raw materials or products;
(38)[(37)] "Recycling purposes" means those activities undertaken in which materials that would otherwise
become solid waste are collected, separated, or processed in order to be reused or returned to use in the form of
raw materials or products;
(39)[(38)] "Remote retailer" means a retailer with no physical presence in this state;
(40)[(39)] (a) "Repair, replacement, or spare parts" means any tangible personal property used to maintain,
restore, mend, or repair machinery or equipment.
(b) "Repair, replacement, or spare parts" does not include machine oils, grease, or industrial tools;
(41)[(40)] (a) "Retailer" means:
1. Every person engaged in the business of making retail sales of tangible personal property, digital
property, or furnishing any services in a retail sale included in KRS 139.200;
2. Every person engaged in the business of making sales at auction of tangible personal property or
digital property owned by the person or others for storage, use or other consumption, except as
provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
3. Every person making more than two (2) retail sales of tangible personal property, digital
property, or services included in KRS 139.200 during any twelve (12) month period, including
sales made in the capacity of assignee for the benefit of creditors, or receiver or trustee in
bankruptcy;
4. Any person conducting a race meeting under the provision of KRS Chapter 230, with respect to
horses which are claimed during the meeting.
(b) When the department determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this chapter to
regard any salesmen, representatives, peddlers, or canvassers as the agents of the dealers, distributors,
supervisors or employers under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the tangible personal
property, digital property, or services sold by them, irrespective of whether they are making sales on
their own behalf or on behalf of the dealers, distributors, supervisors or employers, the department may
so regard them and may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors or employers as retailers for
purposes of this chapter.
(c) 1. Any person making sales at a charitable auction for a qualifying entity shall not be a retailer for
purposes of the sales made at the charitable auction if:
a. The qualifying entity, not the person making sales at the auction, is sponsoring the
auction;
b. The purchaser of tangible personal property at the auction directly pays the qualifying
entity sponsoring the auction for the property and not the person making the sales at the
auction; and
c. The qualifying entity, not the person making sales at the auction, is responsible for the
collection, control, and disbursement of the auction proceeds.
2. If the conditions set forth in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph are met, the qualifying entity
sponsoring the auction shall be the retailer for purposes of the sales made at the charitable
auction.
3. For purposes of this paragraph, "qualifying entity" means a resident:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Church;
b. School;
c. Civic club; or
d. Any other nonprofit charitable, religious, or educational organization;
(42)[(41)] "Retail sale" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than resale, sublease, or subrent;
(43)[(42)] (a) "Ringtones" means digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a device and that may be used
to alert the customer with respect to a communication.
(b) "Ringtones" does[shall] not include ringback tones or other digital files that are not stored on the
purchaser's communications device;
(44)[(43)] (a) "Sale" means:
1. The furnishing of any services included in KRS 139.200; or
2. Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, barter, lease, or rental, conditional or otherwise, in
any manner or by any means whatsoever, of:
a. Tangible personal property; or
b. Digital property transferred electronically;
for a consideration.
(b) "Sale" includes but is not limited to:
1. The producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property or
digital property for a consideration for purchasers who furnish, either directly or indirectly, the
materials used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting;
2. A transaction whereby the possession of tangible personal property or digital property is
transferred, but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price; and
3. A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible personal property or digital
property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the purchaser.
(c) This definition shall apply regardless of the classification of a transaction under generally accepted
accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, or other provisions of federal, state, or local law;
(45)[(44)] "Seller" includes every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property, digital
property, or services of a kind, the gross receipts from the retail sale of which are required to be included in the
measure of the sales tax, and every person engaged in making sales for resale;
(46)[(45)] (a) "Storage" includes any keeping or retention in this state for any purpose except sale in the
regular course of business or subsequent use solely outside this state of tangible personal property,
digital property, or prewritten computer software access services purchased from a retailer.
(b) "Storage" does not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over tangible
personal property for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside the state for use thereafter
solely outside the state, or for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured into, attached
to, or incorporated into, other tangible personal property to be transported outside the state and
thereafter used solely outside the state;
(47)[(46)] "Tangible personal property" means personal property which may be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or
touched, or which is in any other manner perceptible to the senses and includes natural, artificial, and mixed
gas, electricity, water, steam, and prewritten computer software;
(48)[(47)] "Taxpayer" means any person liable for tax under this chapter;
(49)[(48)] "Telemarketing services" means services provided via telephone, facsimile, electronic mail, text
messages, or other modes of communications to another person, which are unsolicited by that person, for the
purposes of:
(a) 1. Promoting products or services;
2. Taking orders; or

CHAPTER 161 27
3. Providing information or assistance regarding the products or services; or
(b) Soliciting contributions;
(50)[(49)] "Transferred electronically" means accessed or obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible
storage media; and
(51)[(50)] (a) "Use" includes the exercise of:
1. Any right or power over tangible personal property or digital property incident to the ownership
of that property, or by any transaction in which possession is given, or by any transaction
involving digital property or tangible personal property where the right of access is granted; or
2. Any right or power to benefit from any services subject to tax under KRS 139.200(2)(p) to
(ay)[(ax)].
(b) "Use" does not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over:
1. Tangible personal property or digital property for the purpose of:
a. Selling tangible personal property or digital property in the regular course of business; or
b. Subsequently transporting tangible personal property outside the state for use thereafter
solely outside the state, or for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured
into, attached to, or incorporated into, other tangible personal property to be transported
outside the state and thereafter used solely outside the state; or
2. Prewritten computer software access services and data brokering services purchased for use
outside the state and transferred electronically outside the state for use thereafter solely outside
the state.
Section 12. KRS 139.200 is amended to read as follows:
A tax is hereby imposed upon all retailers at the rate of six percent (6%) of the gross receipts derived from:
(1) Retail sales of:
(a) Tangible personal property, regardless of the method of delivery, made within this Commonwealth; and
(b) Digital property regardless of whether:
1. The purchaser has the right to permanently use the property;
2. The purchaser's right to access or retain the property is not permanent; or
3. The purchaser's right of use is conditioned upon continued payment; and
(2) The furnishing of the following services:
(a) The rental of any room or rooms, lodgings, campsites, or accommodations furnished by any hotel,
motel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabin, campgrounds, recreational vehicle parks, or any other place in
which rooms, lodgings, campsites, or accommodations are regularly furnished to transients for a
consideration. The tax shall not apply to rooms, lodgings, campsites, or accommodations supplied for a
continuous period of thirty (30) days or more to a person;
(b) Sewer services;
(c) The sale of admissions, except:
1. Admissions to enter the grounds or enclosure of any track licensed under KRS Chapter 230 at
which live horse racing or historical horse racing is being conducted under the jurisdiction of the
Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation;
2. Admissions taxed under KRS 229.031;
3. Admissions that are charged by nonprofit educational, charitable, or religious institutions and for
which an exemption is provided under KRS 139.495; and
4. Admissions that are charged by nonprofit civic, governmental, or other nonprofit organizations
and for which an exemption is provided under KRS 139.498;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Prepaid calling service and prepaid wireless calling service;
(e) Intrastate, interstate, and international communications services as defined in KRS 139.195,
including[except] the furnishing of pay telephone service as defined in KRS 139.195;
(f) Distribution, transmission, or transportation services for natural gas that is for storage, use, or other
consumption in this state, excluding those services furnished:
1. For natural gas that is classified as residential use as provided in KRS 139.470(7); or
2. To a seller or reseller of natural gas;
(g) Landscaping services, including but not limited to:
1. Lawn care and maintenance services;
2. Tree trimming, pruning, or removal services;
3. Landscape design and installation services;
4. Landscape care and maintenance services; and
5. Snow plowing or removal services;
(h) Janitorial services, including but not limited to residential and commercial cleaning services, and carpet,
upholstery, and window cleaning services;
(i) Small animal veterinary services, excluding veterinary services for equine, cattle, poultry, swine, sheep,
goats, llamas, alpacas, ratite birds, buffaloes[buffalo], and cervids;
(j) Pet care services, including but not limited to grooming and boarding services, pet sitting services, and
pet obedience training services;
(k) Industrial laundry services, including but not limited to industrial uniform supply services, protective
apparel supply services, and industrial mat and rug supply services;
(l) Non-coin-operated laundry and dry cleaning services;
(m) Linen supply services, including but not limited to table and bed linen supply services and nonindustrial
uniform supply services;
(n) Indoor skin tanning services, including but not limited to tanning booth or tanning bed services and
spray tanning services;
(o) Non-medical diet and weight reducing services;
(p) Extended warranty services;
(q) Photography and photofinishing services;
(r) Telemarketing services;
(s) Public opinion and research polling services;
(t) Lobbying services;
(u) Executive employee recruitment services;
(v) Website design and development services;
(w) Website hosting services;
(x) Facsimile transmission services;
(y) Private mailroom services, including:
1. Presorting mail and packages by postal code;
2. Address barcoding;
3. Tracking;
4. Delivery to postal service; and
5. Private mailbox rentals;

CHAPTER 161 29
(z) Bodyguard services;
(aa) Residential and nonresidential security system monitoring services, excluding separately stated onsite
security guard services;
(ab) Private investigation services;
(ac) Process server services;
(ad) Repossession of tangible personal property services;
(ae) Personal background check services;
(af) Parking services;
1. Including:
a. Valet services; and
b. The use of parking lots and parking structures; but
2. Excluding any parking services at an educational institution;
(ag) Road and travel services provided by automobile clubs as defined in KRS 281.010;
(ah) Condominium time-share exchange services;
(ai) Rental of space for meetings, conventions, short-term business uses, entertainment events, weddings,
banquets, parties, and other short-term social events;
(aj) Social event planning and coordination services;
(ak) Leisure, recreational, and athletic instructional services;
(al) Recreational camp tuition and fees;
(am) Personal fitness training services;
(an) Massage services, except when medically necessary;
(ao) Cosmetic surgery services;
(ap) Body modification services, including tattooing, piercing, scarification, branding, tongue splitting,
transdermal and subdermal implants, ear pointing, teeth pointing, and any other modifications that are
not necessary for medical or dental health;
(aq) Laboratory testing services, excluding laboratory testing:
1. For medical, educational, or veterinary reasons; or
2. Required by a federal, state, or local statute, regulation, court order, or other government-related
requirement;
(ar) Interior decorating and design services;
(as) Household moving services;
(at) Specialized design services, including the design of clothing, costumes, fashion, furs, jewelry, shoes,
textiles, and lighting;
(au) Lapidary services, including cutting, polishing, and engraving precious stones;
(av) Labor and services to repair or maintain commercial refrigeration equipment and systems when no
tangible personal property is sold in that transaction including service calls and trip charges;
(aw) Labor to repair or alter apparel, footwear, watches, or jewelry when no tangible personal property is
sold in that transaction;[ and]
(ax) Prewritten computer software access services; and
(ay) Data brokering services.
Section 13. KRS 139.202 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Excluded from the additional taxable services imposed by KRS 139.200(2)(q) to (ax) are gross receipts
derived from:
(a)[(1)] Sales of the services in fulfillment of a lump-sum, fixed-fee contract or a fixed price sales
contract executed on or before February 25, 2022; and
(b)[(2)] A lease or rental agreement entered into on or before February 25, 2022.
(2) Excluded from the additional taxable services imposed by subsection (2)(ay) of Section 12 of this Act are
gross receipts derived from:
(a) Sales of the services in fulfillment of a lump-sum, fixed-fee contract or a fixed price sales contract
executed on or before February 25, 2026; and
(b) A lease or rental agreement entered into on or before February 25, 2026.
Section 14. KRS 139.260 is amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter and to prevent evasion of the duty to collect the taxes
imposed by KRS 139.200 and 139.310, it shall be presumed that all gross receipts and all tangible personal property,
digital property, and services sold by any person for delivery or access in this state are subject to the tax until the
contrary is established. The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale of:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, tangible personal property or digital property
unless the person takes from the purchaser a certificate to the effect that the property is either:
1. Purchased for resale according to the provisions of KRS 139.270;
2. Purchased through a fully completed certificate of exemption or fully completed Streamlined
Sales and Use Tax Agreement Certificate of Exemption in accordance with KRS 139.270; or
3. Purchased according to administrative regulations promulgated by the department governing a
direct pay authorization; or
(b) Tangible personal property to a purchaser claiming an agriculture exemption under KRS 139.480(4) to
(9), (11), (13) to (15), (22) to (29), or (32)[(23) to (30), or (33)] unless the person obtains from the
purchaser an agriculture exemption license number or a fully completed Streamlined Sales and Use Tax
Agreement Certificate of Exemption that contains an agriculture exemption license number in
accordance with KRS 139.270;
(2) A service included in KRS 139.200(2)(a) to (f) unless the person takes from the purchaser a certificate to the
effect that the service is purchased through a fully completed certificate of exemption or fully completed
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement Certificate of Exemption in accordance with KRS 139.270; and
(3) A service included in KRS 139.200(2)(g) to (ay)[(ax)] unless the person takes from the purchaser a certificate
to the effect that the service is:
(a) Purchased for resale according to KRS 139.270;
(b) Purchased through a fully completed certificate of exemption or fully completed Streamlined Sales and
Use Tax Agreement Certificate of Exemption in accordance with KRS 139.270; or
(c) Purchased according to administrative regulations promulgated by the department governing a direct
pay authorization.
Section 15. KRS 139.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal
property, digital property, and services listed under KRS 139.200(2)(p) to (ay)[(ax)] purchased for storage,
use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of six percent (6%) of the sales price.
(2) The excise tax applies to the purchase of digital property regardless of whether:
(a) The purchaser has the right to permanently use the goods;
(b) The purchaser's right to access or retain the digital property is not permanent; or
(c) The purchaser's right of use is conditioned upon continued payment.
Section 16. KRS 139.340 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 161 31
(1) Except as provided in KRS 139.470 and 139.480, every retailer engaged in business in this state shall collect
the tax imposed by KRS 139.310 from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner
and form prescribed by the department. The taxes collected or required to be collected by the retailer under
this section shall be deemed to be held in trust for and on account of the Commonwealth.
(2) "Retailer engaged in business in this state" as used in KRS 139.330 and this section includes any of the
following:
(a) Any retailer maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or
through a subsidiary or any other related entity, representative, or agent, by whatever name called, an
office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place, or other place of
business. Property owned by a person who has contracted with a printer for printing, which consists of
the final printed product, property which becomes a part of the final printed product, or copy from
which the printed product is produced, and which is located at the premises of the printer, shall not be
deemed to be an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place,
or other place of business maintained, occupied, or used by the person;
(b) Any retailer having any representative, agent, salesman, canvasser, or solicitor operating in this state
under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, or the taking of
orders for any tangible personal property, digital property, or any services subject to tax under KRS
139.200(2)(p) to (ay)[(ax)]. An unrelated printer with which a person has contracted for printing shall
not be deemed to be a representative, agent, salesman, canvasser, or solicitor for the person;
(c) Any retailer soliciting orders for tangible personal property, digital property, or any services subject to
tax under KRS 139.200(2)(p) to (ay)[(ax)] from residents of this state on a continuous, regular, or
systematic basis in which the solicitation of the order, placement of the order by the customer or the
payment for the order utilizes the services of any financial institution, telecommunication system, radio
or television station, cable television service, print media, or other facility or service located in this
state;
(d) Any retailer deriving receipts from the lease or rental of tangible personal property situated in this state;
(e) Any retailer soliciting orders for tangible personal property, digital property, or any services subject to
tax under KRS 139.200(2)(p) to (ay)[(ax)] from residents of this state on a continuous, regular,
systematic basis if the retailer benefits from an agent or representative operating in this state under the
authority of the retailer to repair or service tangible personal property or digital property sold by the
retailer;
(f) Any retailer located outside Kentucky that uses a representative in Kentucky, either full-time or part-
time, if the representative performs any activities that help establish or maintain a marketplace for the
retailer, including receiving or exchanging returned merchandise; or
(g) 1. Any remote retailer selling tangible personal property,[ or] digital property, or services
delivered,[ or] transferred electronically, or provided to a purchaser in this state, including retail
sales facilitated by a marketplace provider on behalf of the remote retailer[,] if [:
a. The remote retailer sold tangible personal property or digital property that was delivered or transferred
electronically to a purchaser in this state in two hundred (200) or more separate transactions in
the previous calendar year or the current calendar year; or
b. ]the remote retailer's gross receipts derived from the sale of tangible personal property,[ or] digital
property, or services delivered,[ or] transferred electronically, or provided to a purchaser in this
state in the previous calendar year or current calendar year exceeds one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000).
2. Any remote retailer that meets the[either] threshold provided in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall register for a sales and use tax permit and collect the tax imposed by KRS
139.310 from the purchaser no later than the first day of the calendar month that is at the most
sixty (60) days after the[either] threshold is reached.
Section 17. KRS 139.470 is amended to read as follows:
There are excluded from the computation of the amount of taxes imposed by this chapter:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, tangible personal
property or digital property which this state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or laws of the
United States, or under the Constitution of this state;
(2) Gross receipts from sales of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(a) Nonreturnable and returnable containers when sold without the contents to persons who place the
contents in the container and sell the contents together with the container; and
(b) Returnable containers when sold with the contents in connection with a retail sale of the contents or
when resold for refilling;
As used in this subsection[section] the term "returnable containers" means containers of a kind customarily
returned by the buyer of the contents for reuse. All other containers are "nonreturnable containers";
(3) Gross receipts from occasional sales of tangible personal property or digital property and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of tangible personal property or digital property, the transfer of which to the
purchaser is an occasional sale;
(4) Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property to a common carrier, shipped by the retailer via the
purchasing carrier under a bill of lading, whether the freight is paid in advance or the shipment is made freight
charges collect, to a point outside this state and the property is actually transported to the out-of-state
destination for use by the carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier;
(5) Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property sold through coin-operated bulk vending machines, if
the sale amounts to fifty cents ($0.50) or less, if the retailer is primarily engaged in making the sales and
maintains records satisfactory to the department. As used in this subsection, "bulk vending machine" means a
vending machine containing unsorted merchandise which, upon insertion of a coin, dispenses the same in
approximately equal portions, at random and without selection by the customer;
(6) Gross receipts from sales:
(a) To any cabinet, department, bureau, commission, board, or other statutory or constitutional agency of
the state and gross receipts from sales to counties, cities, or special districts as defined in KRS 65.005.
This exemption shall apply only to purchases of tangible personal property, digital property, or services
for use solely in the government function. A purchaser not qualifying as a governmental agency or unit
shall not be entitled to the exemption even though the purchaser may be the recipient of public funds or
grants; and
(b) Of data brokering services by:
1. Any cabinet, department, bureau, commission, board, or other statutory or constitutional
agency of this state; or
2. Counties, cities, or special districts as defined in KRS 65.005;
(7) (a) Gross receipts from the sale of sewer services, water, and fuel to Kentucky residents for use in heating,
water heating, cooking, lighting, and other residential uses if the sewer services, water, and fuel are
purchased and declared by the resident as used in his or her place of domicile.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Fuel" includes but is not[shall include but not be] limited to natural gas, electricity, fuel oil,
bottled gas, coal, coke, and wood; and
2. "Place of domicile" means the place where an individual has his or her legal, true, fixed, and
permanent home and principal establishment, and to which, whenever the individual is absent,
the individual has the intention of returning.
(c) Determinations of eligibility for the exemption shall be made by the department.
(d) The exemption shall apply to charges for sewer service, water, and fuel billed to an owner or operator
of a multi-unit residential rental facility or mobile home and recreational vehicle park if the owner or
operator declares that the sewer services, water, and fuel are purchased for Kentucky residents to be
used in the resident's place of domicile.
(e) The exemption shall apply also to residential property which may be held by legal or equitable title, by
the entireties, jointly, in common, as a condominium, or indirectly by the stock ownership or

CHAPTER 161 33
membership representing the owner's or member's proprietary interest in a corporation owning a fee or
a leasehold initially in excess of ninety-eight (98) years if the sewer services, water, and fuel are
purchased for and declared by the Kentucky resident as used in his or her place of domicile;
(8) Gross receipts from sales to an out-of-state agency, organization, or institution exempt from sales and use tax
in its state of residence when that agency, organization, or institution gives proof of its tax-exempt status to the
retailer and the retailer maintains a file of the proof;
(9) (a) Gross receipts derived from the sale of tangible personal property, as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, to a manufacturer or industrial processor if the property is to be directly used in the
manufacturing or industrial processing process of:
1. Tangible personal property at a plant facility;
2. Distilled spirits or wine at a plant facility or on the premises of a distiller, rectifier, winery, or
small farm winery licensed under KRS 243.030 that includes a retail establishment on the
premises; or
3. Malt beverages at a plant facility or on the premises of a brewer or microbrewery licensed under
KRS 243.040 that includes a retail establishment;
and which will be for sale.
(b) The following tangible personal property shall qualify for exemption under this subsection:
1. Materials which enter into and become an ingredient or component part of the manufactured
product;
2. Other tangible personal property which is directly used in the manufacturing or industrial
processing process, if the property has a useful life of less than one (1) year. Specifically, these
items are categorized as follows:
a. Materials. This refers to the raw materials which become an ingredient or component part
of supplies or industrial tools exempt under subdivisions b. and c. below;
b. Supplies. This category includes supplies such as lubricating and compounding oils,
grease, machine waste, abrasives, chemicals, solvents, fluxes, anodes, filtering materials,
fire brick, catalysts, dyes, refrigerants, and explosives. The supplies indicated above need
not come in direct contact with a manufactured product to be exempt. "Supplies" does not
include repair, replacement, or spare parts of any kind; and
c. Industrial tools. This group is limited to hand tools such as jigs, dies, drills, cutters, rolls,
reamers, chucks, saws, and spray guns and to tools attached to a machine such as molds,
grinding balls, grinding wheels, dies, bits, and cutting blades. Normally, for industrial
tools to be considered directly used in the manufacturing or industrial processing process,
they shall come into direct contact with the product being manufactured or processed; and
3. Materials and supplies that are not reusable in the same manufacturing or industrial processing
process at the completion of a single manufacturing or processing cycle. A single manufacturing
cycle shall be considered to be the period elapsing from the time the raw materials enter into the
manufacturing process until the finished product emerges at the end of the manufacturing
process.
(c) The property described in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be regarded as having been purchased
for resale.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, a manufacturer or industrial processor includes an individual or
business entity that performs only part of the manufacturing or industrial processing activity, and the
person or business entity need not take title to tangible personal property that is incorporated into, or
becomes the product of, the activity.
(e) The exemption provided in this subsection does not include repair, replacement, or spare parts;
(10) Any water use fee paid or passed through to the Kentucky River Authority by facilities using water from the
Kentucky River basin to the Kentucky River Authority in accordance with KRS 151.700 to 151.730 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the authority;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

34 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(11) (a) 1. Gross receipts from the sale of newspaper inserts or catalogs purchased for storage, use, or other
consumption outside this state and delivered by the retailer's own vehicle to a location outside
this state, or delivered to the United States Postal Service, a common carrier, or a contract carrier
for delivery outside this state, regardless of whether the carrier is selected by the purchaser or
retailer or an agent or representative of the purchaser or retailer, or whether the F.O.B. is
retailer's shipping point or purchaser's destination.
2.[(a)] As used in this paragraph[subsection]:
a.[1.] "Catalogs" means tangible personal property that is printed to the special order of the
purchaser and composed substantially of information regarding goods and services offered
for sale; and
b.[2.] "Newspaper inserts" means printed materials that are placed in or distributed with a
newspaper of general circulation.
(b) The retailer shall be responsible for establishing that delivery was made to a non-Kentucky location
through shipping documents or other credible evidence as determined by the department;
(12) Gross receipts from the sale of water used in the raising of equine as a business;
(13) (a) 1. Gross receipts from the sale of metal retail fixtures manufactured in this state and purchased for
storage, use, or other consumption outside this state and delivered by the retailer's own vehicle to
a location outside this state, or delivered to the United States Postal Service, a common carrier,
or a contract carrier for delivery outside this state, regardless of whether the carrier is selected by
the purchaser or retailer or an agent or representative of the purchaser or retailer, or whether the
F.O.B. is the retailer's shipping point or the purchaser's destination.
2.[(a)] As used in this paragraph[subsection], "metal retail fixtures" means check stands and belted and
nonbelted checkout counters, whether made in bulk or pursuant to specific purchaser
specifications, that are to be used directly by the purchaser or to be distributed by the purchaser.
(b) The retailer shall be responsible for establishing that delivery was made to a non-Kentucky location
through shipping documents or other credible evidence as determined by the department;
(14) Gross receipts from the sale of unenriched or enriched uranium purchased for ultimate storage, use, or other
consumption outside this state and delivered to a common carrier in this state for delivery outside this state,
regardless of whether the carrier is selected by the purchaser or retailer, or is an agent or representative of the
purchaser or retailer, or whether the F.O.B. is the retailer's shipping point or purchaser's destination;
(15) Amounts received from a tobacco buydown. As used in this subsection, "buydown" means an agreement
whereby an amount, whether paid in money, credit, or otherwise, is received by a retailer from a manufacturer
or wholesaler based upon the quantity and unit price of tobacco products sold at retail that requires the retailer
to reduce the selling price of the product to the purchaser without the use of a manufacturer's or wholesaler's
coupon or redemption certificate;
(16) Gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property or digital property returned by a purchaser when the
full sales price is refunded either in cash or credit. This exclusion shall not apply if the purchaser, in order to
obtain the refund, is required to purchase other tangible personal property or digital property at a price greater
than the amount charged for the property that is returned;
(17) Gross receipts from the sales of gasoline and special fuels subject to tax under KRS Chapter 138;
(18) The amount of any tax imposed by the United States upon or with respect to retail sales, whether imposed on
the retailer or the consumer, not including any manufacturer's excise or import duty;
(19) Gross receipts from the sale of any motor vehicle as defined in KRS 138.450 which is:
(a) Sold to a Kentucky resident, registered for use on the public highways, and upon which any applicable
tax levied by KRS 138.460 has been paid; or
(b) Sold to a nonresident of Kentucky if the nonresident registers the motor vehicle in a state that:
1. Allows residents of Kentucky to purchase motor vehicles without payment of that state's sales
tax at the time of sale; or
2. Allows residents of Kentucky to remove the vehicle from that state within a specific period for
subsequent registration and use in Kentucky without payment of that state's sales tax;

CHAPTER 161 35
(20) Gross receipts from the sale of a semi-trailer as defined in KRS 189.010(12) and trailer as defined in KRS
189.010(17);
(21) Gross receipts from the collection of:
(a) Any fee or charge levied by a local government pursuant to KRS 65.760;
(b) The charge imposed by KRS 65.7629(3);
(c) The fee imposed by KRS 65.7634; and
(d) The service charge imposed by KRS 65.7636;
(22) Gross receipts derived from charges for labor or services to apply, install, repair, or maintain tangible personal
property directly used in manufacturing or industrial processing process of:
(a) Tangible personal property at a plant facility;
(b) Distilled spirits or wine at a plant facility or on the premises of a distiller, rectifier, winery, or small
farm winery licensed under KRS 243.030; or
(c) Malt beverages at a plant facility or on the premises of a brewer or microbrewery licensed under KRS
243.040;
that is not otherwise exempt under subsection (9) of this section or KRS 139.480(10), if the charges for labor
or services are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to purchaser;
(23) (a) For persons selling services included in KRS 139.200(2)(g) to (ax) prior to January 1, 2025, gross
receipts derived from the sale of those services if the gross receipts were less than twelve thousand
dollars ($12,000) during calendar year 2024. When gross receipts from these services exceed twelve
thousand dollars ($12,000) in a calendar year:
1. All gross receipts over twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) are taxable in that calendar year; and
2. All gross receipts are subject to tax in subsequent calendar years.
(b) The exemption provided in this subsection shall not apply to a person also engaged in the business of
selling tangible personal property, digital property, or services included in KRS 139.200(2)(a) to (f);
and
(24) (a) For persons that first begin making sales of services included in KRS 139.200(2)(g) to (ax) on or after
January 1, 2025, gross receipts derived from the sale of those services if the gross receipts are less than
twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) within the first calendar year of operation. When gross receipts from
these services exceed twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) in a calendar year:
1. All gross receipts over twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) are taxable in that calendar year; and
2. All gross receipts are subject to tax in subsequent calendar years.
(b) The exemption provided in this subsection shall not apply to a person that is also engaged in the
business of selling tangible personal property, digital property, or services included in KRS
139.200(2)(a) to (f).
Section 18. KRS 224.50-868 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways
that is self-propelled, including a low-speed motor vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010;
(b) "Semitrailer" means any vehicle:
1. Designed:
a. As temporary living quarters for recreation, camping, or travel; or
b. For carrying persons or property;
2. Designed for being drawn by a motor vehicle; and
3. Constructed that:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

36 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Some part of its weight; or
b. Some part of its load;
rests upon or is carried by another vehicle; and
(c) "Trailer" means any vehicle:
1. Designed:
a. As temporary living quarters for recreation, camping, or travel; or
b. For carrying persons or property;
2. Designed for being drawn by a motor vehicle; and
3. Constructed that:
a. No part of its weight; and
b. No part of its load;
rests upon or is carried by another vehicle.
(2) (a) 1. Prior to July 1, 2018, a person purchasing a new motor vehicle tire in Kentucky shall pay to the
retailer a one dollar ($1) fee at the time of the purchase of that tire. The fee shall not be subject to
the Kentucky sales tax.
2. Beginning July 1, 2018, but prior to July 1, 2020, a fee is hereby imposed upon a retailer at the
rate of two dollars ($2) for each new motor vehicle tire sold in Kentucky. The fee shall be subject
to the Kentucky sales tax.
3. Beginning July 1, 2020, but prior to July 1, 2034[2026], a fee is hereby imposed upon a retailer
at the rate of two dollars ($2) for each new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer tire sold in
Kentucky. The fee shall be subject to the Kentucky sales tax.
4. A retailer may pass the fee imposed by this paragraph on to the purchaser of the new tire.
(b) 1. A new tire is a tire that has never been placed on a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer wheel
rim.
2. A new tire is not a tire placed on a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer prior to its original retail
sale or a recapped tire.
(3) When a retailer sells a new motor vehicle tire in Kentucky to replace another tire, the tire that is replaced
becomes a waste tire subject to the waste tire program. The retailer shall encourage the purchaser of the new
tire to leave the waste tire with the retailer or meet the following requirements:
(a) Dispose of the waste tire in accordance with KRS 224.50-856(1);
(b) Deliver the waste tire to a person registered in accordance with the waste tire program; or
(c) Reuse the waste tire for its original intended purpose or an agricultural purpose.
(4) (a) A retailer shall report to the Department of Revenue on or before the twentieth day of each month the
number of new motor vehicle tires sold during the preceding month and the number of waste tires
received from customers that month.
(b) The report shall be filed on forms and contain information as the Department of Revenue may require.
(c) The retailer shall be allowed to retain an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the fees due, provided the
amount due is not delinquent at the time of payment.
(5) A retailer shall:
(a) Accept from the purchaser of a new tire, if offered, for each new motor vehicle tire sold, a waste tire of
similar size and type; and
(b) Post notice at the place where retail sales are made that state law requires:
1. The retailer to accept, if offered, a waste tire for each new motor vehicle tire sold and that a
person purchasing a new motor vehicle tire to replace another tire shall comply with subsection
(3) of this section; and

CHAPTER 161 37
2. The two dollar ($2) new tire fee is used by the state to oversee the management of waste tires,
including cleaning up abandoned waste tire piles and preventing illegal dumping of waste tires.
(6) A retailer shall comply with the requirements of the recordkeeping system for waste tires established by KRS
224.50-874.
(7) A retailer shall transfer waste tires only to a person who presents a letter from the cabinet approving the
registration issued under KRS 224.50-858 or a copy of a solid waste disposal facility permit issued by the
cabinet, unless the retailer is delivering the waste tires to a destination outside Kentucky and the waste tires
will remain in the retailer's possession until they reach that destination.
(8) The cabinet shall, in conjunction with the Waste Tire Working Group, develop the informational fact sheet to
be made publicly available on the cabinet's website and available in print upon request. The fact sheet shall
identify ways to properly dispose of the waste tire and present information on the problems caused by
improper waste tire disposal.
Section 19. KRS 224.50-872 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall report to the General Assembly no later than January 15 each year on the effectiveness of the
waste tire program in developing markets for waste tires, the amount of revenue generated and the
effectiveness of the fee established in KRS 224.50-868 in funding the cabinet's implementation of the waste
tire program, to include any waste tire amnesty program established by the cabinet as provided for in KRS
224.50-880(1)(b), whether the fee should be extended, comparative data on the number of waste tires
generated each year, the number disposed of, the number of orphan tire piles, and the cost of tire disposal by
counties in the Commonwealth.
(2) The cabinet shall gather the following information related to the waste tire trust fund in KRS 224.50-880
and submit an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by November 1, 2026, and by each November 1 thereafter as
long as the new tire fee established in Section 18 of this Act is collected:
(a) Total receipts deposited into the fund from the new tire fee during the preceding fiscal year;
(b) A detailed accounting of the activities supported by fund moneys, including the amount spent on
each activity;
(c) A detailed accounting of all administrative expenses;
(d) Identification of any unexpended funds and the reason why the funds were not expended;
(e) An explanation of how all expenditures align with program objectives;
(f) A list of recipients receiving money from the fund with a detailed accounting of the amount of money
received by each recipient and the use of the moneys; and
(g) A compilation of the information required to be reported to the cabinet under KRS 224.50-878(4).
Section 20. KRS 45.760 is amended to read as follows:
The provisions of any other law notwithstanding:
(1) During any biennium the amount allotted, from all sources, for expenditure on any project in the State Capital
Construction Program for that biennium shall not exceed the estimated cost of the project during that
biennium, as shown in any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly, except as provided in this
section and KRS 45.770 and 45.780;[.]
(2) When the General Assembly disapproves a capital project or item of equipment that was previously approved,
it shall be eliminated as a capital project or major item of equipment in the Capital Projects Program. General
fund moneys appropriated for that project or item of equipment but not allotted, and general fund moneys
allotted but not expended to the project or equipment account, shall be transferred to the capital construction
and equipment purchase contingency account in the capital construction fund. Agency or federal funds for a
disapproved project or item, that have been appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be
returned to the appropriate agency fund. Road fund moneys for a disapproved project or item that have been
appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be returned to the Road Fund Surplus Account;[.]
(3) Capital projects and major items of equipment disapproved under subsection (2) of this section shall be
terminated;[.]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

38 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) During any biennium, the amount allotted from all sources for expenditure for the purchase of any major item
of equipment shall not exceed the estimated cost of the item as shown in any branch budget bill enacted by the
General Assembly and authorizing the purchase, except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section
and in KRS 45.770 and 45.780;[.]
(5) A major item of equipment to be used for medical, scientific, or research purposes, excluding computer
equipment and aircraft, may be authorized even though it is not specifically listed in any branch budget bill
enacted for the current biennium, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not
be reallotted for expenditure on the item; moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and
shall not require the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs;
(b) Funds are available for the purchase and the method of financing the purchase will not require an
additional appropriation of state funds to acquire the item; and
(c) The purchasing agency shall, within thirty (30) days after making the purchase, report the purchase to
the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee. The report shall include a description of the item,
the purpose for which it will be used, the necessity for the purchase, and the amount expended for the
purchase from each source of funds used;[.]
(6) Moneys from any source may be transferred to the allotment account of any capital project authorized by the
General Assembly under this section, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) The total amount transferred shall not exceed five percent (5%)[fifteen percent (15%)] of the amount
authorized by the General Assembly unless:
1. The source of funds is private or federal; or
2. An unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency requires the transfer;[.]
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not
be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the capital project;[.]
(c) Moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of any current
general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs;[.]
(d) The relevant entity head, or his or her designee, shall submit the capital project to the Capital Projects
and Bond Oversight Committee at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting. The
submission shall include a written certification to the committee that the transfer, in excess of five
percent (5%)[fifteen percent (15%)] of the amount authorized by the General Assembly, is:
1. Paid for out of private or federal funds; or
2. Required by an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency; and
3. Not allotted or reallotted from moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General
Assembly for another purpose; and
4. Not jeopardizing any existing program and not requiring the use of any current general funds
specifically dedicated to existing programs; and[.]
(e) If a capital project is financed with road funds, the cost overruns or scope increases shall be paid out of
the highway contingency account established pursuant to KRS 45.247;[.]
(7) A capital construction project or a major item of equipment may be authorized even though it is not
specifically listed in any branch budget bill, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) Fifty percent (50%) or more of the actual cost shall be funded by federal or private funds, and fifty
percent (50%) or less of the actual cost shall be funded by moneys appropriated to the capital
construction and equipment purchase contingency account or, if the purpose of the project or equipment
is to reduce energy costs, the relevant entity head certifies projected energy cost savings associated with
the project or equipment are reasonable and sufficient to produce an aggregate simple payback period,
as defined by KRS 56.770, of five (5) years or less;
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not
be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the project or major item of equipment; moneys utilized shall

CHAPTER 161 39
not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds
specifically dedicated to existing programs; and
(c) The relevant entity head, or his or her designee, shall submit the project or major item of equipment to
the committee for review as provided by KRS 45.800;[.]
(8) The capital construction and equipment purchase contingency fund may be used to advance funds to projects
authorized to be financed by bonds, to finance feasibility studies for projects which may be contemplated for
future funding, or to audit the capital projects program when authorized by the General Assembly;[.]
(9) On or before October 1, each branch of government shall submit to the committee the following information:
(a) A complete list and summary description of every capital construction project and major item of
equipment not completed as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year;[ and]
(b) For each project and major item of equipment, as of July 1, of the current fiscal year:
1. The project phase;
2. The project account number, project name, and any other term employed to identify the project
or major item of equipment;
3. The available balance in the project or major item of equipment account, and any sums
considered available for that project or major item of equipment;
4. A statement of the transfers of funds to or from the project or major item of equipment account;
and, any account to which transfers from each project or major item of equipment has been
made;
5. The year in which the project or major item of equipment was approved, with specific reference
to the legislation by which the project or item was approved;
6. Total expenditure on the project or major item of equipment;
7. The current estimated completion cost, including the amount required for annual inflation; and
8. A statement that additional funds for the completion of the project or major item of equipment
are or are not required; and, if required, why sufficient funds for completion are not available;
and
(c) The balance in the appropriated, but unallotted account; and the balance in any account, however
designated, that contains appropriated, but unallotted funds for capital construction; and[.]
(10) When the General Assembly authorizes a capital construction item in the capital construction section of a
branch budget bill, the entity head charged with executing the branch budget shall construct the capital
construction item according to the requirements set forth in the branch budget bill, supporting documentation
considered by the General Assembly, and branch budget records. The entity head shall not deviate from these
requirements with regard to:
(a) Purpose or location to the extent that the capital construction item no longer meets the identified needs;
or
(b) Configuration for reasons other than practical accommodation to the construction site or specific
program to be accommodated within that capital construction item.
Section 21. KRS 45.770 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created within the capital construction fund the capital construction and equipment purchase
contingency account. The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the account by the General
Assembly.
(2) Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to the
allotment account of a capital construction project, authorized by the General Assembly under KRS 45.760,
subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, during any biennium, the amount that
may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the
allotment account of an authorized project shall not exceed an amount equal to five percent (5%)[fifteen
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

40 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
percent (15%)] of the estimated cost of the project, for that biennium, approved by the General
Assembly in the manner provided by KRS 45.760;[.]
(b) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the cost of an authorized project exceeds, by more than
five percent (5%)[fifteen percent (15%)], its estimated cost, as approved by the General Assembly, due
to an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency, moneys in excess of five
percent (5%)[fifteen percent (15%)] of the estimated cost of the project may be transferred from the
capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the allotment account of the
project; and[.]
(c) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection,
present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen
(14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS 45.800. Presentation of a
proposed transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include written certification to the
committee from the commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services, Finance and
Administration Cabinet, that the transfer is necessitated by cost increases resulting from an unforeseen
decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency.
(3) Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to the
allotment account of a major item of equipment, authorized by the General Assembly under KRS 45.760, for
expenditure on that item subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, during any biennium, the amount that
may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the
allotment account of an authorized major item of equipment shall not exceed an amount equal to five
percent (5%)[fifteen percent (15%)] of the estimated cost of the item, for that biennium, approved by
the General Assembly in the manner provided by KRS 45.760;[.]
(b) If the cost of an authorized major item of equipment exceeds, by more than five percent (5%)[fifteen
percent (15%)], its estimated cost, as approved by the General Assembly, due to an unforeseen decision
by a federal or state court or regulatory agency, moneys in excess of five percent (5%)[fifteen percent
(15%)] of the estimated cost may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase
contingency account to the allotment account of the item; and[.]
(c) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection,
present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen
(14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS 45.800. Presentation of a
proposed transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include written certification to the
committee from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the transfer is necessitated
by cost increases resulting from an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency.
(4) Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to a capital
project account to be used for nonrecurring moving expenses of state agencies to address issues of public
health and safety or governmental efficiency, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection,
present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen
(14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS 45.800;[.]
(b) Presentation of a proposed transfer shall include written certification to the committee from the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the moving costs are nonrecurring, and
describing the specific benefits, including but not limited to fiscal and efficiency savings associated
with the proposal; and[.]
(c) No transfer shall be used for capital improvements.
(5) No later than thirty (30) days after a project has been accepted by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the
contracts encumbered against that project have been closed, moneys constituting the available balance in the
project or equipment account shall be transferred as follows:
(a) If the project was a line item in the budget and not funded with road funds, then the balance shall be
transferred to the capital construction surplus account;[.]
(b) If the project was a line item in the budget and funded with road funds, then the balance shall be
transferred to the road fund surplus account;[.]

CHAPTER 161 41
(c) If the project was completed within the biennium in which it was authorized, and if the project was
funded from a major maintenance pool, then the balance shall be transferred to that major maintenance
pool; or[.]
(d) If the project was not completed within the biennium in which it was authorized, without being
expressly reauthorized by a succeeding session of the General Assembly, then the balance shall be
transferred to the capital construction surplus account.
Section 22. KRS 45.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In addition to any payment method authorized by law, and notwithstanding any statute to the contrary,
any state agency may accept the following methods of payment to secure funds for deposit into the
State Treasury:
1.[(a)] Credit card;
2.[(b)] Debit card;
3.[(c)] Electronic check;
4.[(d)] Automated clearinghouse (ACH) debit; or
5.[(e)] Any other electronic payment method upon the prior written approval of both the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer.
(b)[(2)] Any fees charged to a state agency by the provider of the payment services listed in paragraph
(a) of this subsection[ (1) of this section] shall be deemed to represent collection expenses and may be
considered normal operating expenses of the agency, or the agency may collect convenience fees from
users to supplement agency costs of delivering services.
(2) (a) In satisfaction of debts owed to the Commonwealth:
1. Rounding cash transactions to the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment shall occur:
a. When pennies are not available to complete resolution of a transaction; and
b. On settlement of the final bill of sale, invoice, or fee after all individual items, duties,
fees, taxes, and charges are calculated to the exact cent; and
2. Noncash transactions shall continue to be settled to the cent without rounding.
(b) As used in this subsection, "the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment" means:
1. Amounts ending in one cent ($0.01) and two cents ($0.02) are rounded down to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents;
2. Amounts ending in three cents ($0.03) and four cents ($0.04) are rounded up to the nearest
five ($0.05) cents;
3. Amounts ending in six cents ($0.06) and seven cents ($0.07) are rounded down to the nearest
five ($0.05) cents;
4. Amounts ending in eight cents ($0.08) and nine cents ($0.09) are rounded up to the nearest
ten ($0.10) cents; and
5. Amounts ending in zero ($0.00) cents and five ($0.05) cents remain unchanged.
(c) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any person selling goods or services shall not be in
violation of any requirements, laws, administrative regulations, or standards of this state or political
subdivision of this state based on any action taken in compliance with this section.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In satisfaction of debts owed to cities, counties, and local government entities:
(a) Rounding cash transactions to the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment shall occur:
1. When pennies are not available to complete resolution of a transaction; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

42 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. On settlement of the final bill of sale, invoice, or fee after all individual items, duties, fees,
taxes, and charges are calculated to the exact cent; and
(b) Noncash transactions shall continue to be settled to the cent without rounding.
(2) As used in this section, "the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment" means:
(a) Amounts ending in one cent ($0.01) and two cents ($0.02) are rounded down to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents;
(b) Amounts ending in three cents ($0.03) and four cents ($0.04) are rounded up to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;
(c) Amounts ending in six cents ($0.06) and seven cents ($0.07) are rounded down to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;
(d) Amounts ending in eight cents ($0.08) and nine cents ($0.09) are rounded up to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents; and
(e) Amounts ending in zero ($0.00) cents and five ($0.05) cents remain unchanged.
(3) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any person selling goods or services shall not be in
violation of any requirements, laws, administrative regulations, or standards of this state or political
subdivision of this state based on any action taken in compliance with this section.
Section 24. KRS 139.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the tax shall be required to be collected by the
retailer from the purchaser. The tax shall be displayed separately from the sales price, the price advertised in
the premises, the marked price, or other price on the sales receipt or other proof of sales.
(2) The department may relieve certain retailers from the requirement in subsection (1) of this section of separate
display of the tax when the circumstances of the retailer make compliance impracticable. If the retailer
establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the sales tax has been added to the total amount of the
sales price and has not been absorbed by the retailer, the amount of the sales price shall be the amount received
exclusive of the tax imposed.
(3) Retailers that provide road and travel services that are taxable under KRS 139.200 shall not be required to state
the tax separately from the sales price if the retailer can establish and provide evidence that the sales tax has
been added to the total amount of the sales price charged to the purchaser and has not been absorbed by the
retailer. The amount of the sales price shall be the amount received exclusive of the tax imposed.
(4) The taxes collected under this section shall be deemed to be held in trust by the retailer for and on account of
the Commonwealth.
(5) The taxes to be collected under this section shall constitute a debt of the retailer to the Commonwealth.
(6) Regardless of a purchaser's method of payment, a retailer shall not be relieved of the retailer's
responsibility to collect and remit the correct amount of tax due.
SECTION 25. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In satisfaction of debts owed to a school district:
(a) Rounding cash transactions to the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment shall occur:
1. When pennies are not available to complete resolution of a transaction; and
2. On settlement of the final bill of sale, invoice, or fee after all individual items, duties, fees,
taxes, and charges are calculated to the exact cent; and
(b) Noncash transactions shall continue to be settled to the cent without rounding.
(2) As used in this section, "the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment" means:
(a) Amounts ending in one cent ($0.01) and two cents ($0.02) are rounded down to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents;
(b) Amounts ending in three cents ($0.03) and four cents ($0.04) are rounded up to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;

CHAPTER 161 43
(c) Amounts ending in six cents ($0.06) and seven cents ($0.07) are rounded down to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;
(d) Amounts ending in eight cents ($0.08) and nine cents ($0.09) are rounded up to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents; and
(e) Amounts ending in zero ($0.00) cents and five ($0.05) cents remain unchanged.
(3) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any person selling goods or services shall not be in
violation of any requirements, laws, administrative regulations, or standards of this state or political
subdivision of this state based on any action taken in compliance with this section.
SECTION 26. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In satisfaction of debts owed in buying or selling goods or services or related to transactions occurring in
accordance with KRS Chapters 154A, 230, and 238:
(a) Rounding cash transactions to the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment may occur:
1. When pennies are not available to complete resolution of a transaction; and
2. On settlement of the final bill of sale, invoice, or fee after all individual items, duties, fees,
taxes, and charges are calculated to the exact cent; and
(b) Noncash transactions shall continue to be settled to the cent without rounding.
(2) As used in this section, "the nearest five cent ($0.05) increment" means:
(a) Amounts ending in one cent ($0.01) and two cents ($0.02) are rounded down to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents;
(b) Amounts ending in three cents ($0.03) and four cents ($0.04) are rounded up to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;
(c) Amounts ending in six cents ($0.06) and seven cents ($0.07) are rounded down to the nearest five
($0.05) cents;
(d) Amounts ending in eight cents ($0.08) and nine cents ($0.09) are rounded up to the nearest ten
($0.10) cents; and
(e) Amounts ending in zero ($0.00) cents and five ($0.05) cents remain unchanged.
(3) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any person selling goods or services and any person
making transactions in accordance with KRS Chapters 154A, 230, and 238 shall not be in violation of any
requirements, laws, administrative regulations, or standards of this state or political subdivision of this state
based on any action taken in compliance with this section.
SECTION 27. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 27 to 30 of this Act:
(1) "Board" means the board of trustees of a district established under Section 29 of this Act;
(2) "District" means a regional industrial taxing district established by an interlocal agreement as permitted
under Section 28 of this Act;
(3) "Infrastructure development" means the construction or improvement, within a district, of roads and
facilities necessary or desirable for improvements of the real estate, including:
(a) Surveys;
(b) Site tests and inspections;
(c) Environmental remediation;
(d) Subsurface site work;
(e) Excavation;
(f) Removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other underground and surface obstructions;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

44 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(g) Filling, grading, and the provision of drainage, storm water retention, utility installation, including
but not limited to water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, and communications; and
(h) Utility extensions to the boundaries of a district;
(4) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government, charter county government,
consolidated local government, or unified local government located within the Commonwealth;
(5) "Multicounty region" means multiple counties, multiple cities not located in the same county, or a
combination of counties and cities with at least two (2) local governments from different counties; and
(6) "Trustee" means an individual appointed to the board that collectively holds overall responsibility for
managing and controlling the affairs of a district in accordance with KRS Chapter 65A.
Section 28. KRS 65.302 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [As used in this section:
(a) "Board" means the board of trustees of a district;
(b) "District" means a taxing district established under subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(c) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government, charter county government,
consolidated local government, or unified local government located within the Commonwealth; and
(d) "Multicounty region" means multiple counties, multiple cities not located in the same county, or a
combination of counties and cities with at least two (2) local governments from different counties.
(2) ](a) 1. After providing notice in accordance with Section 30 of this Act, two (2) or more governing
bodies of local governments constituting a multicounty region may join together by entering into
an interlocal agreement under KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to develop real estate as part of a regional
economic development project. The interlocal agreement shall specify the investment dollars
contributed to the regional economic development project by each local government, the use of
those investment dollars for the project, and the provision of services provided by each local
government.
2. The regional economic development project shall:
a. Consist of three hundred (300) or more contiguous acres located in the jurisdiction of a
local government that is a party to the interlocal agreement; and
b. Result in the creation of at least five hundred (500) new jobs.
(b) 1. The territory that will be used in a regional economic development project may be organized into
a taxing district for the purpose of levying taxes to:
a. Provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the district and
governmental services for the district;[ and]
b. Pay the debt service on bonds issued to finance the cost of[ building] infrastructure
development in the district;
c. Pay the Commonwealth for funds appropriated for the development of the district; and
d. Invest in future regional economic development projects located in the jurisdiction of
any local government that is a party to the interlocal agreement.
2. A taxing district created under this paragraph shall comply with KRS 65.182 to 65.190, including
the petition requirements, but not the percentage of registered voter signature requirements under
KRS 65.182(1)(a).[
2. The territory located within the district shall not be subject to annexation without the consent of
the governing bodies of all of the local governments that are a party to the interlocal agreement.]
(2)[(3)] (a) Once created, the district shall constitute a taxing district within the meaning of Section 157 of
the Constitution of Kentucky and is authorized to levy a special ad valorem tax on property located
within the jurisdictional boundaries of the district.
(b) The special ad valorem tax rate shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of the
assessed value of the property.

CHAPTER 161 45
(c) The special ad valorem tax shall be:
1. In addition to all other ad valorem taxes; and
2. Administered and collected in the same manner as the county ad valorem taxes, except the
revenues shall be turned over to the board.
(3)[(4)] (a) In addition to the special ad valorem tax levied under subsection (2)[(3)] of this section, the
governing body of a local government in which the district is located may, with agreement of the
governing bodies of all of the local governments that are a party to the interlocal agreement, impose and
collect an occupational license fee on businesses, trades, professions, or occupations performed,
rendered, or conducted within the district, at a percentage rate not to exceed three percent (3%) of:
1. Salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation earned by persons within the district for
work done and services performed, rendered, or conducted within the district;
2. The net profits of self-employed individuals, partnerships, professional associations, or joint
ventures resulting from businesses, trades, professions, occupations, or activities conducted in
the district; and
3. The net profits of corporations resulting from businesses, trades, professions, occupations, or
activities conducted in the district.
(b) Once an occupational license fee is imposed under this subsection, the rate of the occupational license
fee shall never increase.
(c) [Except for an occupational license fee imposed under KRS Chapter 160, an occupational license fee
imposed under this subsection shall be the only occupational license fee imposed on businesses, trades,
professions, or occupations performed, rendered, or conducted within the district.
(d) ]The occupational license fee shall not apply to businesses, trades, professions, or occupations exempt
under KRS 68.180, 68.197, or 91.200.
(d)[(e)] Each local government that is a party to the interlocal agreement shall receive a portion of the
revenues collected from the occupational license fee as specified by the agreement. The revenues may
be deposited into the general fund of the local government pursuant to the interlocal agreement[to be
used in accordance with the purposes set out in subsection (2)(b) of this section].
(4) (a) If a district is located within the jurisdiction of a city, the city may impose a license fee. The city shall
not impose an occupational license fee until all cities that are a party to the interlocal agreement
approve of the imposition of the occupational license fee and the rate that is to be imposed.
(b) Persons who pay a county license fee and a license fee to a city under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be allowed to credit their city license fee against their county license fee in
accordance with KRS 68.197.
(5) Wage assessments may be imposed upon salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation earned by
persons within the district for work done and services performed, rendered, or conducted within the district.
Any wage assessments imposed within the district shall expire and no longer be imposed upon the earlier
of:
(a) Twenty (20) years after the date of imposition;
(b) The date bonds for the district supported by the wage assessments are retired; or
(c) All financial assistance received from the Commonwealth for infrastructure are repaid[
(f) An occupational license fee imposed under this subsection shall expire twenty (20) years after the year of
imposition. After the occupational license fee has expired, an additional occupational license fee shall not be
imposed under this subsection.
(5) (a) A board shall be established to control and manage the affairs of the district.
(b) The board shall:
1. Represent a multicounty region;
2. Comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 65A;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

46 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Agree, in writing, to the use or distribution of the revenue generated from a special ad valorem tax levied
under subsection (3) of this section;
4. Agree, in writing, to the collection and distribution of the revenue generated from an occupational license fee
imposed under subsection (4) of this section;
5. Operate in accordance with the following:
a. The board membership shall consist of at least one (1) trustee from each local government that is a party to the
interlocal agreement;
b. The trustees shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years;
c. The chair of the board shall be elected by the trustees from among its membership;
d. The board may appoint a secretary, an executive director, and other officials and employees who need not be
members of the board;
e. A quorum for the transacting of the business of the board shall consist of a majority of its membership;
f. A trustee of the board may be removed as provided by KRS 65.007; and
g. Vacancies of the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments; and
6. Provide an annual report by August 1 of each year to the Department for Local Government containing:
a. A description of the regional economic development project, including the location, specific boundaries, and
the total number of acres;
b. A description of each business located in the district;
c. The total number of jobs created by the regional economic development project;
d. The total number of people employed within the boundaries of the district;
e. The name of each local government that is a party to the interlocal agreement;
f. The total amount of money contributed by each local government for the regional economic development
project and a description of how the money was used;
g. The rate of a special ad valorem tax levied under this section, the total revenues collected from the tax for each
year, and a breakdown of how the revenues were used; and
h. The rate of an occupational license fee imposed under this section, the total revenues collected from the fee for
each year, and a breakdown of how the revenues were used.
(6) No later than October 1 of each year, the Department for Local Government shall compile the information
reported under subsection (5)(b)6. of this section and report the compiled information to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue].
SECTION 29. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A board shall be established to control and manage the affairs of the district. The board shall:
(a) Represent a multicounty region;
(b) Comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 65A;
(c) Agree, in writing, to the use or distribution of the revenue generated from a special ad valorem tax
levied under Section 28 of this Act;
(d) Agree, in writing, to the collection and distribution of the revenue generated from an occupational
license fee imposed under Section 28 of this Act; and
(e) Operate in accordance with the following:
1. The board membership shall consist of at least one (1) trustee from each local government
that is a party to the interlocal agreement;
2. The trustees shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years;
3. The chair of the board shall be elected by the trustees from among its membership;

CHAPTER 161 47
4. The board may appoint a secretary, an executive director, and other officials and employees
who need not be members of the board;
5. A quorum for the transacting of the business of the board shall consist of a majority of its
membership;
6. A trustee of the board may be removed as provided by KRS 65.007; and
7. Vacancies of the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.
(2) No later than October 1 of each year, the Department for Local Government shall compile the information
received by the board pursuant to KRS Chapter 65A and report it to the Legislative Research Commission
for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
SECTION 30. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Before the execution of an interlocal agreement to create a district, all local governments with
territory wholly or partially within the boundaries of the multicounty region shall be provided written
notice of the intent to create the district by the governing body of the local governments seeking to
create the district.
(b) The written notice shall:
1. Be delivered no less than thirty (30) days prior to the execution of the agreement to the chief
executive officer of each local government with territory wholly or partially within the
boundaries of the multicounty region, by certified mail or official electronic delivery;
2. Identify the proposed participating entities;
3. Describe the proposed boundaries of the district;
4. Include a summary of the anticipated tax structure; and
5. Specify the infrastructure development projects that will be supported by the revenues
generated from the tax structure.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a city shall not be required to participate in a
district unless the city has adopted an ordinance or resolution authorizing participation.
(b) A district shall not include any portion of a city located within its geographic boundaries that has not
consented to participation under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Sections 27 to 30 of this Act shall not be construed to limit a city’s authority to levy and collect an
occupational license tax under KRS 91.200 or 91.280 unless the city has voluntarily joined a district
and agreed to the imposition of an occupational tax by the district under subsection (3) of Section 28
of this Act.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 81A.534(1), a district created pursuant to Sections 27 to 30 of this Act that is
wholly located within unincorporated territory of one (1) or more counties and meets the
requirements of KRS 81A.534(2) shall qualify automatically as a county industrial district under the
provisions of KRS 81A.532 to 81A.536 upon the enactment of a single, final ordinance designating
the district as a county industrial district by the fiscal court of any county or counties in which the
district is physically located. Except for the county or counties in which the district is physically
located that enact an ordinance designating the county industrial district, any county industrial
district created in the manner authorized by this paragraph shall not be deemed to constitute a
county industrial district under KRS 81A.534(4) for any other counties participating in the district.
Section 31. KRS 143A.030 is amended to read as follows:
The taxes imposed in KRS 143A.020 do not apply to [fluorspar, ]lead, zinc, and barite severed for any purposes or to
rock, limestone, or gravel used for privately maintained but publicly dedicated roads or limestone when sold or used
by the taxpayer for agricultural purposes so as to qualify for exemption from sales and use taxes as provided in KRS
139.480.
Section 32. KRS 143A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

48 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(2) "Natural resource" means all forms of minerals, including but not limited to rock, stone, limestone, shale,
gravel, sand, clay, fluorspar, natural gas, and natural gas liquids, which are contained in or on the soils or
waters of this state. For purposes of this chapter, "natural resource" does not include coal and oil which are
taxed under KRS 143.020 and 137.120;
(3) "Severing" or "severed" means the physical removal of the natural resource from the earth or waters of this
state by any means; however, "severing" or "severed" shall not include the removal of natural gas from
underground storage facilities into which the natural gas has been mechanically injected following its initial
removal from the earth;
(4) (a) "Taxpayer" means and includes any individual, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation,
receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, or representative of any kind engaged in
the business of severing and/or processing natural resources in this state for sale or use. In instances
where contracts, either oral or written, are entered into whereby persons, organizations, or businesses
are engaged in the business of severing and/or processing a natural resource but do not obtain title to or
do not have an economic interest therein, the party who owns the natural resource or has an economic
interest is the taxpayer.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, a taxpayer possesses an economic interest in a natural resource where the
taxpayer has acquired by investment any interest in a natural resource and secures, by any form of legal
relationship, income derived from the severance or processing of the natural resource, to which the
taxpayer[he] must look for a return of the taxpayer's[his ] capital. A party who has no capital
investment in the natural resource or who only receives an arm's length royalty shall not be considered
as having an economic interest;
(5) "Gross value" is defined as follows:
(a) For natural resources severed and/or processed and sold during a reporting period, gross value is the
amount received or receivable by the taxpayer;
(b) For natural resources severed and/or processed, but not sold during a reporting period, gross value shall
be determined as follows:
1. If the natural resource is to be sold under the terms of an existing contract, the contract price
shall be used in computing gross value; and
2. If there is no existing contract, the fair market value for that grade and quality of the natural
resource shall be used in computing gross value;
(c) In a transaction involving related parties, gross value shall not be less than the fair market value for
natural resources of similar grade and quality;
(d) In the absence of a sale, gross value shall be the fair market value for natural resources of similar grade
and quality;
(e) If severed natural resources are purchased for the purpose of processing and resale, the gross value is
the amount received or receivable during the reporting period reduced by the amount paid or payable to
the taxpayer actually severing the natural resource;
(f) If severed natural resources are purchased for the purpose of processing and consumption, the gross
value is the fair market value of processed natural resources of similar grade and quality reduced by the
amount paid or payable to the taxpayer actually severing the natural resource;
(g) In all instances, the gross value shall not be reduced by any taxes including the tax levied in KRS
143A.020, royalties, sales commissions, or any other expense; and
(h) In all instances, transportation expense incurred in transporting a natural resource shall not be
considered as gross income from the property;
(6) "Processing" includes but is not limited to breaking, crushing, cleaning, drying, sizing, or loading or unloading
for any purpose. "Processing" shall not include the act of unloading or loading for shipment natural resources
that have not been severed, cleaned, broken, crushed, dried, sized or otherwise treated in Kentucky;
(7) "Related parties" means two (2) or more persons, organizations, or businesses owned or controlled directly or
indirectly by the same interests; and

CHAPTER 161 49
(8) (a) "Transportation expense" means:
1. The amount paid by a taxpayer to a third party for transporting natural resources; and
2. The expenses incurred by a taxpayer using the taxpayer's[his] own facilities in transporting
natural resources from the point of extraction to a processing plant, tipple, or loading dock.
(b) "Transportation expense" shall not include:
1. The cost of acquisition, improvements, and maintenance of real property;
2. The cost of acquisition and operating expenses of mining and nonmining loading or unloading
facilities; or
3. The cost of acquisition and operating expenses of equipment used to load or unload the natural
resource at the point of extraction, processing facility, or mining and nonmining loading facility.
Section 33. KRS 140.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Revenue shall have full supervision of the collection of all taxes due under the provisions
of this chapter, including the power to institute suit in this and other states. It may employ attorneys and other
persons necessary to carry out the full intent and purpose of this chapter. The department shall furnish, upon
application, blank forms covering information as may be necessary to determine the amount of tax due the
state on the transfer of all property subject to tax.
(2) The department may cause personal representatives or beneficiaries to file all statements required by this
chapter with the clerks of the proper courts and with the department, and may require them to furnish any
additional information deemed necessary to support the computation of the amount of tax that should be paid
by the estate. The personal representative, or the beneficiaries in the absence of a personal representative, shall
compute the taxes imposed by this chapter on the tax return provided by the department when:
(a) 1. A United States estate tax return is required to be filed under federal law and applicable
regulations; and
2. The estate includes property over which Kentucky has jurisdiction for purposes of the taxes
imposed by this chapter; or
(b) Any assets from the estate subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter pass to a beneficiary taxable
under KRS 140.070.
(3) (a) For deaths prior to July 1, 2026, the tax return, when required, shall be filed with the department
within eighteen (18) months after the death of the decedent or at the time payment of the tax is made
pursuant to KRS 140.210.
(b) For deaths on or after July 1, 2026, the tax return, when required, shall be filed with the department
within twenty-four (24) months after the death of the decedent or at the time payment of the tax is
made pursuant to Section 34 of this Act.
(4)[(3)] Except as herein provided, no action to enforce the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter shall be
commenced more than ten (10) years after the cause of action first accrued. In case the settlement of an estate
is delayed because of litigation or other unavoidable cause, the delay shall suspend the limitation, prescribed
by this subsection, until the cause of delay is removed. In the case of a fraudulent return or any other
fraudulent representation affecting the amount of or the liability for the tax imposed by this chapter
notwithstanding any provision of limitation provided elsewhere, the tax due by reason thereof may at any time
be assessed and collected by the methods set out in this chapter, including action in a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Section 34. KRS 140.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For deaths prior to July 1, 2026, all taxes imposed by this chapter, unless otherwise provided in this
chapter, shall be due at the death of the decedent and shall be payable to the Department of Revenue
within eighteen (18) months thereafter. If they are paid within nine (9) months, a discount of five
percent (5%) shall be allowed, and if they are paid within eighteen (18) months, no interest shall be
charged and collected thereon. If the taxes due are not paid within eighteen (18) months, interest at the
tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010[(6)] shall be paid from the expiration of the eighteen (18)
months until payment is actually made to the department.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

50 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) For deaths on or after July 1, 2026, all taxes imposed by this chapter, unless otherwise provided in
this chapter, shall be due at the death of the decedent and shall be payable to the Department of
Revenue within twenty-four (24) months thereafter. If they are paid within fourteen (14) months, a
discount of five percent (5%) shall be allowed, and if they are paid within twenty-four (24) months,
no interest shall be charged and collected thereon. If the taxes due are not paid within twenty-four
(24) months, interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010 shall be paid from the
expiration of the twenty-four (24) months until payment is actually made to the department.
(2) In all cases where the personal representatives or trustees do not pay the taxes by the applicable eighteen (18)
month or twenty-four (24) month deadline established in subsection (1) of this section[within eighteen (18)
months from the death of the decedent], they shall be required to give bond, in the form and to the effect
prescribed by the department, for the payment of the taxes and interest.
Section 35. KRS 140.222 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When the net tax due from a beneficiary's distributive share exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the
beneficiary may elect to pay the inheritance tax in ten (10) equal installments. The first installment shall be
due at the time the return is filed with succeeding payments due in annual installments beginning one (1) year
after the return is filed.
(2) (a) For deaths prior to July 1, 2026, the portion of the tax deferred under this section shall be charged with
interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010[(6)] commencing eighteen (18) months after
the date of death.
(b) For deaths on or after July 1, 2026, the portion of the tax deferred under this section shall be
charged with interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010 commencing twenty-four (24)
months after the date of death.
(3) When the beneficiary elects to pay the tax on the beneficiary's[his] share as provided in this section, such
election must be made in writing and signed by the beneficiary and must be filed with the Department of
Revenue at the time of filing the tax return for the decedent's estate under KRS 140.160(3)[(2)]. The filing of
the election together with payment of the first installment shall relieve the personal representative or trustee of
the estate from further liability for the tax payments deferred under this section and the bond requirements of
KRS 140.210, subject to the final approval by the Department of Revenue of all other taxes due under this
chapter.
(4) A beneficiary electing to defer the payment of taxes under this section shall be personally liable for the amount
of deferred taxes until paid.
(5) The period of limitations for actions to enforce the collection of taxes imposed by this chapter as provided by
KRS 140.160(4)[(3)] shall be suspended for the period of time for deferred payment granted by this section.
Section 36. KRS 134.490 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Within fifty (50) days after the delivery of a certificate of delinquency by the clerk to a third-party
purchaser, the third-party purchaser shall send a notice to the delinquent taxpayer informing the
delinquent taxpayer that the certificate of delinquency has been purchased by the third-party purchaser.
(b) The third-party purchaser shall send this notice once every six (6) months[At least annually
thereafter,] until the notice required by subsection (2) of this section is sent[, the third-party purchaser
shall send a notice to the delinquent taxpayer].
(c) The notices included in this subsection shall be sent by certified mail with proof of mailing and include
the information required by subsection (3)(d) of this section. A copy of each notice shall be sent to each
mortgagee who holds a mortgage on the property that is the subject of the certificate of delinquency.
(2) Anytime after the expiration of the one (1) year tolling period established by KRS 134.546, the third-party
purchaser may institute an action to collect the amount due on a certificate of delinquency. At least forty-five
(45) days before instituting a legal action, the third-party purchaser shall send a notice to the taxpayer and a
copy of the notice to each mortgagee who holds a mortgage on the property by certified mail with proof of
mailing. The notice shall:
(a) Inform the taxpayer that enforcement action will be taken;

CHAPTER 161 51
(b) Include a statement advising the taxpayer that substantial additional administrative costs and fees
associated with collection in addition to the amount due on the certificate of delinquency may be
imposed and that collection actions may include foreclosure; and
(c) Include the information required by subsection (3) of this section.
The notice shall be in addition to any notice sent under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) (a) 1. For certificates of delinquency for all property except property described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, third-party purchasers or their designees shall obtain from the office of the property
valuation administrator of the county in which the real property is located the most recent
address for the property owner.
2. To obtain information from the office of the property valuation administrator, the third-party
purchaser shall, at the option of the property valuation administrator, either:
a. Obtain information from an up-to-date public access list or website[Web site] offered by
the property valuation administrator; or
b. Submit a list of addresses, map identification numbers, or parcel numbers for which
updated information is requested to the property valuation administrator, who shall update
his or her records with regard to the properties for which information is requested and
provide the updated information to the third-party purchaser within ten (10) days.
3. For this service, the property valuation administrator may charge a fee not to exceed two dollars
($2) for each address provided or obtained.
4. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the third-party purchaser shall send the
notices required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the address provided by the property
valuation administrator. Unless the provisions of subparagraph 7. of this paragraph apply, the
third-party purchaser shall not be required to send a notice to any party other than the owner of
record as provided by the property valuation administrator at the time the notice is sent and the
mortgagee as required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
5. If, due to insufficient staffing, the property valuation administrator is unable to provide the
requested information to the third-party purchaser within ten (10) days of submission, the
property valuation administrator shall immediately notify the third-party purchaser, and the third-
party purchaser may send the notices required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the
address reflected in the public records of the property valuation administrator.
6. Any notices sent pursuant to information obtained under this paragraph that are returned as
undeliverable shall be re-sent by certified mail with proof of mailing addressed to the
"Occupant" at the address of the property that is the subject of the certificate of delinquency.
These notices shall be sent within twenty (20) days of receipt of the returned notice.
7. If a third-party purchaser becomes aware of a more recent or more accurate address for a
delinquent taxpayer that is different from the address reflected in the records of the property
valuation administrator, the third-party purchaser shall send notices to the updated address in the
manner required by this subsection, and shall notify the property valuation administrator of the
updated address.
8. If a third-party purchaser receives an address from the property valuation administrator during an
address check after a first notice is sent and returned as undeliverable, and the address is the
same as was originally provided, the third-party purchaser shall send the notice addressed to
"Occupant" at the address of the property that is the subject of the certificate of delinquency in
the manner required by this subsection.
(b) 1. For certificates of delinquency relating to unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, or any other mineral
or energy resources assessed separately from the surface real property pursuant to KRS 132.820,
third-party purchasers or their designees shall obtain from the department the most recent address
for the property owner.
2. To obtain information about a particular property, the third-party purchaser shall submit to the
department a list of addresses, map identification numbers, parcel numbers, and any other
information the department may require. The department shall:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

52 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Update its records with regard to the properties for which information is requested; and
b. Provide the updated information to the third-party purchaser within ten (10) business
days.
3. For this service, the department may charge a fee not to exceed two dollars ($2) for each address
provided.
4. The third-party purchaser shall send the notices required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section relating to unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, or any other mineral or energy resources
assessed separately from the surface real property pursuant to KRS 132.820 to the address
provided by the department. Unless the provisions of subparagraph 5.f. of this paragraph apply,
the third-party purchaser shall not be required to send a notice to any party other than the owner
of record as provided by the department at the time the notice is sent and the mortgagee as
required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
5. a. Any notice sent pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section based on information
obtained pursuant to this paragraph and returned as undeliverable shall be submitted to the
department within ten (10) days of receipt of the returned notice.
b. The department shall attempt to obtain an updated address for the owner of the property
subject to the certificate of delinquency from the individual or entity filing the property
tax return for the property.
c. The individual or entity filing the property tax return shall provide an address of the
property owner upon request of the department.
d. The department shall provide any updated address information to the third-party
purchaser.
e. If updated information is provided, the notices shall be re-sent by certified mail with proof
of mailing to the updated address of the owner within ten (10) days of the receipt of the
updated information from the department.
f. If a third-party purchaser becomes aware of a more recent or more accurate address for a
delinquent taxpayer that is different from the address reflected in the records of the
department, the third-party purchaser shall send notices to the updated address in the
manner required by this subsection, and shall notify the department of the updated
address.
(c) The third-party purchaser shall maintain complete and accurate records of all notices sent pursuant to
this section.
(d) The notices required by this section shall include the following information:
1. A statement that the certificate of delinquency is a lien of record against the property for which
delinquent taxes are owed;
2. A statement that the certificate bears interest at the rate provided in KRS 134.125;
3. A statement that if the certificate is not paid, it will be subject to collection as provided by law,
and that collection actions may include foreclosure. The notice required by subsection (2) of this
section shall also include a statement of the intent to institute legal action to collect the amount
due;
4. A complete listing of the amount due, as of the date of the notice, broken down as follows:
a. The purchase price of the certificate of delinquency;
b. Interest accrued subsequent to the purchase of the certificate of delinquency; and
c. Fees imposed by the third-party purchaser;
5. If the third-party purchaser is required to register with the department as provided in KRS
134.128(3), for certificates of delinquency purchased after June 1, 2012, a statement informing
the taxpayer that upon written request and the payment of a processing fee, the third-party
purchaser will offer a payment plan; and

CHAPTER 161 53
6. Information, in a format and with content as determined by the department, detailing the
provisions of the law relating to third-party purchaser fees and charges.
(e) In addition, the notice shall provide the following information to the taxpayer:
1. The legal name of the third-party purchaser;
2. The third-party purchaser's physical address;
3. The third-party purchaser's mailing address for payments, if different from the physical address;
and
4. The third-party purchaser's telephone number.
If the information required by this paragraph changes, the third-party purchaser shall, within thirty (30)
days of the change becoming effective, send a notice to each taxpayer by certified mail with proof of
mailing with the corrected information. The third-party purchaser shall also update contact information
included in the records of the county clerk within ten (10) days of the change becoming effective.
Failure to send the original notice or any correction notices shall result in the suspension of the accrual
of all interest and any fees incurred by the third-party purchaser after that date until proper notice is
given as required by this subsection.
(4) If a person entitled to pay a certificate of delinquency to a third-party purchaser makes payment on the
certificate of delinquency to the county clerk under the conditions described in KRS 134.127(3)(d), the
payment shall constitute payment in full, and no other amounts may be collected by the third-party purchaser
from the person.
(5) (a) For certificates of delinquency purchased after June 1, 2012, at the written request of a delinquent
taxpayer, a third-party purchaser required to register with the department as provided in KRS
134.128(3) shall provide a monthly installment payment plan to a taxpayer.
(b) The taxpayer and third-party purchaser shall sign an agreement detailing the terms of the installment
payment plan.
(c) The third-party purchaser may impose a processing fee, not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per month to
offset the administrative cost of providing the payment plan. No other fees, charges, interest, or other
amounts not expressly authorized by this chapter shall be charged, assessed, or collected by the third-
party purchaser.
(d) The existence of an agreement to provide a payment plan shall not impact the right of the third-party
purchaser to pursue legal action if the delinquent taxpayer fails to follow the terms of the installment
payment agreement.
(e) Upon default of a delinquent taxpayer:
1. The third-party purchaser shall retain all amounts paid, which shall be applied to the outstanding
balance due; and
2. The third-party purchaser shall not be required to offer the delinquent taxpayer another
opportunity for an installment payment plan.
(f) If a third-party purchaser who was required to offer payment plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection, subsequently does not purchase a sufficient number of certificates of delinquency to require
registration with the department, the third-party purchaser shall continue to offer payment plans under
the conditions established by this subsection for all delinquent taxpayers whose certificates of
delinquency were purchased during a period in which the third-party purchaser was required to register
with the department.
(g) A third-party purchaser who is not required to register with the department as provided in KRS
134.128(3), or who holds certificates of delinquency purchased prior to June 1, 2012, may voluntarily
offer installment payment plans to delinquent taxpayers in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection.
(h) The department may establish additional terms and conditions for installment payment plans in an
administrative regulation.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

54 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) Any person to whom a third-party purchaser transfers or assigns a certificate of delinquency shall
be considered a third-party purchaser under this chapter.
Section 37. KRS 138.130 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 138.130 to 138.205:
(1) [(a) ]"Chewing tobacco":
(a) Means any leaf tobacco that is not intended to be smoked;[ and ]
(b) Includes loose leaf chewing tobacco, plug chewing tobacco, and twist chewing tobacco; and[.
(b) "Chewing tobacco"]
(c) Does not include snuff;
(2) "Cigarettes" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco, or any substitute for tobacco,
irrespective of size or shape and whether or not the tobacco is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other
ingredient, the wrapper or cover of which is made of paper or any other substance or material, except tobacco;
(3) "Cigarette tax" means the group of taxes consisting of:
(a) The tax imposed by KRS 138.140(1)(a);
(b) The surtax imposed by KRS 138.140(1)(b); and
(c) The surtax imposed by KRS 138.140(1)(c);
(4) [(a) ]"Closed vapor cartridge":
(a) Means a pre-filled disposable cartridge that:
1. Is intended to be used with or in a noncombustible product that employs a heating element,
battery, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means,
regardless of shape or size, to deliver vaporized or aerosolized nicotine, non-nicotine substances,
or other materials to users that may be inhaling from the product, including but not limited to[
such as] any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other
similar product or device and every variation thereof, regardless of whether marketed as one of
these products[such]; and
2. Contains nicotine or non-nicotine substances or other material consumed during the process of
vaporization or aerosolization; and[.]
(b) ["Closed vapor cartridge" ]Does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United
States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(5) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(6) "Distributor" means any person located:
(a) In this state or outside[within] this state in possession of tobacco products or vapor products for resale
within this state; or
(b) Outside this state selling tobacco products or vapor products to consumers in this state;
on which the tobacco products tax imposed under KRS 138.140(2) has not been paid;
(7) "Half-pound unit" means a consumer-sized container, pouch, or package:
(a) Containing at least four (4) ounces but not more than eight (8) ounces of chewing tobacco by net
weight;
(b) Produced by the manufacturer to be sold to consumers as a half-pound unit and not produced to be
divided or sold separately; and
(c) Containing one (1) individual container, pouch, or package;
(8) "Manufacturer" means any person who manufactures or produces cigarettes or tobacco products within or
without this state;

CHAPTER 161 55
(9) "Nonresident wholesaler" means any person who purchases cigarettes directly from the manufacturer and
maintains a permanent location outside this state where Kentucky cigarette tax evidence is attached or from
where Kentucky cigarette tax is reported and paid;
(10) [(a) ]"Open vaping system":
(a) Means:
1. Any noncombustible product that employs a heating element, battery, power source, electronic
circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size[ and
including the component parts and accessories thereto], that uses a refillable liquid solution to
deliver vaporized or aerosolized nicotine, non-nicotine substances, or other materials to users
that may be inhaling from the product; and
2. Any liquid solution that is intended to be used with the product described in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph;
(b) Includes:[ such as]
1. Any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product
or device and every variation thereof, regardless of whether marketed as one of those
products[such]; and
2. Any component parts to or accessories for a product described in paragraph (a)1. of this
subsection; and[liquid solution that is intended to be used with the product described in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.]
(c)[(b)] ["Open vaping system"] Does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the
United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(11) "Person" means:
(a) Any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association, municipal corporation, or private
corporation, whether organized for profit or not;[,]
(b) The Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions; and[,]
(c) An estate, trust, or any other group or combination acting as a unit;
(12) "Pound unit" means a consumer-sized container, pouch, or package:
(a) Containing more than eight (8) ounces but not more than sixteen (16) ounces of chewing tobacco by net
weight;
(b) Produced by the manufacturer to be sold to consumers as a pound unit and not produced to be divided
or sold separately; and
(c) Containing one (1) individual container, pouch, or package;
(13) "Premium cigar" means a cigar that:
(a) Is wrapped in whole leaf tobacco;
(b) Contains one hundred percent (100%) leaf tobacco binder;
(c) Is made manually combining the wrapper, filler, and binder;
(d) Has no filter, tip, or nontobacco mouthpiece and is capped by hand; and
(e) Weighs more than six (6) pounds per one thousand (1,000) units;
(14) "Reference products" means tobacco products, vapor products, or cigarettes made by a manufacturer
specifically for an accredited state college or university to be held by the college or university until sale or
transfer to a laboratory, hospital, medical center, institute, college or university, manufacturer, or other
institution;
(15)[(14)] "Resident wholesaler" means any person who purchases at least seventy-five percent (75%) of all
cigarettes purchased by the wholesaler directly from the manufacturer on which the cigarette tax is unpaid, and
who maintains an established place of business in this state where the wholesaler attaches cigarette tax
evidence or receives untax-paid cigarettes;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

56 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(16)[(15)] "Retail distributor" means a retailer who has obtained a retail distributor's license under KRS 138.195;
(17)[(16)] "Retailer" means any person who sells to a consumer or to any person for any purpose other than resale;
(18)[(17)] "Sale" or "sell" means any transfer for a consideration, exchange, barter, gift, offer for sale, advertising
for sale, soliciting an order for cigarettes [or ]tobacco products, or vapor products, and distribution in any
manner or by any means whatsoever;
(19)[(18)] "Sale at retail" means a sale to any person for any other purpose other than resale;
(20)[(19)] "Single unit" means a consumer-sized container, pouch, or package:
(a) Containing less than four (4) ounces of chewing tobacco by net weight;
(b) Produced by the manufacturer to be sold to consumers as a single unit and not produced to be divided or
sold separately; and
(c) Containing one (1) individual container, pouch, or package;
(21)[(20) (a)] "Snuff":
(a) Means tobacco that:
1. Is finely cut, ground, or powdered; and
2. Is not for smoking; and[.]
(b) ["Snuff" ]Includes snus;
(22)[(21)] "Subjobber"["Sub-jobber"] means any person who purchases cigarettes from a resident wholesaler,
nonresident wholesaler, or unclassified acquirer licensed under KRS 138.195 on which the cigarette tax has
been paid and makes them available to retailers for resale. A[No] person shall not make cigarettes available to
retailers for resale unless the person certifies and establishes to the satisfaction of the department that firm
arrangements have been made to regularly supply at least five (5) retail locations with Kentucky tax-paid
cigarettes for resale in the regular course of business;
(23)[(22)] "Tax evidence" means any stamps, metered impressions, or other indicia prescribed by the department
within an[by] administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as a means of
denoting the payment of cigarette taxes;
(24)[(23)] "Tobacco products" means any smokeless tobacco products, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, and
any kind or form of tobacco prepared in a manner suitable for chewing or smoking, or both, or any kind or
form of tobacco that is suitable to be placed in an individual's oral cavity, except cigarettes;
(25)[(24)] "Tobacco products tax" means the tax imposed by KRS 138.140(2)(a)1. to 4.[3.];
(26)[(25)] "Transporter" means any person transporting untax-paid cigarettes obtained from any source to any
destination within this state, other than cigarettes transported by the manufacturer thereof;
(27)[(26)] "Unclassified acquirer" means any person in this state who acquires cigarettes from any source on
which the cigarette tax has not been paid, and who is not a person otherwise required to be licensed under KRS
138.195;
(28)[(27)] "Untax-paid cigarettes" means any cigarettes on which the cigarette tax imposed by KRS 138.140 has
not been paid;
(29)[(28)] "Untax-paid tobacco or vapor products" means any tobacco products or vapor products on which the tax
imposed by KRS 138.140(2) has not been paid;
(30)[(29)] "Vapor products" means a closed vapor cartridge or an open vaping system;
(31)[(30)] "Vapor products tax" means tax imposed under KRS 138.140(2)(a)[4. and ]5. and 6.; and
(32)[(31)] "Vending machine operator" means any person that[who] operates one (1) or more vending machines
containing cigarettes, tobacco products, vapor products, or a combination thereof[cigarette vending
machines].
Section 38. KRS 138.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A tax shall be paid on the sale of cigarettes within the state at a proportionate rate of three cents ($0.03)
on each twenty (20) cigarettes.

CHAPTER 161 57
(b) Effective July 1, 2018, a surtax shall be paid in addition to the tax levied in paragraph (a) of this
subsection at a proportionate rate of one dollar and six cents ($1.06) on each twenty (20) cigarettes.
(c) A surtax shall be paid in addition to the tax levied in paragraph (a) of this subsection and in addition to
the surtax levied by paragraph (b) of this subsection, at a proportionate rate of one cent ($0.01) on each
twenty (20) cigarettes. The revenues from this surtax shall be deposited in the cancer research
institutions matching fund created in KRS 164.043.
(d) The surtaxes imposed by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall be paid at the time that the tax
imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection is paid.
(2) (a) An excise tax is hereby imposed upon every distributor for the privilege of selling tobacco products in
this state at the following rates:
1. Upon snuff at the rate of nineteen cents ($0.19) per each one and one-half (1-1/2) ounces or
portion thereof by net weight sold;
2. Upon chewing tobacco at the rate of:
a. Nineteen cents ($0.19) per each single unit sold;
b. Forty cents ($0.40) per each half-pound unit sold; or
c. Sixty-five cents ($0.65) per each pound unit sold.
If the container, pouch, or package on which the tax is levied contains more than sixteen (16)
ounces by net weight, the rate that shall be applied to the unit shall equal the sum of sixty-five
cents ($0.65) plus nineteen cents ($0.19) for each increment of four (4) ounces or portion thereof
exceeding sixteen (16) ounces sold;
3. Beginning July 1, 2026, upon premium cigars sold, at the rate of six percent (6%) of the actual
price for which the distributor sells premium cigars;
4. a. Prior to July 1, 2026, upon tobacco products sold, at the rate of fifteen percent (15%) of
the actual price for which the distributor sells tobacco products, except snuff and chewing
tobacco, within the Commonwealth; and
b. On or after July 1, 2026, upon tobacco products sold, at the rate of fifteen percent
(15%) of the actual price for which the distributor sells tobacco products, except snuff,
chewing tobacco, and premium cigars, within the Commonwealth;
5.[4.] Upon closed vapor cartridges, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per cartridge; and
6.[5.] Upon open vaping systems, fifteen percent (15%) of the actual price for which the distributor
sells:
a. The open vaping system when the actual price includes the items described in both KRS
138.130(10)(a)1. and 2.; or
b. The liquid solution described in KRS 138.130(10)(a)2. when the solution is sold
separately.
(b) The net weight posted by the manufacturer on the container, pouch, or package or on the manufacturer's
invoice shall be used to calculate the tax due on snuff or chewing tobacco.
(c) 1. A retailer located in this state shall not purchase tobacco products for resale to consumers from
any person within or outside this state unless that person is a distributor licensed under KRS
138.195(7)(a) or the retailer applies for and is granted a retail distributor's license under KRS
138.195(7)(b) for the privilege of purchasing untax-paid tobacco products and remitting the tax
as provided in this paragraph.
2. A licensed retail distributor of tobacco products shall be subject to the excise tax as follows:
a. On purchases of untax-paid snuff, at the same rate levied by paragraph (a)1. of this
subsection;
b. On purchases of untax-paid chewing tobacco, at the same rates levied by paragraph (a)2.
of this subsection;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

58 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
c. On purchases of untax-paid premium cigars, at the same rate levied by paragraph (a)3.
of this subsection;
d. On purchases of untax-paid tobacco products, except snuff, premium cigars, and chewing
tobacco, fifteen percent (15%) of the total purchase price as invoiced by the retail
distributor's supplier;
e.[d.] On purchases of untax-paid closed vapor cartridges, at the same rate levied by paragraph
(a)5.[4.] of this subsection; and
f.[e.] On purchases of untax-paid open vaping systems, fifteen percent (15%) of the total
purchase price as invoiced by the retail distributor's supplier as described in paragraph
(a)6.[5.] of this subsection.
(d) 1. The licensed distributor that first possesses tobacco products or vapor products for sale to a
retailer in this state or for sale to a person who is not licensed under KRS 138.195(7) shall be the
distributor liable for the tax imposed by this subsection except as provided in subparagraph 2. of
this paragraph.
2. A distributor licensed under KRS 138.195(7)(a) may sell tobacco products or vapor products to
another distributor licensed under KRS 138.195(7)(a) without payment of the excise tax. In such
case, the purchasing licensed distributor shall be the distributor liable for the tax.
3. A licensed distributor or licensed retail distributor shall:
a. Identify and display the distributor's or retail distributor's license number on the invoice to
the retailer; and
b. Identify and display the excise tax separately on the invoice to the retailer. If the excise
tax is included as part of the product's sales price, the licensed distributor or licensed retail
distributor shall list the total excise tax in summary form by tax type with invoice totals.
4. It shall be presumed that the excise tax has not been paid if the licensed distributor or licensed
retail distributor does not comply with subparagraph 3. of this paragraph.
(e) A[No] tax shall not be imposed on tobacco products or vapor products under this subsection that are
outside[not within] the taxing power of this state under the Commerce Clause of the United States
Constitution.
(3) (a) The taxes imposed by subsections (1) and (2) of this section:
1. Shall not apply to reference products; and
2. Shall be paid only once, regardless of the number of times the cigarettes or tobacco products may
be sold.
(b) The taxes imposed by subsection (1)(a) and (b) and subsection (2) of this section shall be reduced by:
1. Fifty percent (50%) on any product as to which a modified risk tobacco product order is issued
under 21 U.S.C. sec. 387k(g)(1); or
2. Twenty-five percent (25%) for any product as to which a modified risk tobacco product order is
issued under 21 U.S.C. sec. 387k(g)(2).
(4) A reference product shall carry a marking labeling the contents as a research cigarette, research vapor product,
or a research tobacco product to be used only for tobacco-health research and experimental purposes and shall
not be offered for sale, sold, or distributed to consumers.
(5) The department may prescribe forms and promulgate administrative regulations to execute and administer the
provisions of this section.
(6) The General Assembly recognizes that increasing taxes on tobacco products should reduce consumption, and
therefore result in healthier lifestyles for Kentuckians. The relative taxes on tobacco products proposed in this
section reflect the growing data from scientific studies suggesting that although smokeless tobacco poses some
risks, those health risks are significantly less than the risks posed by other forms of tobacco products.
Moreover, the General Assembly acknowledges that some in the public health community recognize that
tobacco harm reduction should be a complementary public health strategy regarding tobacco products. Taxing
tobacco products according to relative risk is a rational tax policy and may well serve the public health goal of

CHAPTER 161 59
reducing smoking-related mortality and morbidity and lowering health care costs associated with tobacco-
related disease.
(7) Any person subject to the taxes imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section that:
(a) Files an application related to a modified risk tobacco product shall report to the department that an
application has been filed within thirty (30) days of that filing; and
(b) Receives an order authorizing the marketing of a modified risk tobacco product shall report to the
department that an authorizing order has been received.
(8) Upon receipt of the information required by subsection (7)(b) of this section, the department shall reduce the
tax imposed on the modified risk tobacco product as required by subsection (3)(b) of this section on the first
day of the calendar month following the expiration of forty-five (45) days following receipt of the information
required by subsection (7)(b) of this section.
Section 39. KRS 138.143 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every retailer, subjobber[sub-jobber], resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, and unclassified acquirer
shall:
(a) Take a physical inventory of all cigarettes in packages bearing Kentucky tax stamps, and all unaffixed
Kentucky cigarette tax stamps possessed by them or in their control at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 2018.
Inventory of cigarettes in vending machines may be accomplished by:
1. Taking an actual physical inventory;
2. Estimating the cigarettes in vending machines by reporting one-half (1/2) of the normal fill
capacity of the machines, as reflected in individual inventory records maintained for vending
machines; or
3. Using a combination of the methods prescribed in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph;
(b) File a return with the department on or before July 10, 2018, showing the entire wholesale and retail
inventories of cigarettes in packages bearing Kentucky tax stamps, and all unaffixed Kentucky cigarette
tax stamps possessed by them or in their control at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 2018; and
(c) Pay a floor stock tax at a proportionate rate equal to fifty cents ($0.50) on each twenty (20) cigarettes in
packages bearing a Kentucky tax stamp and unaffixed Kentucky tax stamps in their possession or
control at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 2018.
(2) Every retailer and subjobber[ sub-jobber] shall:
(a) 1. Take a physical inventory of all units of snuff possessed by them or in their control at 11:59 p.m.
on March 31, 2009;
2. File a return with the department on or before April 10, 2009, showing the entire inventory of
snuff possessed by them or in their control at 11:59 p.m. on March 31, 2009; and
3. Pay a floor stock tax at a proportionate rate equal to nine and one-half cents ($0.095) on each
unit of snuff in their possession or control at 11:59 p.m. on March 31, 2009; and
(b) 1. a. Take a physical inventory of all other tobacco products possessed by them or in their
control at 11:59 p.m. on March 31, 2009;
b. File a return with the department on or before April 10, 2009, showing the entire
inventories of other tobacco products possessed by them or in their control at 11:59 p.m.
on March 31, 2009; and
c. Pay a floor stock tax at a proportionate rate equal to seven and one-half percent (7.5%) on
the purchase price of other tobacco products in their possession or control at 11:59 p.m.
on March 31, 2009.
2. a. As used in this paragraph, "purchase price" means the actual amount paid for the other
tobacco products subject to the tax imposed by this paragraph.
b. If the retailer or subjobber[ sub-jobber] cannot determine the actual amount paid for each
item of other tobacco product, the retailer or subjobber[ sub-jobber] may use as the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

60 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
purchase price the amount per unit paid as reflected on the most recent invoice received
prior to April 1, 2009,[ ] for the same category of other tobacco product.
c. To prevent double taxation, if the invoice used by the retailer or subjobber[ sub-jobber] to
determine the purchase price of the other tobacco product does not separately state the tax
paid by the wholesaler, the retailer or subjobber[ sub-jobber] may reduce the amount paid
per unit by seven and one-half percent (7.5%).
(3) (a) The taxes imposed by this section may be paid in three (3) installments. The first installment, in an
amount equal to at least one-third (1/3) of the total amount due, shall be remitted with the return
provided by the department on or before July 10, 2018. The second installment, in an amount that
brings the total amount paid to at least two-thirds (2/3) of the total amount due, shall be remitted on or
before August 10, 2018. The third installment, in an amount equal to the remaining balance, shall be
remitted on or before September 10, 2018.
(b) Interest shall not be imposed against any outstanding installment payment not yet due from any retailer,
subjobber[ sub-jobber], resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, or unclassified acquirer who files
the return and makes payments as required under this section.
(c) Any retailer, subjobber[ sub-jobber], resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, or unclassified
acquirer who fails to file a return or make a payment on or before the dates provided in this section
shall, in addition to the tax, pay interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) from the
date on which the return was required to be filed.
Section 40. KRS 138.146 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cigarette tax shall be due when any licensed wholesaler or unclassified acquirer takes possession within
this state of untax-paid cigarettes.
(2) (a) The cigarette tax shall be paid by the purchase of stamps by a resident wholesaler within forty-eight
(48) hours after the wholesaler receives the cigarettes.
(b) A stamp shall be affixed to each package of an aggregate denomination not less than the amount of the
cigarette tax on the package.
(c) The affixed stamp shall be prima facie evidence of payment of the cigarette tax.
(d) Unless stamps have been previously affixed, they shall be affixed by each resident wholesaler prior to
the delivery of any cigarettes to a retail location or any person in this state.
(e) The evidence of cigarette tax payment shall be affixed to each individual package of cigarettes by a
nonresident wholesaler prior to the introduction or importation of the cigarettes into the territorial limits
of this state.
(f) The evidence of cigarette tax payment shall be affixed by an unclassified acquirer within twenty-four
(24) hours after the cigarettes are received by the unclassified acquirer.
(3) (a) The department shall, by an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A, prescribe the form of cigarette tax evidence, the method and manner of the sale and distribution of
cigarette tax evidence, and the method and manner that tax evidence shall be affixed to the cigarettes.
(b) All cigarette tax evidence prescribed by the department shall be designed and furnished in a fashion to
permit identification of the person that affixed the cigarette tax evidence to the particular package of
cigarettes, by means of numerical rolls or other mark on the cigarette tax evidence.
(c) The department shall maintain for at least three (3) years information identifying the person that affixed
the cigarette tax evidence to each package of cigarettes. This information shall not be kept confidential
or exempt from disclosure to the public through open records.
(4) (a) Units of cigarette tax evidence shall be sold at their face value, but the department shall allow as
compensation to any licensed wholesaler an amount of tax evidence equal to a proportionate rate of one
and one-half cents ($0.015) on each twenty (20) cigarettes.
(b) The department shall have the power to withhold compensation as provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection from any licensed wholesaler for failure to abide by any provisions of KRS 138.130 to
138.205 or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. Any refund or credit for unused
cigarette tax evidence shall be reduced by the amount allowed as compensation at the time of purchase.

CHAPTER 161 61
(5) (a) Payment for units of cigarette tax evidence shall be made at the time the units are sold, unless the
licensed wholesaler:
1. Has filed with the department a bond, issued by a corporation authorized to do surety business in
Kentucky, in an amount:
a. Determined by the department; or
b. i. Not less than the monthly average of payments by the wholesaler for the units of
cigarette tax evidence purchased in the immediately preceding calendar year, which
may be delayed under paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
ii. No greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000); and
2. Has registered and agrees to make the payment of tax to the department electronically.
[At no time shall ]The licensed wholesaler shall not be allowed to delay any payment for units of
cigarette tax evidence, including tax, penalty, interest, or collection fees, which would exceed the
amount of bond filed with the department.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the licensed wholesaler qualifies under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the licensed wholesaler shall have ten (10) days from the date of
purchase to remit payment of cigarette tax, without the assessment of civil penalties under KRS 131.180
or interest under KRS 131.183 during the ten (10) day period.
(c) 1. The ten (10) day payment period under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not apply to the
payment for units of cigarette tax evidence during the last ten (10) days of the month of June
during each fiscal year.
2. All payments for units of cigarette tax evidence made under paragraph (b) of this subsection
during the month of June shall be made the earlier of:
a. The ten (10) day period; or
b. June 25.
(d) If the licensed wholesaler does not make the payment of cigarette tax within the ten (10) day period, or
within the period of time under paragraph (c) of this subsection, the department shall:
1. Revoke the license required under KRS 138.195;
2. Issue a demand for payment in an amount equal to the cigarette tax evidence purchased, plus all
penalties, interest, and collection fees applicable, up to the amount of the required bond; and
3. Require immediate payment of the bond.
(6) (a) The bond required under subsection (5) of this section shall be on a form and with a surety approved by
the department.
(b) The licensed wholesaler shall be named as the principal obligor and the department shall be named as
the obligee within the bond.
(c) The bond shall be conditioned upon the payment by the licensed wholesaler of all cigarette tax imposed
by the Commonwealth.
(d) The provisions of KRS 131.110 shall not apply to the demand for payment required under subsection
(5)(c)2. of this section.
(7) (a) [No ]Tax evidence shall not[may] be affixed[,] or used in any way[,] by any person other than the
person purchasing the tax evidence from the department.
(b) Tax evidence shall[may] not be transferred or negotiated, and shall[may] not, by any scheme or device,
be given, bartered, sold, traded, or loaned to any other person.
(c) Unaffixed tax evidence may be returned to the department for credit or refund for any reason
satisfactory to the department.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

62 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) (a) In the event any retailer takes[receives into his] possession of cigarettes to which evidence of Kentucky
tax payment is not properly affixed, the retailer shall, within twenty-four (24) hours, notify the
department of the receipt.
(b) The notification to the department shall be in writing, stating the name of the person from whom the
cigarettes were received and the quantity of those cigarettes.
(c) The written notice may be:
1. Given to any field agent of the department; or
2. Directed to the commissioner of the Department of Revenue, Frankfort, Kentucky.
(d) If the notice is given by means of the United States mail, it shall be sent by certified mail.
(e) Any[ such] cigarettes to which evidence of Kentucky tax payment is not properly affixed shall be
retained by the retailer, and not sold, for a period of fifteen (15) days after giving the notice provided in
this subsection.
(f) The retailer may, at the retailer's[his] option, pay the tax due on those cigarettes according to
administrative regulations prescribed by the department, and proceed to sell those cigarettes after the
payment.
(9) (a) Cigarettes stamped with the cigarette tax evidence of another state shall at no time be commingled with
cigarettes on which the Kentucky cigarette tax evidence has been affixed.
(b) Any licensed wholesaler, licensed subjobber[sub-jobber], or licensed vending machine operator may
hold cigarettes stamped with the tax evidence of another state for any period of time, subsection (2) of
this section notwithstanding.
Section 41. KRS 138.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A[No] person other than a manufacturer shall not acquire cigarettes in this state on which the Kentucky
cigarette tax has not been paid, nor act as a resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, vending
machine operator, subjobber[sub-jobber], transporter or unclassified acquirer of such cigarettes without
first obtaining a license from the department as provided[set out] in this section.
(b) A[No] person shall not act as a distributor of tobacco products or vapor products without first obtaining
a license from the department as provided[set out] in this section.
(c) An[For licenses effective for periods beginning on or after July 1, 2015, no] individual, entity, or any
other group or combination acting as a unit shall not[may] be eligible to obtain a license under this
section if the individual, or any partner, director, principal officer, or manager of the entity or any other
group or combination acting as a unit has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere to:
1. A crime relating to the reporting, distribution, sale, or taxation of cigarettes, tobacco products, or
vapor products; or
2. A crime involving fraud, falsification of records, improper business transactions or reporting;
for ten (10) years from the expiration of probation or final discharge from parole or maximum
expiration of sentence.
(2) (a) Each resident wholesaler shall secure a separate license for each place of business at which cigarette tax
evidence is affixed or at which cigarettes on which the Kentucky cigarette tax has not been paid are
received.
(b) Each nonresident wholesaler shall secure a separate license for each place of business at which evidence
of Kentucky cigarette tax is affixed or from where Kentucky cigarette tax is reported and paid.
(c) Each license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year.
(d) Each licensee shall pay the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each year, or portion thereof, for
which each license is secured.
(3) (a) Each subjobber[sub-jobber] shall secure a separate license for each place of business from which
cigarettes, upon which the cigarette tax has been paid, are made available to retailers, whether the place
of business is located within or without this state.

CHAPTER 161 63
(b) Each license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year.
(c) Each licensee shall pay the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each year, or portion thereof, for
which each license is secured.
(4) (a) Each vending machine operator shall secure a license for the privilege of dispensing cigarettes, tobacco
products, or vapor products by vending machines on which the[ cigarette] tax imposed by Section 38
of this Act is required to be[has been] paid[, by vending machines].
(b) Each license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year.
(c) Each licensee shall pay the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each year, or portion thereof, for which
each license is secured.
(d) A[No] vending machine shall not be operated within this Commonwealth without having prominently
affixed thereto the name of its operator and the license number assigned to that operator by the
department.
(e) The department shall prescribe by administrative regulation the manner in which the information shall
be affixed to the vending machine.
(5) (a) Each transporter shall secure a license for the privilege of transporting cigarettes within this state.
(b) Each license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year.
(c) Each licensee shall pay the sum of fifty dollars ($50) for each year, or portion thereof, for which each
license is secured.
(d) A[No] transporter shall not transport any cigarettes without having in actual possession an invoice or
bill of lading therefor, showing:
1. The name and address of the consignor and consignee;
2. The date acquired by the transporter;
3. The name and address of the transporter;
4. The quantity of cigarettes being transported; and
5. The license number assigned to the transporter by the department.
(6) (a) Each unclassified acquirer shall secure a license for the privilege of acquiring cigarettes on which the
cigarette tax has not been paid.
(b) Each[The] license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year.
(c) Each licensee shall pay the sum of fifty dollars ($50) for each year, or portion thereof, for which the
license is secured.
(7) (a) 1. Each distributor shall secure a license for the privilege of selling tobacco products or vapor
products in this state. Each license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year, and each
licensee shall pay the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each year, or portion thereof, for
which the license is secured.
2. a. A resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, or subjobber licensed under this section
may also obtain and maintain a distributor's license at each place of business at no
additional cost each year.
b. An unclassified acquirer licensed under this section may also obtain and maintain a
distributor's license for the privilege of selling tobacco products or vapor products in this
state. The license shall be secured on or before July 1 of each year, and each licensee shall
pay the sum of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) for each year, or portion thereof, for
which the license is secured.
3. The department may, upon application, grant a distributor's license to a person other than a
retailer and who is not otherwise required to hold a distributor's license under this paragraph. If
the department grants the license, the licensee shall pay the sum of five hundred dollars ($500)
for each year, or portion thereof, for which the license is secured, and the licensee shall be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

64 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
subject to the excise tax in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as a distributor
required to be licensed under this paragraph.
(b) The department may, upon application, grant a retail distributor's license to a retailer for the privilege of
purchasing tobacco products or vapor products from a distributor not licensed by the department. If the
department grants the license, the licensee shall pay the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each
year, or portion thereof, for which the license is secured.
(8) [Nothing in ]KRS 138.130 to 138.205 shall not be construed to prevent the department from requiring a person
to purchase more than one (1) license if the nature of that person's business is so diversified as to justify the
requirement.
(9) (a) The department may, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
require any person requesting a license or holding a license under this section to supply such
information concerning his or her business, sales or any privilege exercised, as is deemed reasonably
necessary for the regulation of the licensees, and to protect the revenues of the state.
(b) Failure on the part of the applicant or licensee to:
1. Comply with KRS 131.600 to 131.630, 138.130 to 138.205, 248.752, or 248.754 or any
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder; or
2. Permit an inspection of premises, machines, or vehicles by an authorized agent of the department
at any reasonable time;
shall be grounds for the denial or revocation of any license issued by the department, after due notice
and a hearing by the department.
(c) The commissioner may assign a time and place for the hearing and may appoint a conferee who shall
conduct a hearing, receive evidence, and hear arguments.
(d) The conferee shall thereupon file a report with the commissioner together with a recommendation as to
the denial or revocation of the license.
(e) From any denial or revocation made by the commissioner on the report, the licensee may prosecute an
appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals pursuant to KRS 49.220.
(f) Any person whose license has been revoked for the willful violation of any provision of KRS 131.600
to 131.630, 138.130 to 138.205, 248.752, or 248.754 or any administrative regulations promulgated
thereunder shall not be entitled to any license provided for in this section, or have any interest in any
license, either disclosed or undisclosed, either as an individual, partnership, corporation or otherwise,
for a period of two (2) years after the revocation.
(10) A[No] license issued under[pursuant to] this section shall not be transferable or negotiable, except that a
license may be transferred between an individual and a corporation if that individual is the exclusive owner of
that corporation, or between a subsidiary corporation and its parent corporation.
(11) Every manufacturer located or doing business in this state and the first person to import cigarettes into this
state shall keep written records of all shipments of cigarettes to persons within this state, and shall submit to
the department monthly reports of the[such] shipments. All books, records, invoices, and documents required
by this section shall be preserved in a form prescribed by the department for not less than four (4) years from
the making of the records unless the department authorizes, in writing, the destruction of the records.
(12) A[No] person licensed under this section other than a[except] nonresident wholesaler[wholesalers] shall
either sell to or purchase from any other such licensee untax-paid cigarettes.
(13) (a) Licensed distributors of tobacco products or vapor products shall pay and report the tobacco products
tax or vapor products tax on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month following the month in
which the possession or title of the tobacco products or vapor products are transferred from the licensed
distributor to retailers or consumers in this state, as the case may be.
(b) Retailers who have applied for and been granted a retail distributor's license for the privilege of
purchasing tobacco products or vapor products from a person who is not a distributor licensed under
KRS 138.195(7)(a) shall report and pay the tobacco products tax or vapor products tax on or before the
twentieth day of the calendar month following the month in which the products are acquired by the
licensed retail distributors.

CHAPTER 161 65
(c) If the distributor or retail distributor timely reports and pays the tax due, the distributor or retail
distributor may deduct an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the tax due.
(d) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
prescribe[setting forth] the details of the reporting requirements.
(14) A tax return shall be filed for each reporting period whether or not tax is due.
(15) Any license issued by the department under this section shall not be construed to waive or condone any
violation that occurred or may have occurred prior to the issuance of the license and shall not prevent
subsequent proceedings against the licensee.
(16) (a) The department may deny the issuance of a license under this section if:
1. The applicant has made any material false statement on the application for the license; or
2. The applicant has violated any provision of KRS 131.600 to 131.630, 138.130 to 138.205,
248.754, or 248.756 or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.
(b) If the department denies the applicant a license under this section, the department shall notify the
applicant of the grounds for the denial, and the applicant may request a hearing and appeal the denial as
provided in subsection (9) of this section.
Section 42. KRS 138.349 is amended to read as follows:
No person shall execute a gasoline or special fuel refund invoice, as described in KRS 138.351, who is not a dealer,
as defined in KRS 138.210 or a subjobber[sub-jobber] duly authorized by a licensed dealer, to execute refund
invoices as his agent. In no instance shall refund invoices be executed for purchases from retail filling stations.
Section 43. KRS 141.0205 is amended to read as follows:
If a taxpayer is entitled to more than one (1) of the tax credits allowed against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020,
141.040, and 141.0401, the priority of application and use of the credits shall be determined as follows:
(1) The nonrefundable business incentive credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be taken in the
following order:
(a) The limited liability entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.0401;
(b) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381, 141.384, 141.3841,
141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and 154.12-2088;
(c) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(d) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a) and Section 59 of this Act;
(e) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(f) The tax paid to other states credit permitted by KRS 141.070;
(g) The credit for hiring the unemployed permitted by KRS 141.065;
(h) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions in investment funds permitted by KRS 154.20-263 in effect prior
to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS 154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit permitted under KRS
151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

66 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(s) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(t) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(u) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(v) The angel investor credit permitted by KRS 141.396;
(w) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved on or after April 27,
2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(x) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(y) The renewable chemical production credit permitted by KRS 141.4231; and
(z) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
(2) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (1) of this section, the nonrefundable personal
tax credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The individual credits permitted by KRS 141.020(3);
(b) The credit permitted by KRS 141.066;
(c) The tuition credit permitted by KRS 141.069;
(d) The household and dependent care credit permitted by KRS 141.067;
(e) The income gap credit permitted by KRS 141.066; and
(f) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.522;
(3) After the application of the nonrefundable credits provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the refundable
credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The individual withholding tax credit permitted by KRS 141.350;
(b) The individual estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.305;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and 171.397(1)(b) and
Section 59 of this Act;
(d) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved prior to April 27,
2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(e) The development area [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.398;
(f) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(g) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209;
(4) The nonrefundable credit permitted by KRS 141.0401 shall be applied against the tax imposed by KRS
141.040;
(5) The following nonrefundable credits shall be applied against the sum of the tax imposed by KRS 141.040 after
subtracting the credit provided for in subsection (4) of this section, and the tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 in
the following order:
(a) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381, 141.384, 141.3841,
141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and 154.12-2088;
(b) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a) and Section 59 of this Act;
(d) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(e) The unemployment credit permitted by KRS 141.065;
(f) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;

CHAPTER 161 67
(g) The coal conversion credit permitted by KRS 141.041;
(h) The enterprise zone credit permitted by KRS 154.45-090, for taxable periods ending prior to January 1,
2008;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions to investment funds permitted by KRS 154.20-263 in effect prior
to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS 154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit permitted by KRS
151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The ENERGY STAR home or ENERGY STAR manufactured home credit permitted by KRS 141.437;
(s) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(t) The railroad expansion credit permitted by KRS 141.386;
(u) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(v) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(w) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(x) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved on or after April 27,
2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(y) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(z) The renewable chemical production [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.4231;
(aa) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.522; and
(ab) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391; and
(6) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (5) of this section, the refundable credits shall
be taken in the following order:
(a) The corporation estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.044;
(b) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and 171.397(1)(b) and
Section 59 of this Act;
(c) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved prior to April 27,
2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(d) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(e) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209.
Section 44. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or former member of a county
board of assessment appeals, present or former property valuation administrator or employee, present or
former secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the
Revenue Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect or divulge any
information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or information regarding the tax schedules,
returns, or reports required to be filed with the department or other proper officer, or any information produced
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

68 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
by a hearing or investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the person's
business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of property for taxation, or any
other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with information respecting his or her
own return;
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department in any court, or the
introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the department, in an action for violation of
state or federal tax laws or in any action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or energy resources assessed
under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land under which the unmined minerals lie, factual
information about the owner's property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property,
under the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's assessment. This
information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential basis, and the owner shall be subject to the
penalties provided in KRS 131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a foreclosure action filed in a court
of competent jurisdiction, factual information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or
any other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may promulgate an
administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the provision of the information described in
this paragraph. Any fee imposed shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the
information or ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or the Kentucky Supreme
Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department under KRS 138.210 to
138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is necessary to administer the
provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an order issued by a court
of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building materials used for disaster
recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the ENERGY STAR manufactured
home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization credit and the job
assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting credits;

CHAPTER 161 69
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account Program credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for the commercial mining of
cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment credit;
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for a qualified data center
project;[ and]
19. KRS 139.5325 for purposes of the sales and use tax incentive for a qualifying attraction;
20. Section 46 of this Act for purposes of the film and motion picture sales tax exemption;
21. Section 53 of this Act for purposes of the hiring of unemployed persons credit;
22. Section 54 of this Act for the purposes of the qualified farming operations credit;
23. Section 56 of this Act for purposes of the High School Equivalency Diploma Incentives credit;
and
24. Section 103 of this Act for purposes of refunds issued for coal transported directly to a market
outside of the United States, but within North America and for coal transported directly to a
market outside of North America.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on a confidential basis to the
proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state, any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other
state, or the federal government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive similar or
useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service is for department use
only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes. Information received from the Internal Revenue Service
shall not be made available to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax requirements of KRS
Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as reported to the department under the natural resources
severance tax requirements of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map submissions for the 1989 tax
year, the department may make public or divulge only those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to
the department pursuant to KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual boundaries of mined-out
parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not
be construed to constitute land surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any
administrative regulations promulgated thereto.
Section 45. KRS 160.6131 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 160.613 to 160.617:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(2) "Communications service" means the provision, transmission, conveyance, or routing, for consideration, of
voice, data, video, or any other information signals of the purchaser's choosing to a point or between or among
points specified by the purchaser, by or through any electronic, radio, light, fiber optic, or similar medium or
method now in existence or later devised.
(a) "Communications service" includes but is not limited to:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

70 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Local and long-distance telephone services;
2. Telegraph and teletypewriter services;
3. Postpaid calling services;
4. Private communications services involving a direct channel specifically dedicated to a customer's
use between specific points;
5. Channel services involving a path of communications between two (2) or more points;
6. Data transport services involving the movement of encoded information between points by
means of any electronic, radio, or other medium or method;
7. Caller ID services, ring tones, voice mail, and other electronic messaging services;
8. Mobile wireless telecommunications service and fixed wireless service as defined in KRS
139.195; and
9. Voice over Internet Protocol (VOIP).
(b) "Communications service" does not include any of the following if the charges are separately itemized
on the bill provided to the purchaser:
1. Information services;
2. Internet access as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 151;
3. Installation, reinstallation, or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's premises. This
exclusion does not apply to any charge attributable to the connection, movement, change, or
termination of a communications service;
4. The sale of directory and other advertising and listing services;
5. Billing and collection services provided to another communications service provider;
6. Cable service, satellite broadcast, satellite master antenna television, wireless cable service,
including direct-to-home satellite service as defined in Section 602 of the federal
Telecommunications Act of 1996, and Internet protocol television provided through wireline
facilities without regard to delivery technology;
7. The sale of communications service to a communications provider that is buying the
communications service for sale or incorporation into a communications service for sale,
including:
a. Carrier access charges, excluding user access fees;
b. Right of access charges;
c. Interconnection charges paid by the provider of mobile telecommunications services or
other communications providers;
d. Charges for the sale of unbundled network elements as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153(29)
on January 1, 2001, to which access is provided on an unbundled basis in accordance with
47 U.S.C. sec. 251(c)(3); and
e. Charges for use of facilities for providing or receiving communications service;
8. [The sale of communications services provided to the public by means of a pay phone;
9. ]Prepaid calling services and prepaid wireless calling service;
9.[10.] Interstate telephone service, if the interstate charge is separately itemized for each call; and
10.[11.] If the interstate calls are not itemized, the portion of telephone charges identified and set
out on the customer's bill as interstate as supported by the provider's books and records;
(3) "Gross cost" means the total cost of utility services including the cost of the tangible personal property and any
services associated with obtaining the utility services regardless from whom purchased;
(4) "Gross receipts" means all amounts received in money, credits, property, or other money's worth in any form,
as consideration for the furnishing of utility services;

CHAPTER 161 71
(5) "Utility services" means the furnishing of communications services, electric power, water, and natural,
artificial, and mixed gas;
(6) "Cable service" has the same meaning as in KRS 136.602;
(7) "Satellite broadcast and wireless cable service" has the same meaning as in KRS 136.602;
(8) "Ring tones" has the same meaning as in KRS 136.602;
(9) "Multichannel video programming service" has the same meaning as in KRS 136.602;
(10) "Industrial processing" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.010;
(11) "Manufacturing" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.010;
(12) "Plant facility" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.010;
(13) "Commercial mining of cryptocurrency" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.516; and
(14) "Colocation facility" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.516.
Section 46. KRS 139.538 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly in enacting this section and KRS 139.990(5), to encourage
the motion picture industry to choose locations in the Commonwealth for the filming or producing of motion
pictures, by providing an exemption from sales and use taxes. The exemption is accomplished by granting a
refundable credit for sales and use taxes paid on purchases made in connection with the filming or producing
of motion pictures in Kentucky.
(2) (a) On or after July 1, 2030[April 27, 2018, and until July 1, 2022], the department shall not accept any
new applications as provided by subsection (4) of this section.
(b) On or before November 1, 2026, and each November 1, thereafter as long as this refundable credit is
available[June 1, 2019], the department shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral [provide the following information ]to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue for all fiscal years data is available:
1. The name and address of the motion picture company;
2. By county, the filming location or locations in this state;
3. A brief description of the production or productions;
4. The amount of sales and use tax refunded to the motion picture company;[ and]
5. The total number of motion picture companies claiming the credit; and
6. The total amount of all sales and use tax refunded to motion picture production companies during
each fiscal year reported.
(c) The information required to be reported under this section shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
(3) As used in this section and KRS 139.990(5):
(a) "Financial institution" means any bank or savings and loan institution in the Commonwealth which
carries FDIC or FSLIC insurance;
(b) "Motion picture production company" means a company engaged in the business of producing motion
pictures intended for a theatrical release or for exhibition on national television either by a network or
for national syndication, or television programs which will serve as a pilot for or a segment of a
nationally televised dramatic series, either by a network or for national syndication; and
(c) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Kentucky Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(4) Any motion picture production company that intends to film all or parts of a motion picture in the
Commonwealth and desires to receive the credit provided for in subsection (7) of this section shall, prior to the
commencement of filming:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

72 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Provide the department with the address of a Kentucky location at which records of expenditures
qualifying for the tax credit will be maintained, and with the name of the individual maintaining these
records; and
(b) File an application for the tax credit within sixty (60) days after the completion of filming or production
in Kentucky. The application shall include a final expenditure report providing documentation for
expenditures in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.
(5) To qualify as a basis for the financial incentive, expenditures must be made by check drawn upon any
Kentucky financial institution.
(6) The twelve (12) month period during which expenditures may qualify for the tax credit shall begin on the date
of the earliest expenditure reported.
(7) Any motion picture production company which films or produces one (1) or more motion pictures in the
Commonwealth during any twelve (12) month period shall, upon making application therefor and meeting the
other requirements prescribed in this section, be entitled to a refundable tax credit equal to the amount of
Kentucky sales and use tax paid for purchases made in connection with the filming or production of a motion
picture.
(8) The department shall, within sixty (60) days following the receipt of an application for a credit for sales and
use tax paid, calculate the total expenditures of the motion picture production company for which there is
documentation for funds expended in the Commonwealth, calculate the amount of credit to which the
applicant is entitled, and certify the amount of the credit to the secretary. In the case of an audit, as provided
for in subsection (13) of this section, the department shall certify the amount of the credit due to the secretary
within one hundred eighty (180) days following the receipt of the motion picture production company's
application.
(9) Upon receipt of the certification of the amount of credit from the department, the secretary shall cause the
refund of sales taxes paid to be remitted to the motion picture production company. For purposes of payment
and funding thereof, the credit shall be paid in the same manner as other claims on the State Treasury are paid.
They shall not be charged against any appropriation but shall be deducted from tax receipts for the current
fiscal year.
(10) The sales and use taxes paid by the motion picture production company for which a refundable tax credit is
granted shall be deemed not to have been legally paid into the State Treasury, and the refund of the credit shall
not be in violation of Section 59 of the Kentucky Constitution.
(11) Any tax credit or part thereof paid to a motion picture production company as a result of error by the
department shall be repaid by such company to the secretary.
(12) Any tax credit or part thereof paid to a motion picture production company as a result of error or fraudulent
statements made by the motion picture production company shall be repaid by such company to the secretary,
together with interest, at the tax interest rate provided for in KRS 131.010(6).
(13) The department may require that reported expenditures and the application for the tax credit from a motion
picture production company be subjected to an audit by the department auditors to verify expenditures.
(14) For companies in the business of producing films or television shows other than those which would qualify
them for the credit under the definition of "motion picture production company," the department may require
separate accounting records for the reporting of expenditures made in connection with the application for a
refundable tax credit.
(15) The department may promulgate appropriate administrative regulations to carry out the intent and purposes of
this section.
Section 47. KRS 132.096 is amended to read as follows:
The following classes of property shall be exempt from state and local ad valorem taxes, including the county, city,
school, and other taxing district in which it has a taxable situs:
(1) Farm implements and farm machinery owned by or leased to a person actually engaged in farming and used in
his or her farm operations;
(2) Livestock, ratite birds, and domestic fowl;

CHAPTER 161 73
(3) Tangible personal property located in a foreign trade zone established pursuant to 19 U.S.C. secs. 81a to 81u,
provided that the zone is activated in accordance with the regulations of the United States Customs Service
and the Foreign Trade Zones Board;
(4) Property that is certified as an alcohol production facility as defined in KRS 247.910;
(5) [Property that is certified as a fluidized bed energy production facility as defined in KRS 211.390;
(6) ]Computer software, except prewritten computer software as defined in KRS 139.010;
(6)[(7)] Trucks, tractors, and buses used on routes or in systems that are partly within and partly outside this
state, and that are subject to the fee imposed by KRS 136.188;
(7)[(8)] Semitrailers and trailers, as defined in KRS 189.010, if the semitrailers or trailers are used on a route or
in a system that is partly within and partly outside this state. Semitrailers or trailers required to be registered
under KRS 186.655 that are used only in this state shall be subject to the ad valorem tax imposed by KRS
132.487;
(8)[(9)] All intangible personal property, except intangible personal property assessed under KRS 132.030 or
KRS Chapter 136. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit local taxation of franchises of:
(a) Corporations;
(b) Financial institutions as provided in KRS 136.575; or
(c) Domestic life insurance companies;
(9)[(10)] All real and personal property owned by another state or a political subdivision of another state that is
used exclusively for public purposes, if a comparable exemption is provided in that state or political
subdivision for property owned by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or its political subdivisions;
(10)[(11)] Every fraternal benefit society organized or licensed under Subtitle 29 of KRS Chapter 304 that is a
charitable and benevolent institution, and its funds shall be exempt from all state, county, district, city, and
school taxes, other than taxes on real property and office equipment; and
(11)[(12)] (a) Any bridge built by an adjoining state, by the government of the United States, or by any
commission created by an Act of Congress, over a boundary line stream between this state and an
adjoining state, which is:
1. Not operated for profit and, if it connects with a primary highway of this state, is declared to be
public property used for public purposes; and
2. Exempt from taxation unless the adjoining state, or other public body constructing the bridge,
taxes similar bridges built by this Commonwealth in like manner.
(b) The issuance of bonds for the purpose of amortizing the cost of construction of the bridges, as described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall not affect the tax exemption granted.
Section 48. KRS 139.480 is amended to read as follows:
Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the terms "sale at retail," "retail sale," "use,"
"storage," and "consumption," as used in this chapter, do[shall] not include the sale, use, storage, or other
consumption of:
(1) Locomotives or rolling stock, including materials for the construction, repair, or modification thereof, or fuel
or supplies for the direct operation of locomotives and trains, used or to be used in interstate commerce;
(2) Coal for the manufacture of electricity;
(3) (a) All energy or energy-producing fuels used in the course of manufacturing, processing, mining, or
refining and any related distribution, transmission, and transportation services for this energy that are
billed to the user, to the extent that the cost of the energy or energy-producing fuels used, and related
distribution, transmission, and transportation services for this energy that are billed to the user exceed
three percent (3%) of the cost of production.
(b) Cost of production shall be computed on the basis of a plant facility, which includes[shall include] all
operations within the continuous, unbroken, integrated manufacturing or industrial processing process
that ends with a product packaged and ready for sale.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

74 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) A person who performs a manufacturing or industrial processing activity for a fee and does not take
ownership of the tangible personal property that is incorporated into, or becomes the product of, the
manufacturing or industrial processing activity is a toller. For periods on or after July 1, 2018, the costs
of the tangible personal property shall be excluded from the toller's cost of production at a plant facility
with tolling operations in place as of July 1, 2018.
(d) For plant facilities that begin tolling operations after July 1, 2018, the costs of tangible personal
property shall be excluded from the toller's cost of production if the toller:
1. Maintains a binding contract for periods after July 1, 2018, that governs the terms, conditions,
and responsibilities with a separate legal entity, which holds title to the tangible personal
property that is incorporated into, or becomes the product of, the manufacturing or industrial
processing activity;
2. Maintains accounting records that show the expenses it incurs to fulfill the binding contract that
include but are not limited to energy or energy-producing fuels, materials, labor, procurement,
depreciation, maintenance, taxes, administration, and office expenses;
3. Maintains separate payroll, bank accounts, tax returns, and other records that demonstrate its
independent operations in the performance of its tolling responsibilities;
4. Demonstrates one (1) or more substantial business purposes for the tolling operations germane to
the overall manufacturing, industrial processing activities, or corporate structure at the plant
facility. A business purpose is a purpose other than the reduction of sales tax liability for the
purchases of energy and energy-producing fuels; and
5. Provides information to the department upon request that documents fulfillment of the
requirements in subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph and gives an overview of its tolling
operations with an explanation of how the tolling operations relate and connect with all other
manufacturing or industrial processing activities occurring at the plant facility;
(4) Livestock of a kind the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption, provided the
sales are made for breeding or dairy purposes and by or to a person regularly engaged in the business of
farming;
(5) Poultry for use in breeding or egg production;
(6) Farm work stock for use in farming operations;
(7) Seeds, the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption or are to be sold in the regular
course of business, and commercial fertilizer to be applied on land, the products from which are to be used for
food for human consumption or are to be sold in the regular course of business; provided the sales are made to
farmers who are regularly engaged in the occupation of tilling and cultivating the soil for the production of
crops as a business, or who are regularly engaged in the occupation of raising and feeding livestock or poultry
or producing milk for sale; and provided further that tangible personal property so sold is to be used only by
those persons designated above who are so purchasing;
(8) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other farm chemicals to be used in the production of
crops as a business, or in the raising and feeding of livestock or poultry, the products of which ordinarily
constitute food for human consumption;
(9) Feed, including pre-mixes and feed additives, for livestock or poultry of a kind the products of which
ordinarily constitute food for human consumption;
(10) Machinery for new and expanded industry;
(11) Farm machinery. As used in this section, the term "farm machinery":
(a) Means machinery used exclusively and directly in the occupation of:
1. Tilling the soil for the production of crops as a business;
2. Raising and feeding livestock or poultry for sale; or
3. Producing milk for sale;
(b) Includes machinery, attachments, and replacements therefor, repair parts, and replacement parts which
are used or manufactured for use on, or in the operation of farm machinery and which are necessary to

CHAPTER 161 75
the operation of the machinery, and are customarily so used, including but not limited to combine
header wagons, combine header trailers, or any other implements specifically designed and used to
move or transport a combine head; and
(c) Does not include:
1. Automobiles;
2. Trucks;
3. Trailers, except combine header trailers; or
4. Truck-trailer combinations;
(12) Tombstones and other memorial grave markers;
(13) On-farm facilities used exclusively for grain or soybean storing, drying, processing, or handling. The
exemption applies to the equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials
incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(14) On-farm facilities used exclusively for raising poultry or livestock. The exemption shall apply to the
equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials incorporated into the
construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities. The exemption shall apply but not be limited to vent board
equipment, waterer and feeding systems, brooding systems, ventilation systems, alarm systems, and curtain
systems. In addition, the exemption shall apply whether or not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble,
and incorporate into real estate the equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(15) Gasoline, special fuels, liquefied petroleum gas, and natural gas used exclusively and directly to:
(a) Operate farm machinery as defined in subsection (11) of this section;
(b) Operate on-farm grain or soybean drying facilities as defined in subsection (13) of this section;
(c) Operate on-farm poultry or livestock facilities defined in subsection (14) of this section;
(d) Operate on-farm ratite facilities defined in subsection (23) of this section;
(e) Operate on-farm llama or alpaca facilities as defined in subsection (25) of this section; or
(f) Operate on-farm dairy facilities;
(16) Textbooks, including related workbooks and other course materials, purchased for use in a course of study
conducted by an institution which qualifies as a nonprofit educational institution under KRS 139.495. The
term "course materials" means only those items specifically required of all students for a particular course but
does[shall] not include notebooks, paper, pencils, calculators, tape recorders, or similar student aids;
(17) Any property which has been certified as an alcohol production facility as defined in KRS 247.910;
(18) Aircraft, repair and replacement parts therefor, and supplies, except fuel, for the direct operation of aircraft in
interstate commerce and used exclusively for the conveyance of property or passengers for hire. Nominal
intrastate use shall not subject the property to the taxes imposed by this chapter;
(19) [Any property which has been certified as a fluidized bed energy production facility as defined in KRS
211.390;
(20) ](a) 1. Any property to be incorporated into the construction, rebuilding, modification, or expansion of a
blast furnace or any of its components or appurtenant equipment or structures as part of an
approved supplemental project, as defined in[by] KRS 154.26-010; and
2. Materials, supplies, and repair or replacement parts purchased for use in the operation and
maintenance of a blast furnace and related carbon steel-making operations as part of an approved
supplemental project, as defined in[by] KRS 154.26-010.
(b) The exemptions provided in this subsection shall be effective for sales made:
1. On and after July 1, 2018; and
2. During the term of a supplemental project agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.26-090;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

76 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(20)[(21)] Beginning on October 1, 1986, food or food products purchased for human consumption with food
coupons issued by the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to the Food Stamp Act of 1977, as
amended, and required to be exempted by the Food Security Act of 1985 in order for the Commonwealth to
continue participation in the federal food stamp program;
(21)[(22)] Machinery or equipment purchased or leased by a business, industry, or organization in order to collect,
source separate, compress, bale, shred, or otherwise handle waste materials if the machinery or equipment is
primarily used for recycling purposes;
(22)[(23)] Ratite birds and eggs to be used in an agricultural pursuit for the breeding and production of ratite birds,
feathers, hides, breeding stock, eggs, meat, and ratite by-products, and the following items used in this
agricultural pursuit:
(a) Feed and feed additives;
(b) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other farm chemicals; and
(c) On-farm facilities, including equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities. The exemption shall
apply to incubation systems, egg processing equipment, waterer and feeding systems, brooding systems,
ventilation systems, alarm systems, and curtain systems. In addition, the exemption shall apply whether
or not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble, and incorporate into real estate the equipment,
machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials incorporated into the
construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(23)[(24)] Embryos and semen that are used in the reproduction of livestock, if the products of these embryos and
semen ordinarily constitute food for human consumption, and if the sale is made to a person engaged in the
business of farming;
(24)[(25)] Llamas and alpacas to be used as beasts of burden or in an agricultural pursuit for the breeding and
production of hides, breeding stock, fiber and wool products, meat, and llama and alpaca by-products, and the
following items used in this pursuit:
(a) Feed and feed additives;
(b) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other farm chemicals; and
(c) On-farm facilities, including equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities. The exemption shall
apply to waterer and feeding systems, ventilation systems, and alarm systems. In addition, the
exemption shall apply whether or not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble, and incorporate
into real estate the equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials
incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(25)[(26)] Baling twine and baling wire for the baling of hay and straw;
(26)[(27)] Water sold to a person regularly engaged in the business of farming and used in the:
(a) Production of crops;
(b) Production of milk for sale; or
(c) Raising and feeding of:
1. Livestock or poultry, the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption; or
2. Ratites, llamas, alpacas, buffaloes[buffalo], cervids or aquatic organisms;
(27)[(28)] Buffaloes[Buffalos] to be used as beasts of burden or in an agricultural pursuit for the production of
hides, breeding stock, meat, and buffalo by-products, and the following items used in this pursuit:
(a) Feed and feed additives;
(b) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other farm chemicals; and
(c) On-farm facilities, including equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities. The exemption shall
apply to waterer and feeding systems, ventilation systems, and alarm systems. In addition, the
exemption shall apply whether or not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble, and incorporate

CHAPTER 161 77
into real estate the equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials
incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(28)[(29)] Aquatic organisms sold directly to or raised by a person regularly engaged in the business of producing
products of aquaculture, as defined in KRS 260.960, for sale, and the following items used in this pursuit:
(a) Feed and feed additives;
(b) Water;
(c) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other farm chemicals; and
(d) On-farm facilities, including equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities and, any gasoline,
special fuels, liquefied petroleum gas, or natural gas used to operate the facilities. The exemption shall
apply, but not be limited to: waterer and feeding systems; ventilation, aeration, and heating systems;
processing and storage systems; production systems such as ponds, tanks, and raceways; harvest and
transport equipment and systems; and alarm systems. In addition, the exemption shall apply whether or
not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble, and incorporate into real estate the equipment,
machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials incorporated into the
construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(29)[(30)] Members of the genus cervidae permitted by KRS Chapter 150 that are used for the production of hides,
breeding stock, meat, and cervid by-products, and the following items used in this pursuit:
(a) Feed and feed additives;
(b) Insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, rodenticides, and other chemicals; and
(c) On-site facilities, including equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any
materials incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities. In addition, the
exemption shall apply whether or not the seller is under contract to deliver, assemble, and incorporate
into real estate the equipment, machinery, attachments, repair and replacement parts, and any materials
incorporated into the construction, renovation, or repair of the facilities;
(30)[(31)] (a) Repair or replacement parts for the direct operation or maintenance of a motor vehicle, including
any towed unit, used exclusively in interstate commerce for the conveyance of property or passengers
for hire, provided the motor vehicle is licensed for use on the highway and its declared gross vehicle
weight with any towed unit is forty-four thousand and one (44,001) pounds or greater. Nominal
intrastate use shall not subject the property to the taxes imposed by this chapter; and
(b) Repair or replacement parts for the direct operation and maintenance of a motor vehicle operating under
a charter bus certificate issued by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS Chapter 281, or under similar
authority granted by the United States Department of Transportation.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "repair or replacement parts" means tires, brakes, engines,
transmissions, drive trains, chassis, body parts, and their components. "Repair or replacement parts"
does[shall] not include fuel, machine oils, hydraulic fluid, brake fluid, grease, supplies, or accessories
not essential to the operation of the motor vehicle itself, except when sold as part of the assembled unit,
such as cigarette lighters, radios, lighting fixtures not otherwise required by the manufacturer for
operation of the vehicle, or tool or utility boxes;
(31)[(32)] Food donated by a retail food establishment or any other entity regulated under KRS 217.127 to a
nonprofit organization for distribution to the needy;
(32)[(33)] Drugs and over-the-counter drugs, as defined in KRS 139.472, that are purchased by a person regularly
engaged in the business of farming and used in the treatment of cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, ratite birds,
llamas, alpacas, buffaloes[buffalo], aquatic organisms, or cervids;
(33)[(34)] (a) Building materials, fixtures, or supplies purchased by a construction contractor if:
1. Fulfilled by a construction contract for a sewer or water project with:
a. A municipally owned water utility organized under KRS Chapter 96;
b. A water district or water commission formed or organized under KRS Chapter 74;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

78 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
c. A sanitation district established under KRS Chapter 220 or formed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 65;
d. A nonprofit corporation created under KRS 58.180 to act on behalf of a governmental
agency in the acquisition and financing of public projects;
e. Regional wastewater commissions formed under KRS Chapter 278;
f. A municipally owned joint sewer agency formed under KRS Chapter 76; or
g. Any other governmental agency; and
2. The building materials, fixtures, or supplies:
a. Will be permanently incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property, or will
be completely consumed, in fulfilling a construction contract for the purpose of furnishing
water or sewer services to the general public; and
b. Would be exempt if purchased directly by the entities listed in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(b) As used in this subsection, "construction contract" means a:
1. Lump sum contract;
2. Cost plus contract;
3. Materials only contract;
4. Labor and materials contract; or
5. Any other type of contract.
(c) The exemption provided in this subsection shall apply without regard to the payment arrangement
between the construction contractor, the retailer, and the entities listed in paragraph (a)1. of this
subsection or to the place of delivery for the building materials, fixtures, or supplies;
(34)[(35)] (a) On or after February 25, 2022, the rental of space for meetings, conventions, short-term business
uses, entertainment events, weddings, banquets, parties, and other short-term social events, as
referenced in KRS 139.200, if the tax established in KRS 139.200 is paid by the primary lessee to the
lessor.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, "primary lessee" means the person who leases the space and who has
a contract with the lessor of the space only if:
1. The contract between the lessor and the lessee specifies that the lessee may sublease, subrent, or
otherwise sell the space; and
2. The space is then sublet, subrented, or otherwise sold to exhibitors, vendors, sponsors, or other
entities and persons who will use the space associated with the event to be conducted under the
primary lease;
(35)[(36)] Prewritten computer software access services sold to or purchased by a retailer that develops prewritten
computer software for print technology and uses and sells prewritten computer software access services for
print technology;
(36)[(37)] (a) Currency or bullion.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Bullion":
a. Means bars, ingots, or coins, which are:
i. Made of gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or a combination of these metals;
ii. Valued based on the content of the metal and not its form; and
iii. Used, or have been used, as a medium of exchange, security, or commodity by any
state, the United States government, or a foreign nation; and

CHAPTER 161 79
b. Does not include medallions or coins that are incorporated into a pendant or other jewelry;
and
2. "Currency":
a. Means a coin or currency made of gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or other metal or
paper money that is or has been used as legal tender and is sold based on its value as a
collectible item rather than the value as a medium of exchange; and
b. Does not include a coin or currency that has been incorporated into jewelry; and
(37)[(38)] Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010 when sold, used, stored, or consumed in accordance
with KRS Chapter 218B.
Section 49. KRS 139.4802 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) On or after March 27, 2025, a violation shall occur when an official notice published by the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the commissioner of the department instructs that taxpayers
should continue to collect and remit sales and use tax on the sale, use, storage, or other consumption of
currency or bullion currency under this chapter.
(b) Any notice or instruction, published at any time, that states that on or after August 1, 2024, the sale, use,
storage, or other consumption of currency or bullion currency under this chapter is taxable is void and
unenforceable.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 49.220 and 139.770, on and after August 1, 2024, any person who paid sales tax under
KRS 139.200 or use tax under KRS 139.310 on currency or bullion currency that is exempt from sales and use
tax under KRS 139.480 (36)[(37)] may maintain an action for a refund of the tax paid, as an individual or by
seeking certification as a class under Rule 23 of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, for a refund on behalf
of the person and other persons similarly situated against the Commonwealth.
(3) An action for a refund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or alleging a violation under subsection (1) of
this section, may be brought in the Circuit Court of any county where the named plaintiff resides or where the
currency or bullion currency transaction took place.
(4) In addition to a refund of the sales or use tax, persons seeking a refund pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section or alleging a violation under subsection (1) of this section who prevail shall be entitled to:
(a) Prejudgment and post-judgment interest;
(b) Temporary or permanent injunctive relief;
(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and
(d) For allegations of a violation under subsection (1) of this section, liquidated damages of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation occurred, which shall be paid from the administrative
budget of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the department, or the Office of the Governor.
(5) It is the intent of the General Assembly to waive sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity for claims
under this section, including immunity afforded to the Commonwealth pursuant to the Eleventh Amendment to
the Constitution of the United States.
(6) Any person who directs, instructs, or causes a violation of any provision of this section shall be personally,
jointly, and severally liable for any awarded damages.
Section 50. KRS 139.481 is amended to read as follows:
(1) On and after January 1, 2023, every person claiming an exemption provided under KRS 139.480(4) to (9),
(11), (13) to (15), (22) to (29), and (32)[(23) to (30), and (33)] shall provide to the seller or retailer a valid
agriculture exemption license number issued by the department.
(2) A person is eligible to apply for an agriculture exemption license number if the person is:
(a) Regularly engaged in the occupation of tilling and cultivating the soil for the production of crops as a
business;
(b) Regularly engaged in the occupation of raising and feeding livestock of a kind the products of which
ordinarily constitute food for human consumption;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

80 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Raising and feeding poultry;
(d) Producing milk for sale; or
(e) Regularly engaged in raising ratite birds, llamas, alpacas, buffaloes[buffalos], cervids, or aquatic
organisms as an agricultural pursuit.
(3) (a) On and after January 1, 2023, persons that receive an agriculture exemption license number and choose
to claim the exemptions outlined in subsection (1) of this section shall, at least one (1) time, provide the
seller or retailer from whom they purchase exempt tangible personal property with one (1) of the
following:
1. The agriculture exemption license number issued by the department; or
2. A fully completed Streamlined Sales Tax Certificate of Exemption which shall include the
agriculture exemption license number.
(b) A purchaser that has met the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection may issue the agriculture
exemption license number to the seller or retailer for subsequent purchases as evidence of an exempt
purchase for as long as the agriculture exemption license number is valid.
(c) Persons that meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section but have not yet received an
agriculture exemption license number from the department prior to January 1, 2023, may issue a fully
completed exemption certificate or a fully completed Streamlined Sales Tax Certificate of Exemption
without the agriculture exemption license number prior to January 1, 2023.
(4) (a) The department, by administrative regulation, shall develop an application form for the agriculture
exemption license number and procedures by which the application form may also be submitted either
electronically or by paper filing.
(b) The application shall include:
1. The person's name and mailing address;
2. The farm address, if different from the person's mailing address;
3. An affirmation that the person meets at least one (1) of the criteria outlined in subsection (2) of
this section;
4. The person's driver's license number; and
5. One (1) of the following forms of documentation:
a. IRS Schedule F, Profit or Loss from Farming;
b. IRS Form 4835, Farm Rental Income and Expenses;
c. The farm service agency number or numbers assigned by the United States Department of
Agriculture pertaining to the parcels of land on which agriculture activity will take place;
or
d. Any other type of information that may establish to the satisfaction of the Commissioner
that the applicant qualifies for the agriculture exemption license number.
(5) (a) The agriculture exemption license number shall expire:
1. On December 31, 2026, and every four (4) years thereafter;[,] or
2. When the person ceases to engage in the agriculture activity for which the agriculture exemption
license number was granted;[,]
whichever comes first.
(b) The department shall extend the December 31, 2026, deadline for a period not to exceed six (6)
months, as needed to allow persons with agriculture exemption license numbers to renew before
expiration.
(c) When a person ceases to engage in the agriculture activity for which the license number was granted,
the person shall notify the department within sixty (60) days.

CHAPTER 161 81
(d)[(c)] The person may apply for a renewal of the agriculture exemption license number prior to the
expiration date if the person continues to meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and
provides documentation required by subsection (4)(b)5. of this section. The department shall, by
administrative regulation, prescribe the electronic process for renewing an agriculture exemption
license number.
(6) (a) On or before January 1, 2023, the department shall develop and provide an online searchable database
on the department's website that the seller or retailer may use to confirm the agriculture exemption
license number if the purchaser cannot produce documentation of the agriculture exemption license
number at the time of sale.
(b) To search the database, the seller or retailer shall provide the name of the person assigned the
agriculture exemption license number and one (1) of the following:
1. The agriculture exemption license number;
2. The agriculture exemption license number expiration date;
3. The person's driver's license number;
4. The farm service agency parcel number; or
5. Any other unique identifier that may be accepted by the department.
(c) The seller or retailer shall be relieved of the liability for collecting and remitting the sales and use tax if
the seller or retailer meets the requirements of KRS 139.260 and 139.270.
Section 51. KRS 141.0401 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Kentucky gross receipts" means an amount equal to the computation of the numerator of the
apportionment fraction under KRS 141.120, any administrative regulations related to the computation
of the sales factor, and KRS 141.121 and includes the proportionate share of Kentucky gross receipts of
all wholly or partially owned limited liability pass-through entities, including all layers of a multi-
layered pass-through structure;
(b) "Gross receipts from all sources" means an amount equal to the computation of the denominator of the
apportionment fraction under KRS 141.120, any administrative regulations related to the computation
of the sales factor, and KRS 141.121 and includes the proportionate share of gross receipts from all
sources of all wholly or partially owned limited liability pass-through entities, including all layers of a
multi-layered pass-through structure;
(c) "Affiliated group" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.201;
(d) "Cost of goods sold" means:
1. Amounts that are:
a. Allowable as cost of goods sold pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code and any guidelines
issued by the Internal Revenue Service relating to cost of goods sold, unless modified by
this paragraph; and
b. Incurred in acquiring or producing the tangible product generating the Kentucky gross
receipts.
2. For manufacturing, producing, reselling, retailing, or wholesaling activities, cost of goods sold
shall only include costs directly incurred in acquiring or producing the tangible product. In
determining cost of goods sold:
a. Labor costs shall be limited to direct labor costs as defined in paragraph (f) of this
subsection;
b. Bulk delivery costs as defined in paragraph (g) of this subsection may be included; and
c. Costs allowable under Section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code may be included only
to the extent the costs are incurred in acquiring or producing the tangible product
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

82 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
generating the Kentucky gross receipts. Notwithstanding the foregoing, indirect labor
costs allowable under Section 263A shall not be included;
3. For any activity other than manufacturing, producing, reselling, retailing, or wholesaling, no
costs shall be included in cost of goods sold.
As used in this paragraph, "guidelines issued by the Internal Revenue Service" includes regulations,
private letter rulings, or any other guidance issued by the Internal Revenue Service that may be relied
upon by taxpayers under reliance standards established by the Internal Revenue Service;
(e) 1. "Kentucky gross profits" means Kentucky gross receipts reduced by returns and allowances
attributable to Kentucky gross receipts, less the cost of goods sold attributable to Kentucky gross
receipts. If the amount of returns and allowances attributable to Kentucky gross receipts and the
cost of goods sold attributable to Kentucky gross receipts is zero, then "Kentucky gross profits"
means Kentucky gross receipts; and
2. "Gross profits from all sources" means gross receipts from all sources reduced by returns and
allowances attributable to gross receipts from all sources, less the cost of goods sold attributable
to gross receipts from all sources. If the amount of returns and allowances attributable to gross
receipts from all sources and the cost of goods sold attributable to gross receipts from all sources
is zero, then gross profits from all sources means gross receipts from all sources;
(f) "Direct labor" means labor that is incorporated into the tangible product sold or is an integral part of the
manufacturing process;
(g) "Bulk delivery costs" means the cost of delivering the product to the consumer if:
1. The tangible product is delivered in bulk and requires specialized equipment that generally
precludes commercial shipping; and
2. The tangible product is taxable under KRS 138.220;
(h) "Manufacturing" and "producing" means:
1. Manufacturing, producing, constructing, or assembling components to produce a significantly
different or enhanced end tangible product;
2. Mining or severing natural resources from the earth; or
3. Growing or raising agricultural or horticultural products or animals;
(i) "Real property" means land and anything growing on, attached to, or erected on it, excluding anything
that may be severed without injury to the land;
(j) "Reselling," "retailing," and "wholesaling" mean the sale of a tangible product;
(k) "Tangible personal property" means property, other than real property, that has physical form and
characteristics; and
(l) "Tangible product" means real property and tangible personal property;
(2) (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, an annual limited liability entity tax shall be
paid by every corporation and every limited liability pass-through entity doing business in Kentucky on
all Kentucky gross receipts or Kentucky gross profits except as provided in this subsection. A small
business exclusion from this tax shall be provided based on the reduction contained in this subsection.
The tax shall be the greater of the amount computed under paragraph (b) of this subsection or one
hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), regardless of the application of any tax credits provided under this
chapter or any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes for which the business entity may
qualify.
(b) The limited liability entity tax shall be the lesser of subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph:
1. a. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross receipts from all sources
are three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less, the limited liability entity tax shall be one
hundred seventy-five dollars ($175);
b. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross receipts from all sources
are greater than three million dollars ($3,000,000) but less than six million dollars
($6,000,000), the limited liability entity tax shall be nine and one-half cents ($0.095) per

CHAPTER 161 83
one hundred dollars ($100) of the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's
Kentucky gross receipts reduced by an amount equal to two thousand eight hundred fifty
dollars ($2,850) multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is six million dollars
($6,000,000) less the amount of the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's
Kentucky gross receipts for the taxable year, and the denominator of which is three
million dollars ($3,000,000), but in no case shall the result be less than one hundred
seventy-five dollars ($175);
c. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross receipts from all sources
are equal to or greater than six million dollars ($6,000,000), the limited liability entity tax
shall be nine and one-half cents ($0.095) per one hundred dollars ($100) of the
corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's Kentucky gross receipts.
2. a. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross profits from all sources
are three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less, the limited liability entity tax shall be one
hundred seventy-five dollars ($175);
b. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross profits from all sources
are at least three million dollars ($3,000,000) but less than six million dollars
($6,000,000), the limited liability entity tax shall be seventy-five cents ($0.75) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's
Kentucky gross profits, reduced by an amount equal to twenty-two thousand five hundred
dollars ($22,500) multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is six million dollars
($6,000,000) less the amount of the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's
Kentucky gross profits, and the denominator of which is three million dollars
($3,000,000), but in no case shall the result be less than one hundred seventy-five dollars
($175);
c. If the corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's gross profits from all sources
are equal to or greater than six million dollars ($6,000,000), the limited liability entity tax
shall be seventy-five cents ($0.75) per one hundred dollars ($100) of all of the
corporation's or limited liability pass-through entity's Kentucky gross profits.
In determining eligibility for the reductions contained in this paragraph, a member of an affiliated group
shall consider the total gross receipts and the total gross profits from all sources of the entire affiliated
group, including eliminating entries for transactions among the group.
(c) A credit shall be allowed against the tax imposed under paragraph (a) of this subsection for the current
year to a corporation or limited liability pass-through entity that owns an interest in a limited liability
pass-through entity. The credit shall be the proportionate share of tax calculated under this subsection
by the lower-level pass-through entity, as determined after the amount of tax calculated by the pass-
through entity has been reduced by the minimum tax of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175). The
credit shall apply across multiple layers of a multi-layered pass-through entity structure. The credit at
each layer shall include the credit from each lower layer, after reduction for the minimum tax of one
hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) at each layer.
(d) The department may promulgate administrative regulations to establish a method for calculating the
cost of goods sold attributable to Kentucky.
(3) A nonrefundable credit based on the tax calculated under subsection (2) of this section shall be allowed against
the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040. The credit amount shall be determined as follows:
(a) The credit allowed a corporation subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040 shall be equal to the
amount of tax calculated under subsection (2) of this section for the current year after subtraction of any
credits identified in KRS 141.0205, reduced by the minimum tax of one hundred seventy-five dollars
($175), plus any credit determined in paragraph (b) of this subsection for tax paid by wholly or partially
owned limited liability pass-through entities. The amount of credit allowed to a corporation based on
the amount of tax paid under subsection (2) of this section for the current year shall be applied to the
income tax due from the corporation's activities in this state. Any remaining credit from the corporation
shall be disallowed.
(b) The credit allowed members, shareholders, or partners of a limited liability pass-through entity shall be
the members', shareholders', or partners' proportionate share of the tax calculated under subsection (2)
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

84 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
of this section for the current year after subtraction of any credits identified in KRS 141.0205, as
determined after the amount of tax paid has been reduced by the minimum tax of one hundred seventy-
five dollars ($175). The credit allowed to members, shareholders, or partners of a limited liability pass-
through entity shall be applied to income tax assessed on income from the limited liability pass-through
entity. Any remaining credit from the limited liability pass-through entity shall be disallowed.
(4) Each taxpayer subject to the tax imposed in this section shall file a return, on forms prepared by the
department, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the taxpayer's taxable
year. Any tax remaining due after making the payments required in KRS 141.044 shall be paid by the original
due date of the return.
(5) The department shall prescribe forms and promulgate administrative regulations as needed to administer the
provisions of this section.
(6) The tax imposed by subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) For taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2021:
1. Financial institutions, as defined in KRS 136.500, except banker's banks organized under KRS
287.135 or 286.3-135;
2. Savings and loan associations organized under the laws of this state and under the laws of the
United States and making loans to members only;
3. Banks for cooperatives;
4. Production credit associations;
5. Insurance companies, including farmers' or other mutual hail, cyclone, windstorm, or fire
insurance companies, insurers, and reciprocal underwriters;
6. Corporations or other entities exempt under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code;
7. Religious, educational, charitable, or like corporations not organized or conducted for pecuniary
profit;
8. Corporations whose only owned or leased property located in this state is located at the premises
of a printer with which it has contracted for printing, provided that:
a. The property consists of the final printed product, or copy from which the printed product
is produced; and
b. The corporation has no individuals receiving compensation in this state as provided in
KRS 141.901;
9. Public service corporations subject to tax under KRS 136.120;
10. Open-end registered investment companies organized under the laws of this state and registered
under the Investment Company Act of 1940;
11. Any property or facility which has been certified as a fluidized bed energy production facility[ as
defined in KRS 211.390];
12. An alcohol production facility as defined in KRS 247.910;
13. Real estate investment trusts as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code;
14. Regulated investment companies as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code;
15. Real estate mortgage investment conduits as defined in Section 860D of the Internal Revenue
Code;
16. Personal service corporations as defined in Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
17. Cooperatives described in Sections 521 and 1381 of the Internal Revenue Code, including
farmers' agricultural and other cooperatives organized or recognized under KRS Chapter 272,
advertising cooperatives, purchasing cooperatives, homeowners associations including those
described in Section 528 of the Internal Revenue Code, political organizations as defined in
Section 527 of the Internal Revenue Code, and rural electric and rural telephone cooperatives; or

CHAPTER 161 85
18. Publicly traded partnerships as defined by Section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that are
treated as partnerships for federal tax purposes under Section 7704(c) of the Internal Revenue
Code, or their publicly traded partnership affiliates. "Publicly traded partnership affiliates" shall
include any limited liability company or limited partnership for which at least eighty percent
(80%) of the limited liability company member interests or limited partner interests are owned
directly or indirectly by the publicly traded partnership; and
(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021:
1. Insurance companies, including farmers' or other mutual hail, cyclone, windstorm, or fire
insurance companies, insurers, and reciprocal underwriters;
2. Corporations or other entities exempt under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code;
3. Religious, educational, charitable, or like corporations not organized or conducted for pecuniary
profit;
4. Corporations whose only owned or leased property located in this state is located at the premises
of a printer with which it has contracted for printing, provided that:
a. The property consists of the final printed product, or copy from which the printed product
is produced; and
b. The corporation has no individuals receiving compensation in this state as provided in
KRS 141.901;
5. Public service corporations subject to tax under KRS 136.120;
6. Open-end registered investment companies organized under the laws of this state and registered
under the Investment Company Act of 1940;
7. [Any property or facility which has been certified as a fluidized bed energy production facility as
defined in KRS 211.390;
8. ]An alcohol production facility as defined in KRS 247.910;
8.[9.] Real estate investment trusts as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code;
9.[10.] Regulated investment companies as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code;
10.[11.] Real estate mortgage investment conduits as defined in Section 860D of the Internal
Revenue Code;
11.[12.] Personal service corporations as defined in Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
12.[13.] Cooperatives described in Sections 521 and 1381 of the Internal Revenue Code, including
farmers' agricultural and other cooperatives organized or recognized under KRS Chapter 272,
advertising cooperatives, purchasing cooperatives, homeowners associations including those
described in Section 528 of the Internal Revenue Code, political organizations as defined in
Section 527 of the Internal Revenue Code, and rural electric and rural telephone cooperatives; or
13.[14.] Publicly traded partnerships as defined by Section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
that are treated as partnerships for federal tax purposes under Section 7704(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code, or their publicly traded partnership affiliates. "Publicly traded partnership
affiliates" shall include any limited liability company or limited partnership for which at least
eighty percent (80%) of the limited liability company member interests or limited partner
interests are owned directly or indirectly by the publicly traded partnership.
(7) (a) As used in this subsection, "qualified exempt organization" means an entity listed in subsection (6)(a)
and (b) of this section and shall not include any entity whose exempt status has been disallowed by the
Internal Revenue Service.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any limited liability pass-through entity that is
owned in whole or in part by a qualified exempt organization shall, in calculating its Kentucky gross
receipts or Kentucky gross profits, exclude the proportionate share of its Kentucky gross receipts or
Kentucky gross profits attributable to the ownership interest of the qualified exempt organization.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

86 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Any limited liability pass-through entity that reduces Kentucky gross receipts or Kentucky gross profits
in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection shall disregard the ownership interest of the
qualified exempt organization in determining the amount of credit available under subsection (3) of this
section.
(d) The Department of Revenue may promulgate an administrative regulation to further define "qualified
exempt organization" to include an entity for which exemption is constitutionally or legally required, or
to exclude any entity created primarily for tax avoidance purposes with no legitimate business purpose.
(8) The credit permitted by subsection (3) of this section shall flow through multiple layers of limited liability
pass-through entities and shall be claimed by the taxpayer who ultimately pays the tax on the income of the
limited liability pass-through entity.
Section 52. KRS 141.206 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every pass-through entity doing business in this state shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month
following the close of its annual accounting period, file a copy of its federal tax return with the form
prescribed and furnished by the department.
(2) (a) Pass-through entities shall calculate net income in the same manner as in the case of an individual under
KRS 141.019 and the adjustment required under Sections 703(a) and 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(b) Computation of net income under this section and the computation of the partner's, member's, or
shareholder's distributive share shall be computed as nearly as practicable identical with those required
for federal income tax purposes except to the extent required by differences between this chapter and
the federal income tax law and regulations.
(3) Individuals, estates, trusts, or corporations doing business in this state as a partner, member, or shareholder in a
pass-through entity shall be liable for income tax only in their individual, fiduciary, or corporate capacities,
and no income tax shall be assessed against the net income of any pass-through entity, except as required:
(a) For S corporations under KRS 141.040;
(b) For a partnership level audit under KRS 141.211; and
(c) For a pass-through entity making an election under KRS 141.209.
(4) (a) Every pass-through entity required to file a return under subsection (1) of this section, except publicly
traded partnerships as described in KRS 141.0401(6)(a)18. and (b)13.[14.], shall withhold Kentucky
income tax on the distributive share, whether distributed or undistributed, of each nonresident
individual partner, member, or shareholder.
(b) Withholding shall be at the maximum rate provided in KRS 141.020.
(5) (a) Every pass-through entity required to withhold Kentucky income tax as provided by subsection (4) of
this section shall pay estimated tax for the taxable year, if for a nonresident individual partner, member,
or shareholder, the estimated tax liability can reasonably be expected to exceed five hundred dollars
($500).
(b) The payment of estimated tax shall contain the information and shall be filed as provided in KRS
141.207.
(6) (a) If a pass-through entity demonstrates to the department that a partner, member, or shareholder has filed
an appropriate tax return for the prior year with the department, then the pass-through entity shall not be
required to withhold on that partner, member, or shareholder for the current year unless the exemption
from withholding has been revoked pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) 1. An exemption from withholding shall be considered revoked if the partner, member, or
shareholder does not file and pay all taxes due in a timely manner.
2. An exemption so revoked shall be reinstated only with permission of the department.
3. If a partner, member, or shareholder who has been exempted from withholding does not file a
return or pay the tax due, the department may require the pass-through entity to pay to the
department the amount that should have been withheld, up to the amount of the partner's,
member's, or shareholder's ownership interest in the entity.

CHAPTER 161 87
4. The pass-through entity shall be entitled to recover a payment made pursuant to this paragraph
from the partner, member, or shareholder on whose behalf the payment was made.
(7) In determining the tax under this chapter, a resident individual, estate, or trust that is a partner, member, or
shareholder in a pass-through entity shall take into account the partner's, member's, or shareholder's total
distributive share of the pass-through entity's items of income, loss, deduction, and credit.
(8) In determining the tax under this chapter, a nonresident individual, estate, or trust that is a partner, member, or
shareholder in a pass-through entity required to file a return under subsection (1) of this section shall take into
account:
(a) 1. If the pass-through entity is doing business only in this state, the partner's, member's, or
shareholder's total distributive share of the pass-through entity's items of income, loss, and
deduction; or
2. If the pass-through entity is doing business both within and without this state, the partner's,
member's, or shareholder's distributive share of the pass-through entity's items of income, loss,
and deduction multiplied by the apportionment fraction of the pass-through entity as prescribed
in subsection (11) of this section; and
(b) The partner's, member's, or shareholder's total distributive share of credits of the pass-through entity.
(9) A corporation that is subject to tax under KRS 141.040 and is a partner or member in a pass-through entity
shall take into account the corporation's distributive share of the pass-through entity's items of income, loss,
and deduction and:
(a) 1. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, but prior to January 1, 2018, shall
include the proportionate share of the sales, property, and payroll of the limited liability pass-
through entity or general partnership in computing its own apportionment factor; and
2. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, shall include the proportionate share of
the sales of the limited liability pass-through entity or general partnership in computing its own
apportionment factor; and
(b) Credits from the partnership.
(10) (a) If a pass-through entity is doing business both within and without this state, the pass-through entity
shall compute and furnish to each partner, member, or shareholder the numerator and denominator of
each factor of the apportionment fraction determined in accordance with subsection (11) of this section.
(b) For purposes of determining an apportionment fraction under paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the
pass-through entity is:
1. Doing business both within and without this state; and
2. A partner or member in another pass-through entity;
then the pass-through entity shall be deemed to own the pro rata share of the property owned or leased
by the other pass-through entity, and shall also include its pro rata share of the other pass-through
entity's payroll and sales.
(c) The phrases "a partner or member in another pass-through entity" and "doing business both within and
without this state" shall extend to each level of multiple-tiered pass-through entities.
(d) The attribution to the pass-through entity of the pro rata share of property, payroll and sales from its
role as a partner or member in another pass-through entity will also apply when determining the pass-
through entity's ultimate apportionment factor for property, payroll and sales as required under
subsection (11) of this section.
(11) (a) For taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2018, a pass-through entity doing business within and
without the state shall compute an apportionment fraction, the numerator of which is the property
factor, representing twenty-five percent (25%) of the fraction, plus the payroll factor, representing
twenty-five percent (25%) of the fraction, plus the sales factor, representing fifty percent (50%) of the
fraction, with each factor determined in the same manner as provided in KRS 141.901, and the
denominator of which is four (4), reduced by the number of factors, if any, having no denominator,
provided that if the sales factor has no denominator, then the denominator shall be reduced by two (2).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

88 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, a pass-through entity doing business within and
without the state shall compute an apportionment fraction as provided in KRS 141.120.
(12) Resident individuals, estates, or trusts that are partners in a partnership, members of a limited liability
company electing partnership tax treatment for federal income tax purposes, owners of single member limited
liability companies, or shareholders in an S corporation which does not do business in this state are subject to
tax under KRS 141.020 on federal net income, gain, deduction, or loss passed through the partnership, limited
liability company, or S corporation.
(13) An S corporation election made in accordance with Section 1362 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal tax
purposes is a binding election for Kentucky tax purposes.
(14) (a) Nonresident individuals shall not be taxable on investment income distributed by a qualified investment
partnership. For purposes of this subsection, a "qualified investment partnership" means a pass-through
entity that, during the taxable year, holds only investments that produce income that would not be
taxable to a nonresident individual if held or owned individually.
(b) A qualified investment partnership shall be subject to all other provisions relating to a pass-through
entity under this section and shall not be subject to the tax imposed under KRS 141.040 or 141.0401.
(15) (a) A pass-through entity shall deliver to the department a return upon a form prescribed by the department
showing the total amounts paid or credited to its nonresident individual partners, members, or
shareholders, the amount paid in accordance with this subsection, and any other information the
department may require.
(b) A pass-through entity shall furnish to its nonresident partner, member, or shareholder annually, but not
later than the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the end of its taxable year, a record of the amount
of tax paid on behalf of the partner, member, or shareholder on a form prescribed by the department.
Section 53. KRS 141.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "code" or "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue Code in effect
as of December 31, 1981.
(2) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed as a credit for any taxpayer
against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401 for any taxable year, with the ordering of
the credits as provided in KRS 141.0205, an amount equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each person hired
by the taxpayer, if that person has been classified as unemployed by the Office of Unemployment Insurance in
the Education and Labor Cabinet and has been so classified for at least sixty (60) days prior to his employment
by the taxpayer, and if further that person has remained in the employ of the taxpayer for at least one hundred
eighty (180) consecutive days during the taxable year in which the taxpayer claims the credit.
(3) No credit shall be allowed to any taxpayer for any person hired under any of the following circumstances:
(a) A person for whom the taxpayer receives federally funded payments for on-the-job training;
(b) For any person who bears any of the relationships to the taxpayer described in paragraphs (1) through
(8) of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, or, if the taxpayer is a corporation, to an individual
who owns, directly or indirectly, more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the
corporation as determined with the application of Section 267(c) of the code;
(c) If the taxpayer is an estate or trust, to any person who is a grantor, beneficiary, or fiduciary of the estate
or trust, or is an individual who bears any of the relationships described in paragraphs (1) through (8) of
Section 152(a) of the code to a grantor, beneficiary, or fiduciary of the estate or trust; or
(d) To any person who is a dependent of the taxpayer as described in code Section 152(a)(9), or, if the
taxpayer is an estate or trust, of a grantor, beneficiary, or fiduciary of the estate or trust.
(4) For purposes of this section, all employees of all corporations which are members of the same controlled group
of corporations shall be treated as employed by a single employer. In no instance shall the credit, if any,
allowable by subsection (2) of this section for any employee qualified thereunder be claimed more than once
for any taxable year by such a controlled group of corporations. For purposes of this subsection, the term
"controlled group of corporations" has the meaning given to that term by code Section 1563(a), except that
"more than fifty percent (50%)" shall be substituted for "at least eighty percent (80%)" each place it appears in
code Section 1563(a)(1), and the determination shall be made without regard to subsections (a)(4) and (e)(3)(c)
of code Section 1563.

CHAPTER 161 89
(5) For purposes of this section, all employees of trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) which are
under common control shall be treated as employed by a single employer, and in no instance shall the credit, if
any, allowable by subsection (2) of this section for any employee qualified thereunder be claimed more than
once for any taxable year.
(6) No credit shall be allowed under subsection (2) of this section to any organization which is exempt from
income tax by this chapter.
(7) In the case of a pass-through entity, the amount of the credit determined under this section for any taxable year
shall be applied at the entity level against the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 and shall
also be apportioned pro rata among the members, partners, or shareholders of the limited liability entity on the
last day of the taxable year, and any person to whom an amount is so apportioned shall be allowed, subject to
code Section 53, a credit under subsection (2) of this section for that amount.
(8) In the case of an estate or trust, the amount of the credit determined under this section for any taxable year
shall be apportioned between the estate or trust and the beneficiaries on the basis of income of the estate or
trust allocable to each, and any beneficiary to whom any amount has been apportioned under this subsection
shall be allowed, subject to code Section 53, a credit under subsection (2) of this section for that amount.
(9) In no event shall the credit allowed, pursuant to this section, for any taxable year exceed the tax liability of the
taxpayer for the taxable year.
(10) (a) By November 1, 2026, and each November 1 thereafter as long as credit is claimed under this
section, the department shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue:
1. The total number of returns claiming the credit for the taxable year;
2. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year;
3. By county, the total number of unemployed persons hired for which credit is claimed for the
taxable year;
4. By taxpayer:
a. The name and location of the taxpayer claiming the credit as listed on the tax return;
b. The total number of tax credits claimed for the taxable year;
c. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year; and
d. The total number of unemployed persons hired in which credit is claimed for the
taxable year; and
5. a. In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, based on ranges of adjusted gross
income of no larger than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total
amount of credit claimed and the total number of returns claiming this credit for each
adjusted gross income range.
b. In the case of corporations, based on ranges of net income of no larger than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of credit claimed and
the total number of returns claiming this credit for each net income range.
(b) The Office of Unemployment Insurance shall assist by providing the department with the
information necessary to help fulfill the requirements under this subsection.
(c) The information required to be reported under this subsection shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 54. KRS 141.412 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2028, a qualified farming operation shall be entitled to a
nonrefundable credit against the Kentucky income tax liability established pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on any income of the qualified farming operation generated by or arising out of the qualified farming
operation's participation in a networking project, and against the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS
141.0401 on any Kentucky gross profits or Kentucky gross receipts of the qualified farming operation
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

90 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
generated by or arising out of the qualified farming operation's participation in a networking project. The
credits shall be applied as provided in KRS 141.0205. The annual credit shall be available for the first five (5)
years that the farming operation is involved in the networking project. The annual credit shall be equal to the
approved costs incurred by the qualified farming operation during the tax year and shall not exceed the
income, Kentucky gross profits or Kentucky gross receipts, as the case may be, of the qualified farming
operation generated by or arising out of the qualified farming operation's participation in a networking project.
(2) Any credit not used in the tax year in which it first becomes available may be carried forward to the next
succeeding five (5) tax years until the credit has been fully used. The aggregate credit used in any tax year
shall not exceed the income, Kentucky gross profits or Kentucky gross receipts, as the case may be, of the
qualified farming operation generated by or arising out of the qualified farming operation's participation in a
networking project in that tax year.
(3) (a) By November 1, 2026, and each November 1 thereafter as long as a qualified farming operation
credit is claimed under this section, the department shall report to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue:
1. The total number of returns claiming the credit for the taxable year;
2. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year;
3. By taxpayer:
a. The name and location of the taxpayer claiming the credit as listed on the tax return;
b. The total number of tax credits claimed for the taxable year;
c. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year;
d. The name and location, by county, of the networking project;
e. Type of food or product produced; and
f. Type of raw materials provided for food-producing facilities in this state; and
4. a. In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, based on ranges of adjusted gross
income of no larger than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total
amount of credit claimed and the total number of returns claiming this credit for each
adjusted gross income range.
b. In the case of corporations, based on ranges of net income of no larger than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of credit claimed and
the total number of returns claiming this credit for each net income range.
(b) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall assist by providing the department with information on
the approved farming operations or networking projects to help fulfill the requirements under this
subsection.
(c) The information required to be reported under this subsection shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 55. KRS 141.0101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The provisions of subsections (2) to (11) of this section shall apply to taxable years beginning before
January 1, 1994.
(b) The provisions of subsections (12) to (15) of this section shall apply to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 1993.
(c) The provisions of subsection (16) of this section apply to property placed in service after September 10,
2001.
(2) For property placed in service prior to January 1, 1990, in lieu of the depreciation and expense deductions
allowed under Internal Revenue Code Sections 168 and 179, a deduction for a reasonable allowance for
depreciation, exhaustion, wear and tear, and obsolescence of property used in a trade or business shall be
allowed and computed as set out in subsections (3) to (11) of this section. For property placed in service after
December 31, 1989, the depreciation and expense deductions allowed under Sections 168 and 179 of the
Internal Revenue Code shall be allowed.

CHAPTER 161 91
(3) Effective August 1, 1985, "reasonable allowance" as used in subsection (2) of this section shall mean
depreciation computed in accordance with Section 167 of the Internal Revenue Code and related regulations in
effect on December 31, 1980, for all property placed in service on or after January 1, 1981, except as provided
in subsections (6) to (8) of this section.
(4) Depreciation of property placed in service prior to January 1, 1981, shall be computed under Section 167 of
the Internal Revenue Code, and the method elected thereunder at the time the property was first placed in
service or as changed with the approval of the Commissioner of Internal Revenue Service or as required by
changes in federal regulations.
(5) Taxpayers other than corporations shall be allowed to deduct as depreciation on recovery property placed in
service before August 1, 1985, an amount calculated under Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code subject
to the provisions of subsections (6) and (8) of this section. Corporations with a taxable year beginning on or
after July 1, 1984, and before August 1, 1985, shall calculate a deduction for depreciation on recovery property
placed in service prior to August 1, 1985, using either of the following alternative methods:
(a) Dividing the total of the deductions allowed under Internal Revenue Code Section 168 by one and four
tenths (1.4); and
(b) Calculating the deduction that would be allowed or allowable under the provisions of Section 167 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(6) Recovery property placed in service on or after January 1, 1981, and before August 1, 1985, and subject to
transition under subsection (8) of this section, shall be subject to depreciation under Section 167 of the Internal
Revenue Code, restricted to the straight line method therein provided over the remaining useful life of such
assets.
(7) Depreciation of property placed in service on or after August 1, 1985, shall be computed under Section 167 of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(8) Transition from Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, Accelerated Cost Recovery System (ACRS)
depreciation, to the depreciation allowed or allowable under this section shall be reported in the first taxable
year beginning on or after August 1, 1985. To implement the transition, the following adjustments shall be
made:
(a) Taxpayers other than corporations shall use the adjusted Kentucky basis for property placed in service
on or after January 1, 1981. "Adjusted Kentucky basis" means the basis used for determining
depreciation under Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code less the allowed or allowable depreciation
and adjustment for election to expense an asset (Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code);
(b) Corporations shall adjust the federal unadjusted basis by increasing such basis by the ACRS
depreciation not allowed as a deduction in determining Kentucky net income for tax years beginning
after June 30, 1984, less allowed or allowable ACRS depreciation for federal income tax purposes.
Corporations will not be permitted to adjust the basis by the ACRS depreciation not allowed for
Kentucky income tax purposes in tax years beginning on or before June 30, 1984.
(9) A taxpayer may elect to treat the cost of property placed in service on or before July 31, 1985, as an expense as
provided in Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 1981, except that the
aggregate cost which may be expensed for corporations shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). A
taxpayer may elect to treat the cost of property placed in service on or after August 1, 1985, as an expense as
provided in Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 1980. Computations,
limitations, definitions, exceptions, and other provisions of Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code and
related regulations shall be construed to govern the computation of the allowable deduction.
(10) Upon the sale, exchange, or disposition of any depreciable property placed in service on or after January 1,
1981, capital gains or losses and the amount of ordinary income determined under the provisions of the
Internal Revenue Code shall be computed for Kentucky income tax purposes as follows:
(a) Compute the Kentucky unadjusted basis which is the cost of the asset reduced by any basis adjustment
made by the taxpayer under Section 48(q)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code and any expense allowed
and utilized under Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code (First Year Expense) in determining
Kentucky net income in prior years, and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

92 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Compute the adjusted basis by subtracting the depreciation allowed or allowable for Kentucky income
tax purposes from the unadjusted basis, except corporations will not be permitted to adjust the basis of
assets by the ACRS depreciation not allowed for Kentucky income tax purposes in the tax years
beginning on or before June 30, 1984, and
(c) Compute the gain or loss by subtracting the adjusted basis from the value received from the disposition
of the depreciable property, and
(d) Compute the recapture of depreciation required under Sections 1245 through 1256 of the Internal
Revenue Code and related regulations, and
(e) Unless otherwise provided in this subsection the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and related
regulations governing the determination of capital gains or losses shall apply for Kentucky income tax
purposes.
(11) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, the basis of property placed in service prior to January 1, 1990, for
purposes of Kentucky income tax shall be the basis, adjusted or unadjusted, required to be used under Section
167 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 1980.
(12) As used in this subsection to subsection (14) of this section:
(a) "Transition property" means any property placed in service before the first day of the first taxable year
beginning after December 31, 1993, and owned by the taxpayer on the first day of the first taxable year
beginning after December 31, 1993.
(b) "Adjusted Kentucky basis" means the amount computed in accordance with the provisions of paragraph
(b) of subsection (10) of this section for transition property.
(c) "Adjusted federal basis" means the original cost, or, in the case of Section 338 property, the adjusted
grossed-up basis of transition property less:
1. Any basis adjustments required by the Internal Revenue Code for credits; and
2. The total accumulated depreciation and election to expense deductions allowed or allowable for
federal income tax purposes.
(d) "Section 338 property" means property to which an adjusted grossed-up basis has been allocated
pursuant to a valid election made by a purchasing corporation under the provisions of Section 338 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(e) "Transition amount" means the net difference between the adjusted Kentucky basis and the adjusted
federal basis of all transition property determined as of the first day of the first taxable year beginning
after December 31, 1993.
(13) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1993, the amounts of depreciation and election to expense
deductions, allowed or allowable, the basis of assets, adjusted or unadjusted, and the gain or loss from the sale
or other disposition of assets shall be the same for Kentucky income tax purposes as determined under Chapter
1 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(14) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1993, the transition amount computed in accordance with the
provisions of paragraph (e) of subsection (12) of this section shall be reported by the taxpayer as follows:
(a) In the first taxable year beginning after December 31, 1993, and the eleven (11) succeeding taxable
years, the taxpayer shall include in gross income one-twelfth (1/12) of the transition amount if:
1. The adjusted federal basis of transition property exceeds the adjusted Kentucky basis of
transition property;
2. The transition amount exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000);
3. The transition amount includes property for which an election was made under Section 338 of
the Internal Revenue Code; and
4. The taxpayer elects the provisions of this paragraph with the filing of an amended income tax
return for the first taxable year beginning after December 31, 1993.
(b) In the first taxable year beginning after December 31, 1993 and the three (3) succeeding taxable years,
if the transition amount exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or if the transition amount
does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and the taxpayer elects the provision of this

CHAPTER 161 93
paragraph with the filing of the income tax return for the first taxable year beginning after December
31, 1993, the taxpayer shall:
1. Deduct from gross income twenty-five percent (25%) of the transition amount if the adjusted
Kentucky basis of transition property exceeds the adjusted federal basis of transition property; or
2. Add to gross income twenty-five percent (25%) of the transition amount if the adjusted federal
basis of transition property exceeds the adjusted Kentucky basis of transition property.
(c) In the first taxable year beginning after December 31, 1993, if the transition amount does not exceed
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and the taxpayer does not elect the provisions of paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the taxpayer shall:
1. Deduct from gross income the total transition amount if the adjusted Kentucky basis of transition
property exceeds the adjusted federal basis of transition property; or
2. Add to gross income the total transition amount if the adjusted federal basis of transition property
exceeds the adjusted Kentucky basis of transition property.
(15) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2028, notwithstanding any other provision of this section to
the contrary, any qualified farming operation, as defined in KRS 141.410, shall be allowed to compute the
depreciation deduction for new buildings and equipment purchased to enable participation in a networking
project, as defined in KRS 141.410, on an accelerated basis at two (2) times the rate that would otherwise be
permitted under the provisions of this section. The accumulated depreciation allowed under this subsection
shall not exceed the taxpayer's basis in such property.
(16) (a) For property placed in service after September 10, 2001, only the depreciation deduction allowed under
Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 2001, exclusive of any
amendments made subsequent to that date, shall be allowed.
(b) For property placed in service after September 10, 2001, but prior to January 1, 2020, only the expense
deduction allowed under Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 2001,
exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date, shall be allowed.
(c) For property placed in service on or after January 1, 2020, only the expense deduction allowed under
Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 2003, exclusive of any
amendments made subsequent to that date, shall be allowed, except that the phase-out provisions of
Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, limiting the qualifying investment in property, shall not
apply.
Section 56. KRS 151B.402 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly recognizes the critical condition of the educational level of Kentucky's adult population
and seeks to stimulate the attendance at, and successful completion of, programs that provide a High School
Equivalency Diploma. Incentives shall be provided to full-time employees who complete a High School
Equivalency Diploma program within one (1) year and their employers.
(2) The Office of Adult Education within the Department of Workforce Development in the Education and Labor
Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the operational procedures for this section.
The administrative regulations shall include but not be limited to the criteria for:
(a) A learning contract that includes the process to develop a learning contract between the student and the
adult education instructor with the employer's agreement to participate and support the student;
(b) Attendance reports that validate that the student is enrolled and studying for the High School
Equivalency Diploma during the release time from work; and
(c) Final reports that qualify the student for the tuition discounts under subsection (3)(a) of this section and
that qualify the employer for tax credits under subsection (4) of the section.
(3) (a) An individual who has been out of secondary school for at least three (3) years, develops and
successfully completes a learning contract that requires a minimum of five (5) hours per week to study
for the High School Equivalency Diploma program, and successfully earns a High School Equivalency
Diploma shall earn a tuition discount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per semester for a maximum
of four (4) semesters at one (1) of Kentucky's public postsecondary institutions.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

94 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The program shall work with the postsecondary institutions to establish notification procedures for
students who qualify for the tuition discount.
(4) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2028, an employer who assists an individual to complete his
or her learning contract under the provisions of this section shall receive a state tax credit against the income
tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with
credit ordering as provided in KRS 141.0205 for a portion of the released time given to the employee to study
for the tests. The application for the tax credit shall be supported with attendance documentation provided by
the Office of Adult Education and calculated by multiplying fifty percent (50%) of the hours released for study
by the student's hourly salary, and not to exceed a credit of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1250).
(5) (a) By November 1, 2026, and each November 1 thereafter as long as the employer High School
Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit is claimed under this section, the department shall
report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue:
1. The total number of returns claiming the credit for the taxable year;
2. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year;
3. By county, the total:
a. Number of employers participating in the High School Equivalency Diploma program;
b. Amount of High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit claimed; and
c. Number of full-time employees who complete the High School Equivalency Diploma
program;
4. By taxpayer:
a. The name and location of the taxpayer claiming the credit as listed on the tax return;
b. The total number of tax credits claimed for the taxable year;
c. The total amount of credit claimed for the taxable year; and
d. The number of individuals assisted with completion of the High School Equivalency
Diploma for the taxable year; and
5. a. In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, based on ranges of adjusted gross
income of no larger than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total
amount of credit claimed and the total number of returns claiming this credit for each
adjusted gross income range.
b. In the case of corporations, based on ranges of net income of no larger than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of credit claimed and
the total number of returns claiming this credit for each net income range.
(b) The Office of Adult Education shall assist by providing the department with the information
necessary to help fulfill the requirements under this subsection.
(c) The information required to be reported under this subsection shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 57. KRS 171.396 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 171.3961 and 171.397 and Section 59 of this Act:
(1) "Affordable" means the occupant's housing costs, including utilities, total thirty percent (30%) or less of
the occupant's gross income;
(2) "Certified historic structure" means a structure that is located within the Commonwealth of Kentucky that is:
(a) Listed individually on the National Register of Historic Places; or
(b) Located in a historic district listed on the National Register of Historic Places and is certified by the
council as contributing to the historic significance of the district;

CHAPTER 161 95
(3)[(2)] "Certified rehabilitation" means a completed substantial rehabilitation of a certified historic structure
that the council certifies meets the United States Secretary of the Interior's Standards for Rehabilitation;
(4)[(3)] "Certified rehabilitation credit cap" means an annual amount of [:
(a) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for applications received prior to April 30, 2010;
(b) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for applications received on or after April 30, 2010, but before April
30, 2022; and
(c) ]one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for applications received on or after:
(a) April 30, 2022, but before April 30, 2026, allocated with:
1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the credit cap awarded to owner-occupied residential property; and
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the credit cap awarded to property other than owner-occupied
residential property, which includes the major certified rehabilitation allowed under KRS
171.3963; and
(b) April 30, 2026, but before April 15, 2027, and on or before each April 15 thereafter, allocated with:
1. Fifteen percent (15%) of the credit cap awarded to owner-occupied residential property; and
2. Eighty-five percent (85%) of the credit cap awarded to property other than owner-occupied
residential property, including commercial residential property;
plus any amounts[amount] added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap pursuant to KRS 171.397(2)(c) and
Section 59 of this Act;
(5)[(4)] "Commercial residential property" means a certified historic structure that:
(a) Is not owner-occupied residential property;
(b) Has a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of its square footage designated to residential space which
shall be available for lease, rent, or sale upon completion of the rehabilitation; and
(c) Is affordable to individuals earning eighty percent (80%) or less of the median family income for a
minimum of five (5) years after the building is placed in service;
(6) "Council" means the Kentucky Heritage Council;
(7)[(5)] "Disqualifying work" means work that is performed within three (3) years of the completion of the
certified rehabilitation that, if performed as part of the rehabilitation certified under KRS 171.397 and Section
59 of this Act, would have made the rehabilitation ineligible for certification;
(8)[(6)] "Exempt entity" means any tax exempt organization pursuant to sec. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, any state or local agency, board, or commission, or any
quasi-governmental entity;
(9)[(7)] "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local
government;
(10)[(8)] "Median family income" means the median family income for the county in which the residence is
located as determined by the most recent American Community Survey Five-Year Estimate;
(11) "Owner-occupied residential property" means a building or portion thereof, condominium, or cooperative
occupied by the owner as his or her principal residence;
(12)[(9)] "Qualified rehabilitation expense" means any amount that is properly chargeable to a capital account,
whether or not depreciation is allowed under Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, and is expended at
any time in connection with the certified rehabilitation of a certified historic structure. It shall include the cost
of restoring landscaping and fencing that contributes to the historic significance of this structure, but shall not
include the cost of acquisition of a certified historic structure, enlargement of or additions to an existing
building, or the purchase of personal property;
(13)[(10)] "Substantial rehabilitation" means rehabilitation of a certified historic structure for which the qualified
rehabilitation expenses, during a twenty-four (24) month period selected by the taxpayer or exempt entity,
ending with or within the taxable year, exceed:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

96 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for an owner-occupied residential property; or
(b) For all other property, the greater of:
1. The adjusted basis of the structure; or
2. Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);
(14)[(11)] "Taxpayer" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, business development
corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint stock company,
receivership, trust, professional service organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted
that:
(a) Elects to claim the credit on a return and receive a refund as provided in KRS 171.397(2)(b)2.a. and
Section 59 of this Act; or
(b) Is the recipient of a credit which is transferred as provided in KRS 171.397(2)(b)2.b. and Section 59 of
this Act; and
(15)[(12)] "Qualified purchased historic home" means any substantially rehabilitated certified historic structure if:
(a) The taxpayer claiming the credit authorized under KRS 171.397 and Section 59 of this Act is the first
purchaser of the structure after the date of completion of the substantial rehabilitation;
(b) The structure or a portion thereof will be the principal residence of the taxpayer; and
(c) No credit was allowed to the seller under this section.
A qualified purchased historic home shall be deemed owner-occupied residential property for purposes of this
section.
Section 58. KRS 171.397 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For all applications for a preliminary approval received prior to April 30, 2010, there shall be allowed
as a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020, 141.040, 141.0401, or 136.505, an amount equal
to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of owner-occupied
residential property; and
2. Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of all other property.
In the case of an exempt entity that has incurred qualified rehabilitation expenses, the credit provided in
this subsection shall be available to transfer or assign as provided under subsection (8) or (9) of this
section.
(b) For applications for preliminary approval received on or after April 30, 2010, the credit shall be
refundable if the taxpayer makes an election under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2) (a) A taxpayer seeking the credit provided under subsection (1) of this section shall file an application for a
preliminary determination of maximum credit eligibility before April 30 of the year in which the
proposed project will begin. The application shall describe the project and shall include documentation
supporting the qualification of the project for the credit, the proposed start date, the proposed
completion date, the projected qualified rehabilitation expenses, and any other information the council
may require. The council shall determine the preliminary maximum credit available for each taxpayer
and shall notify the taxpayer of that amount by June 30 of the year in which the application was filed. If
total credits applied for in any year exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, plus any amounts
added to the cap pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the provisions of subsection (5) of this
section shall be applied to reduce the approved credits for all taxpayers with qualifying applications for
that year.
(b) 1. An application for a final determination of credit shall be submitted to the council upon
completion of the project.
2. The application shall include an irrevocable election by the taxpayer to:
a. Use the credit, in which case, the credit shall be refundable; or
b. Transfer the credit.

CHAPTER 161 97
3. The council shall determine the final amount of credit approved for each taxpayer based upon the
actual expenditures, preliminary determination of maximum credit, and a determination that the
expenditures are qualified rehabilitation expenses.
4. The council shall notify the taxpayer and Department of Revenue of the final approved credit
amount within sixty (60) days of the receipt of a completed application from the taxpayer.
(c) 1. If the total amount of credits finally approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (b) of this
subsection are less than the credits initially approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the difference between the two (2) amounts shall be added to the certified
rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
2. If the total amount of credits approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection in any calendar
year is less than the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the difference between the credits actually
awarded and the certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be added to the certified rehabilitation
credit cap for the next calendar year.
(3) (a) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied residential property shall be
one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit in
this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.
(b) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to all other property that is not owner-occupied
residential shall be ten million dollars ($10,000,000) subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit
in this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.
(4) In the case of a husband and wife filing separate returns or filing separately on a joint return, the credit may be
taken by either or divided equally, but the combined credit shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($120,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (3)(a) of this section, or ten million dollars
($10,000,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (3)(b) of this section, subject to the provisions of
subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The credit amount approved for a calendar year for all taxpayers under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be
limited to the certified rehabilitation credit cap. When the total credits applied for and approved in any year
under subsection (2)(a) of this section exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the council shall apportion
the certified rehabilitation credit cap as follows: The certified rehabilitation credit cap for the year under
consideration shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator which is the approved credit amount for an
individual taxpayer for a calendar year and the denominator which is the total approved credits for all
taxpayers for a calendar year.
(6) (a) For all applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the credit amount that may be claimed in any tax
year as determined under subsections (3) to (5) of this section exceeds the taxpayer's total tax liabilities
under KRS 136.505, 141.020, or 141.040 and 141.0401, the taxpayer may carry the excess tax credit
forward until the tax credit is used, provided that any tax credits not used within seven (7) years of the
taxable year the certified rehabilitation was complete shall be lost.
(b) For all applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the credit amount that may be claimed in any
tax year as determined under subsections (3) to (5) of this section exceeds the taxpayer's total tax
liabilities under KRS 136.505, 141.020, or 141.040 and 141.0401, the taxpayer may receive a refund, if
the taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(7) (a) The credit shall apply against both the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and the limited liability
entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205.
(b) 1. For applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not
subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level
against the limited liability tax entity imposed by KRS 141.0401, and shall also pass the credit
through in the same proportion as the distributive share of income or loss is passed through.
2. For applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not
subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level
against the limited liability tax entity imposed by KRS 141.0401, and may receive a refund if the
taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection (2)(b)2.a. of this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

98 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) Credits received under this section may be transferred or assigned if an election is made under subsection
(2)(b) of this section, for some or no consideration, along with any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and
liabilities to a financial institution as defined in KRS 141.010 subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.505,
141.040, or 141.0401. Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of credits, the party transferring the
credits shall notify the Department of Revenue of:
(a) The name, address, employer identification number, and bank routing and transfer number, of the party
to which the credits are transferred;
(b) The amount of credits transferred; and
(c) Any additional information the Department of Revenue deems necessary.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a successor or beneficiary of a
taxpayer.
(9) For purposes of this section, a lessee of a certified historic structure shall be treated as the owner of the
structure if the remaining term of the lease is not less than the minimum period promulgated by administrative
regulation by the council.
(10) The taxes imposed in KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401 shall not apply to any consideration received for
the transfer, sale, assignment, or use of a tax credit approved under this section.
(11) The Department of Revenue shall assess a penalty on any taxpayer or exempt entity that performs
disqualifying work, as determined by the Kentucky Heritage Council, on a certified historic structure for
which a rehabilitation has been certified under this section in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%)
of the tax credit allowed on the rehabilitation. Any penalties shall be assessed against the property owner who
performs the disqualifying work and not against any transferee of the credits.
(12) The council may impose fees for processing applications for tax credits, not to exceed the actual cost
associated with processing the applications.
(13) The council may authorize a local government to perform an initial review of applications for the credit
allowed under this section and forward the applications to the council with its recommendations.
(14) The council and the Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to establish policies and procedures to implement the provisions of
subsections (1) to (13) of this section.
(15) The tax credit authorized by this section shall apply to tax periods ending on or after December 31, 2005.
(16) This section applies to applications received before April 30, 2026.
SECTION 59. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 171 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) This section applies to applications received on or after April 30, 2026, but before April 15, 2027, and on or
after each April 15 thereafter.
(2) (a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the taxes imposed in KRS 136.320, 136.330, 136.340,
136.350, 136.370, 136.390, 304.3-270, 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be equal to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of owner-occupied
residential property;
2. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses if the commercial residential
property is affordable to households earning eighty percent (80%) of the median family
income or less; or
3. Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of all other property.
(b) In the case of an exempt entity that has incurred qualified rehabilitation expenses, the credit
provided in this subsection shall be available to transfer or assign as provided under subsection (8) of
this section.
(c) The credit shall be refundable if the taxpayer makes an election under subsection (3)(b) of this
section.

CHAPTER 161 99
(d) An insurance company claiming a tax credit against the insurance premiums tax is not required to
pay additional retaliatory tax levied pursuant to KRS 304.3-270.
(3) (a) 1. A taxpayer seeking the credit provided under subsection (2) of this section shall file an
application for a preliminary determination of maximum credit eligibility before:
a. April 15; or
b. August 15
of the year in which the proposed project will begin.
2. The certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be allocated as follows, including any amounts
added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection:
a. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for applications received before the date established
in subparagraph 1.a. of this paragraph, except that the amount shall not exceed one
hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), including any amounts added under paragraph
(c) of this subsection from a prior allocation period; and
b. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for applications received before the date established
in subparagraph 1.b. .of this paragraph, except that the amount shall not exceed one
hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), including any amounts added under paragraph
(c) of this subsection from a prior allocation period.
3. In the event the full allocation in subparagraph (a)2.a. of this paragraph is not utilized for
applications received by April 15, the remainder shall be made available for applications
received in accordance with subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph, not to exceed fifty percent
(50%) of the total credit cap allocated in each application round under subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph.
4. If the total amount of preliminary approvals for all applications received in a single
application round under subparagraph 1.a. or 2.a. of this paragraph exceeds the cap of fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000) plus any amounts added to the credit cap, the council shall
apportion the certified rehabilitation credit cap as follows:
a. The certified rehabilitation credit cap for the application round under consideration
shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator which is the approved credit amount for
an individual taxpayer for an application round and the denominator which is the total
approved credits for all taxpayers for an application round; and
b. Each taxpayer shall receive no more than their pro rata share of the certified
rehabilitation credit cap allocated for the corresponding application round.
5. Applications submitted for preliminary approval shall be reviewed in the order in which they
are received based on the date of the application.
6. The application shall describe the project and shall include documentation supporting the
qualification of the project for the credit, the proposed start date, the proposed completion
date, the projected qualified rehabilitation expenses, and any other information the council
may require.
7. The council shall determine the preliminary maximum credit available for each taxpayer and
shall notify the taxpayer of that amount by:
a. June 30 for applications received on or before April 15 of the year in which the
application was filed; or
b. October 30 for applications received on or before August 15 of the year in which the
application was filed.
(b) 1. An application for a final determination of credit shall be submitted to the council upon
completion of the project. A taxpayer who is no longer the owner of the certified historic
structure may apply for final determination of credit as long as the taxpayer received
preliminary approval under paragraph (a)7. of this subsection and substantially rehabilitated
the certified historic structure.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

100 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. The application shall include an irrevocable election by the taxpayer to:
a. Use the credit, in which case, the credit shall be refundable; or
b. Transfer the credit in accordance with subsection (8) of this section, in which case the
credit shall be nonrefundable.
3. The council shall determine the final amount of credit approved for each taxpayer based upon
the actual expenditures, preliminary determination of maximum credit, and a determination
that the expenditures are qualified rehabilitation expenses.
4. The council shall notify the taxpayer and Department of Revenue of the final approved credit
amount within sixty (60) days of the receipt of a completed application from the taxpayer.
(c) 1. If the total amount of credits finally approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (b) of this
subsection is less than the amount of the credits initially approved for a taxpayer under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the difference between the two (2) amounts shall be added to
the certified rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year, except that in no case shall
the amount allocated under paragraph (a)2.a. or b. of this subsection exceed one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000), including any amounts added to the certified rehabilitation
credit cap from prior calendar years. Any amount exceeding the one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) threshold is null and void as a carryover to any other allocation period.
2. If the total amount of credits approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection in any calendar
year is less than the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the difference between the credits
actually awarded and the certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be added to the certified
rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
3. If the entire credit cap allocated for applications in paragraph (b) of this subsection is not
entirely utilized for preliminary applications received under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the remaining portion shall be made available for all other properties having submitted
preliminary applications within the same application round regardless of property type.
(4) (a) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied residential property shall
be one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) subject to subsection (6) of this section. The
credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is
completed.
(b) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to all other property that is not owner-
occupied residential shall be ten million dollars ($10,000,000) subject to subsection (6) of this
section. The credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified
rehabilitation is completed.
(5) In the case of two (2) spouses filing separate returns or filing separately on a joint return, the credit may be
taken by either or divided equally, but the combined credit shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($120,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (4)(a) of this section, or ten million dollars
($10,000,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (4)(b) of this section, subject to the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section.
(6) The credit amount approved for a calendar year for all taxpayers under subsection (3)(a) of this section
shall be limited to the certified rehabilitation credit cap.
(7) (a) The credit shall apply against the tax imposed by:
1. KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with the
ordering of the credits as provided in KRS 141.0205; and
2. KRS 136.320, 136.330, 136.40, 136.350, 136.360, 136.370, 136.390, or 304.3-270.
(b) If the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the taxpayer
shall apply the credit at the entity level against the limited liability the credit at the entity level against
the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, and shall also pass the credit through in the
same proportion as the distributive share of income or loss is passed through.
(8) (a) Credits received under this section may be transferred or assigned if an election is made under
subsection (3)(b) of this section, for some or no consideration, along with any related benefits, rights,
responsibilities, and liabilities to any person or entity subject to the taxes imposed in:

CHAPTER 161 101
1. KRS 141.020, or 141.040 and 141.0401; or
2. KRS 136.320, 136.330, 136.340, 136.350, 136.360, 136.370, 136.390, or 304.3-270.
(b) Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of credits, the party transferring the credits shall
notify the Department of Revenue of:
1. The name, address, employer identification number, and bank routing and transfer number,
of the party to which the credits are transferred;
2. The amount of credits transferred; and
3. Any additional information the Department of Revenue deems necessary.
(b) Any taxpayer receiving transferred credit under this subsection may carry forward unused credit for
a period not to exceed seven (7) taxable years from which the certified rehabilitation was complete.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a successor or beneficiary
of a taxpayer.
(9) For purposes of this section, a lessee of a certified historic structure shall be treated as the owner of the
structure if the remaining term of the lease is not less than the minimum period promulgated by
administrative regulation by the council.
(10) The taxes imposed in KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401 shall not apply to any consideration received for
the transfer, sale, assignment, or use of a tax credit approved under this section.
(11) (a) The Department of Revenue shall assess a penalty in an amount equal to one hundred percent
(100%) of the tax credit allowed on the rehabilitation on any taxpayer or exempt entity that:
1. Performs disqualifying work, as determined by the Kentucky Heritage Council, on a certified
historic structure for which a rehabilitation has been certified; and
2. If credit allowed based on affordability, fails to maintain compliance with the commercial
residential property requirement established in subsection (5) of Section 56 of this Act, as
determined by the council and the Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(b) Any penalties shall be assessed under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be assessed against the
property owner and not against any transferee of the credits.
(12) The council may impose fees for processing applications for tax credits, not to exceed the actual cost
associated with processing the applications.
(13) The council may authorize a local government to perform an initial review of applications for the credit
allowed under this section and forward the applications to the council with its recommendations.
(14) The council and the Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Section 60. KRS 141.382 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified historic structure" means the same as defined in KRS 171.396;
(b) "Qualified rehabilitation expense" means the same as defined in KRS 171.396; and
(c) "Substantial rehabilitation" means the same as defined in KRS 171.396.
(2) A refundable or transferable credit in the amount determined in KRS 171.397 and Section 59 of this Act shall
be allowed against the taxes imposed by KRS 136.505 or 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401, with the ordering
of credits provided in KRS 141.0205, for qualified rehabilitation expenses incurred by the taxpayer and used
for substantial rehabilitation to a certified historic structure.
Section 61. KRS 171.3961 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a taxpayer completing a certified rehabilitation to a
certified historic structure shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and
141.0401, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205, or KRS 136.505 if:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

102 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) The certified historic structure is located within the jurisdiction of a consolidated local government or
urban-county government;
(b) The amount of qualified rehabilitation expenses exceeds fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000);
(c) The certified historic structure is located within one-half (1/2) mile of a tax increment financing
development area which has received at least preliminary approval under KRS 65.490 or 154.30-050;
and
(d) Substantial rehabilitation of the certified historic structure begins prior to July 1, 2015.
(2) (a) The credit shall:
1. Equal the percentage of qualified rehabilitation expenses as provided in KRS 171.397(1)(a) and
Section 59 of this Act;
2. Only apply to the first thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of qualified rehabilitation expenses;
and
3. Be refundable and transferable.
(b) Any projects approved for a credit under this section shall not be subject to any caps established by
KRS 171.397 and shall not be considered in determining whether the certified rehabilitation credit cap
has been met in any year.
(3) The taxpayer seeking the credit shall file the applications for preliminary determination and final
determination as provided by KRS 171.397(2) and Section 59 of this Act.
(4) The total approved credit shall be available over a four (4) year period and the maximum credit which may be
claimed in a taxable year shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total approved credit.
(5) The provisions of KRS 171.397(9) to (14) and Section 59 of this Act shall also apply to this section.
SECTION 62. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The corporation shall work with the Kentucky Heritage Council to administer the certified rehabilitation
credit permitted by Section 59 of this Act.
(2) For commercial residential property that is granted credit based on thirty percent (30%) of qualified
rehabilitation expenses for providing housing that is affordable to households earning eighty percent (80%)
or less of the median family income, the corporation shall ensure that the commercial residential property
remain compliant with this requirement for a minimum of five (5) years within the completion of the
certified rehabilitation.
(3) The corporation, in conjunction with the Kentucky Heritage Council and the Department of Revenue, may
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish policies and
procedures to ensure compliance with this section.
Section 63. KRS 441.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The jailer may maintain a canteen for the benefit of prisoners lodged in the jail and may assign such jail
employees and prisoners to operate the canteen as are necessary for efficient operation.
(2) All profits from the canteen shall be used:
(a) For the benefit and to enhance the well-being of the prisoners; or
(b) To enhance safety and security within the jail.
The jailer shall keep books of accounts of all receipts and disbursements from the canteen and shall annually
report to the county treasurer on the canteen account.
(3) Allowable expenditures from a canteen account shall include but not be limited to recreational, vocational, and
medical purposes.
(4) Except in counties containing an urban-county government or a consolidated local government, in order to
ensure adequate, ongoing funding of jail canteen accounts, beginning July 1, 2007, and on the first day of each
fiscal year thereafter, the jail canteen account balance shall at least equal the following amounts based on the
average daily inmate population of the jail:
(a) 300 prisoners or more ....................................................................................................... $6,000

CHAPTER 161 103
(b) 200 to 299 prisoners .......................................................................................................... $4,000
(c) 100 to 199 prisoners .......................................................................................................... $2,000
(d) 99 or fewer prisoners ....................... .................................................................................$1,000
(5) For purposes of calculating the amount to be transferred to the jail canteen account, the average daily number
of inmates shall be equal to the average daily inmate population of the jail in the immediately preceding fiscal
year.
(6) Notwithstanding KRS 67.0802(6)(a), compensation resulting from the disposal of real or personal property
that was purchased from a canteen account shall be returned to the canteen account from which the real or
personal property was originally purchased. The jailer shall report all proceeds received from the disposal
of property for the year to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Appropriations and Revenue by December 1 of each year.
SECTION 64. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 224A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A one-half of one percent (0.5%) administrative fee shall be paid to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority for the
administration of each project funded by the infrastructure for economic development fund for coal-producing
counties and the infrastructure for economic development fund for tobacco counties. These administrative fees
shall be paid, upon inception of the project, out of the fund from which the project was allocated.
Section 65. KRS 43.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Auditor constitutes an agency independent of the administrative departments enumerated in KRS 12.020,
it being the policy of the General Assembly to provide for the independent auditing of the accounts, financial
transactions, and performance of all spending agencies of the state through a disinterested auditor, who is
entirely independent of the state administration whose affairs he is called upon to audit.
(2) The Auditor may:
(a) Audit annually, and at such other times as may be deemed expedient, the accounts of all state agencies,
all private and semiprivate agencies receiving state aid or having responsibility for the handling of any
state funds, the accounts, records, and transactions of the budget units, and the general accounts of the
state;
(b) Make a complete audit and verification of all moneys handled for the account of the state government
by local officials charged with the collection of fees or other money for or on behalf of the state, when
an audit is demanded in writing by the Legislative Research Commission, the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet, or the Governor, and may make an audit when it is not so demanded;
(c) Examine periodically the performance, management, conduct, and condition of all asylums, prisons,
institutions for the intellectually disabled, and eleemosynary institutions; public works owned, operated,
or partly owned by the state, or in the conduct or management of which the state has any financial
interest or legal power; and state agencies. The examinations shall give special attention to the faithful
and economical application of any money appropriated by the state to the institution, public works, or
state agency examined, or of any money in which the state has an interest;
(d) Examine annually the management and condition of the offices of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, the State Treasurer, and the chief state school officer, to determine whether the laws regulating
their duties are being fully complied with, and all money received by them for the state fully accounted
for;
(e) Examine, at least biennially, the Finance and Administration Cabinet's compliance with this section and
KRS 48.111 and 56.800 to 56.823. Within sixty (60) days of the completion of each examination, the
Auditor shall report his findings and recommendations to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee;
(f) Audit periodically all state revenue collections, and, if he finds that collections are not being
satisfactorily made, report that fact to the authority whose duty it is to make the collections;
(g) Make special audits and investigations when required by the Governor;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

104 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(h) Investigate the means of accounting for, controlling, and insuring the safe custody of all property of the
state, and verify the existence and condition of such property charged to, or held in the custody of any
state agency;
(i) Audit the statements of financial condition and operations of the state government, and certify in
writing the results of the audit and examination with the comments he deems necessary for the
information of the General Assembly;
(j) Report immediately in writing to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the secretary
of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, any unauthorized, illegal, irregular, or unsafe handling or
expenditure of state funds, or other improper practice of financial administration, or evidence that any
such handling, expenditure, or practice is contemplated, and any obstruction of the Auditor or his agents
during the conduct of any audit or investigation of a state agency; and
(k) Assist the Legislative Research Commission at hearings and investigations conducted by it and
cooperate with the Legislative Research Commission in the preparation of its reports to the General
Assembly.
(3) The Auditor may investigate and examine into the conduct of all state and county officers who are authorized
to receive, collect, or disburse any money for the state, or who manage or control any property belonging to
the state or in which the state is interested, or who make estimates or records that are used as a basis by any
state agency in the disbursement of public funds.
(4) The Auditor may conduct a special audit or examination of a city government or any of its agencies or
departments.
(5) The Auditor may receive appropriations from the general fund for audits of the statewide systems of
personnel and payroll, cash and investments, revenue collection, and the state accounting system. Except
where otherwise provided, any expenses incurred by the Auditor for any other audit, examination,
investigation, or review, including a required audit of federal funds,[audits, examinations, investigations, or
reviews] shall be charged to the entity that is the subject of the audit, examination, investigation, or review.
The Auditor shall maintain a record of all time expenses for each audit, examination, investigation, or review.
(6) The Auditor may provide consulting services, in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the
United States and government auditing standards, to state or local government entities and associations of such
entities, including special purpose governmental entities, and may charge a mutually agreed upon rate for
those services, including:
(a) Providing training and technical presentations;
(b) Developing audit guides applicable to those entities;
(c) Developing question and answer documents to promote understanding of technical issues or standards;
and
(d) Collaborating with other professional organizations to advance auditing of government entities and
programs.
(7) The Auditor shall not be responsible for the keeping of any accounts of the state, except accounts relating to
his own operations. The Auditor shall not be responsible for the collection of any money due the state, or for
the handling or custody of any state funds or property except in the process of counting and verifying the
amounts of the funds or property in the course of the audits provided for in this section.
Section 66. KRS 18A.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in KRS 18A.200, members of the board shall receive compensation of one hundred
dollars ($100) per diem for each meeting of the board and reimbursement for actual and necessary
expenses in accordance with state regulations and standards applicable to state employees.
(b)[(2)] In addition to payments for attendance at board meetings all board members may also be paid
one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent in the preparation of recommended orders, the review of
transcripts or other matters related to appeals before the board.
(c)[(3)] Any board member missing three (3) consecutive regular meetings shall be deemed to have
vacated his office. Replacements to the board shall be made as provided in KRS 18A.050(2) and
18A.060.

CHAPTER 161 105
(2) Each agency of the executive branch of state government with employees covered by this chapter shall be
annually assessed for the amount required for the operation of the Personnel Board. The agency
assessment shall be determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet based on the
authorized full-time positions of each agency on July 1 of each year of the biennium. The Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall collect the assessment.
Section 67. KRS 151.723 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The rate of the water use fees collected by the authority shall be set for each year of the biennium based upon a
total amount of funds necessary to carry out only those functions, projects, and expenses authorized by the
General Assembly in the authority's biennial budget.
(2) At the time the authority submits its budget to the Governor's Office of Policy and Management, it shall certify
to the General Assembly the total amount of water use reported for the preceding biennium by users subject to
the water use fees. At least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the authority's budget, the authority
shall establish a rate for each water use fee based upon an amount of water use projected for each year of the
biennium from the amount reported, calculated to generate the amount of funds necessary to carry out the
functions, projects, and expenses which have been authorized by the General Assembly to be funded by the
fees. The rate shall be an amount for each one thousand (1,000) gallons of water use and shall be effective for
at least one (1) year.
(3) The authority shall define by administrative regulation those uses of the Kentucky River or the waters of the
Kentucky River basin subject to a water use fee. Water use fees shall not apply to facilities using water for
agricultural purposes. The authority shall collect the fees on a quarterly basis and pay the collected fees into
the State Treasury to the credit of a restricted fund for use by the authority.
(4) Water withdrawal fees imposed by the authority shall not be subject to state and local taxes.
Notwithstanding KRS 151.710(10), Tier 1 water withdrawal fees shall be used to support the operations of
the authority and for contractual services for water supply and quality studies.
Section 68. KRS 304.17B-021 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the other powers enumerated in KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031, the Office of Health Data
and Analytics shall assess insurers in the amounts specified in this section. The assessment shall be used for
the purpose of funding GAP losses and Kentucky Access.
(a) The amount of the assessment for each calendar year shall be as follows:
1. From each stop-loss carrier, an amount that is equal to two dollars ($2) upon each one hundred
dollars ($100) of health insurance stop-loss premiums;
2. From all insurers, an amount based on the total amount of all health benefit plan premiums
earned during the prior assessment period and paid by all insurers who received any of the health
benefit plan premiums on which the annual assessment is based. The percentage rate used for the
annual assessment shall be the same percentage rate as calculated in the GAP risk adjustment
process for the six (6) month period of July 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998;
3. If determined necessary by the office, a second assessment may be assessed in the same manner
as the annual assessment in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and
4. In no event shall the sum of the first assessment provided for in subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph and the second assessment provided for in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph be greater
than one percent (1%) of the total amount of all assessable health benefit plan premiums earned
during the prior assessment period.
(b) The first assessment shall be for the period from January 1, 2000, through December 31, 2000, and shall
be paid on or before March 31, 2001. Subsequent annual assessments shall be paid on or before March
31 of the year following the assessment period.
(2) Every supporting insurer shall report to the office, in a form and at the time as the office may specify, the
following information for the specified period:
(a) The insurer's total stop-loss premiums and health benefit plan premiums in the individual, small group,
large group, and association markets; and
(b) Other information as the office may require.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

106 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) As part of the assessment process, the office shall establish and maintain the Kentucky Access fund. All funds
shall be held at interest, in a single depository designated in accordance with KRS 304.8-090(1) under a
written trust agreement in accordance with KRS 304.8-095. All expense and revenue transactions of the fund
shall be posted to the Management Administrative Reporting System (MARS) and its successors.
(4) The Kentucky Access fund shall be funded from the following sources:
(a) Premiums paid by Kentucky Access enrollees;
(b) The funds designated for Kentucky Access in the Kentucky Health Care Improvement fund;
(c) Appropriations from the General Assembly;
(d) [All premium taxes collected under KRS Chapter 136 from any insurer, and any retaliatory taxes
collected under KRS 304.3-270 from any insurer, for accident and health premiums that are in excess of
the amount of the premium taxes and retaliatory taxes collected for the calendar year 1997;
(e) ]Annual assessments from supporting insurers;
(e)[(f)] A second assessment from supporting insurers;
(f)[(g)] Gifts, grants, or other voluntary contributions;
(g)[(h)] Interest or other earnings on the investment of the moneys held in the account; and
(h)[(i)] Any funds remaining on January 1, 2001, in the guaranteed acceptance program account may be
transferred to the Kentucky Access fund.
(5) The office shall determine on behalf of Kentucky Access the premiums, the expenses for administration, the
incurred losses, taking into account investment income and other amounts needed to satisfy reserves, estimated
claim liabilities, and other obligations for each calendar year. The office shall also determine the amount of the
actual guaranteed acceptance program plan losses for each calendar year. The office shall assess insurers as
follows:
(a) On or before March 31 of each year, the amount set forth in subsection (1)(a)1. and (1)(a)2. of this
section.
(b) If the amount of actual guaranteed acceptance program plan losses exceeds the assessment provided for
in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a second assessment shall be authorized under subsection (1)(a)3. of
this section. If the amount of GAP losses exceeds the assessments provided under subsection (1)(a)1.,
subsection (1)(a)2., and subsection (1)(a)3. of this section, moneys received and available from the
Kentucky Health Care Improvement Fund after the office determines available funding for Kentucky
Access for the current calendar year pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, shall be used to
reimburse GAP participating insurers for any actual guaranteed acceptance program losses. If the
amount of GAP losses exceeds the amount in the Kentucky Health Care Improvement Fund after
reserving sufficient funds for Kentucky Access for the current year, each GAP participating insurer
shall be reimbursed up to the amount of its proportional share of actual guaranteed acceptance program
plan losses from the fund. Effective for any assessment on or after January 1, 2001, in calculating GAP
losses, total premiums and total claims of the GAP participating insurer shall be used. Actual
guaranteed acceptance program losses shall be calculated as the difference between the total GAP
claims and the total GAP premiums on an aggregate basis.
(c) If GAP losses are fully covered by the assessment process provided for in subsection (1)(a)1. and
(1)(a)2. of this section and the second assessment provided for in subsection (1)(a)3. of this section is
not necessary to cover GAP losses, and as determined by the office using reasonable actuarial principles
Kentucky Access funding is needed, a second assessment provided for in subsection (1)(a)3. of this
section shall be completed.
(6) After the end of each calendar year, GAP losses shall be reimbursed only after the office determines that
appropriate funding is available for Kentucky Access for the current calendar year. GAP losses shall be
reimbursed after reserving sufficient funds for Kentucky Access.
(7) With respect to a GAP participating insurer who reasonably will be expected both to pay assessments and to
receive payments from the assessment fund, the office shall calculate the net amount owed to or to be received
from the fund, and the office shall only collect assessments for or make payments from the fund based upon
net amounts.

CHAPTER 161 107
(8) Insurers paying an assessment may include in any health insurance rate filing the amount of these assessments
as provided for in Subtitle 17A of this chapter.
(9) Insurers shall pay any assessment amounts authorized in KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031 within thirty (30)
days of receiving notice from the office of the assessment amount.
(10) Any surpluses remaining in the Kentucky Access fund after completion of the assessment process for a
calendar year shall be maintained for use in the assessment process for future calendar years and such funds
shall not lapse. The general fund appropriations to the Kentucky Access fund shall not lapse.
(11) Assessments on health benefit plan premiums that are required under KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031 shall
not be applied to premiums received by an insurer for state employees, Medicaid recipients, Medicare
beneficiaries, and CHAMPUS insureds.
(12) The office shall direct that receipts of Kentucky Access be held at interest, and may be used to offset future
losses or to reduce plan premiums in accordance with the terms of KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031. As used
in this subsection, "future losses" may include reserves for incurred but not reported claims.
(13) The office shall conduct examinations of insurers and stop-loss carriers reasonably necessary to determine if
the information provided by the insurers or stop-loss carriers is accurate.
(14) The insurer, as a condition of conducting health insurance business in Kentucky, shall pay the assessments
specified in KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031.
(15) The stop-loss carrier, as a condition of doing health insurance business in Kentucky, shall pay the assessments
specified in KRS 304.17B-001 to 304.17B-031.
Section 69. KRS 11.068 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created an agency of state government known as the Office of State Budget Director. The office shall
be attached for administrative purposes to the Office of the Governor.
(2) The office shall include the following major organizational units:
(a) The Office of State Budget Director, headed by the state budget director. The state budget director shall
be appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 11.040 and shall serve, under direction of the Governor,
as state budget director and secretary of the state planning committee. The office shall include such
principal assistants and supporting personnel appointed pursuant to KRS Chapter 12 as may be
necessary to carry out the functions of the office. The office shall have such duties, rights, and
responsibilities as are necessary to perform, without being limited to, the following functions:
1. Functions relative to the preparation, administration, and evaluation of the executive budget as
provided in KRS Chapters 45 and 48 and in other laws, including but not limited to, capital
construction budgeting, evaluation of state programs, program monitoring, financial and policy
analysis and issue review, and executive policy implementation and compliance;
2. Continuous evaluation of statewide management and administrative procedures and practices,
including but not limited to economic forecasting, technical assistance to state agencies, forms
control, and special analytic studies as directed by the Governor; and
3. Staff planning functions of the state planning committee and evaluation of statewide
management and administrative practices and procedures.
(b) Governor's Office for Policy and Management, headed by the state budget director. The state budget
director shall maintain staff employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry out the
functions of the office relating to state budgeting as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and
state planning as provided in KRS Chapter 147, review of administrative regulations proposed by
executive agencies prior to filing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and such other duties as may be
assigned by the Governor.
(c) Governor's Office for Policy Research, headed by the state budget director. The Governor's Office for
Policy Research shall assist the state budget director in providing policy research data, information, and
analysis to the Governor on public policy issues that impact the Commonwealth. The state budget
director shall identify and direct the research to be completed and provided by the office. The state
budget director shall maintain staff employed in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry
out the functions of the office.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

108 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Governor's Office for Economic Analysis, headed by the state budget director. The state budget director
shall maintain staff employed in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry out the functions
of the office. The Governor's Office for Economic Analysis shall carry out the revenue estimating and
economic analysis functions and responsibilities, including but not limited to the functions and
responsibilities assigned to the Office of State Budget Director by KRS Chapter 48. The Governor's
Office for Economic Analysis shall perform the tax administrative function of using tax data to provide
the Department of Revenue with studies, projections, statistical analyses, and any other information that
will assist the Department of Revenue in performing its tax administrative functions.
(3) (a) As used in this subsection, "tax expenditure" means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the
base of a tax, a credit against the tax, a deferral of a tax, or a preferential tax rate.
(b) On or before September 1, 2026, and every September 1 thereafter, the Office of State Budget
Director shall publish on its website detailed estimates of the general fund and road fund for the
current and next two (2) fiscal years of the revenue loss resulting from tax expenditures.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall provide assistance and furnish data that is not restricted by KRS
131.190.
(d) The estimates shall include for each tax expenditure:
1. The amount of revenue loss;
2. A citation of the legal authority for the tax expenditure;
3. The year in which the tax expenditure was enacted; and
4. The tax year in which the tax expenditure became effective.
SECTION 70. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 16 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the department shall bill and accept payment from nonstate-operated
event sponsors for security services provided by the department.
SECTION 71. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 138 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Consumer" means a:
1. Kentucky resident who purchases an event contract through a prediction market; or
2. Person who is not a Kentucky resident who purchases an event contract through a prediction
market while in Kentucky;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(c) "Event contract":
1. Means an agreement, contract, transaction, or swap in an excluded commodity based on the
occurrence, extent of an occurrence, or contingency other than a change in the price, rate,
value, or levels of a commodity described in 7 U.S.C. sec. 1a(19)(i), as amended; and
2. Does not include:
a. Any contract of sale of a commodity for future delivery, or any option on such a
contract, executed on or subject to the rules of a designated contract market; or
b. Any swap or derivative based on:
i. An agricultural commodity;
ii. An exempt commodity; or
iii. Any excluded commodity not subject to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, as the
terms are defined in the Commodity Exchange Act;
(d) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.010;
(e) "Prediction market":
1. Means:

CHAPTER 161 109
a. Any physical or electronic platform through which a consumer may buy, sell, or
exchange event contracts, whether the market is located in or out of the state; or
b. Any platform or system that provides consumers with the ability to open speculative
positions on the outcomes of future events; and
2. May be a board of trade designated as a contract market by the Commodity Futures Trading
Commission;
(f) "Prediction market operator":
1. Means a board of trade or other person, including any affiliate of the person, that operates a
prediction market; and
2. Includes but is not limited to a person that satisfies the requirements of this subsection
through the ownership, operation, or control of a digital distribution service, digital
distribution platform, online portal, or application store where a prediction market may be
accessed;
(g) "Speculative position" means a financial commitment made by a consumer in a prediction market;
and
(h) "Transaction fee" means:
1. The fee charged by the prediction market operator to complete a sale, purchase, or trade of an
event contract to a consumer; and
2. The amount paid by a consumer to purchase an event contract from a prediction market
operator.
(2) On and after January 1, 2027, an excise tax is hereby imposed on a prediction market operator at the rate
of fourteen and one-quarter percent (14.25%) of the prediction market operator's transaction fees. The
accrual method of accounting shall be used for purposes of calculating the amount of tax owed by the
prediction market operator under this subsection.
(3) The tax imposed by subsection (2) of this section is due and payable monthly and shall be remitted to the
department on or before the twentieth day of the next succeeding calendar month.
(4) The prediction market operator's payment shall be accompanied by a return prescribed by the department
indicating the amount of tax due for the previous calendar month as well as any other information the
department shall require through an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(5) Any prediction market operator who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the uniform
civil penalties imposed under KRS 131.180.
(6) In every case, any tax not paid on or before the due date shall bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined
in KRS 131.010 from the due date until the date of payment.
(7) It is the purpose and intent of the General Assembly to levy taxes on persons engaged in the operations of a
prediction market. It is not the intent of the General Assembly to legalize these activities.
SECTION 72. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 138 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A fantasy contest service provider shall be liable for the payment of the tax levied in Section 9 of this
Act.
(b) A prediction market operator shall be liable for the payment of the tax levied in Section 71 of this
Act.
(2) Notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer,
or any other person holding any equivalent corporate office of any corporation subject to Section 9 or 71 of
this Act shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and severally, for the taxes imposed by
Section 9 or 71 of this Act.
(3) Corporate dissolution, withdrawal of the corporation from the state, or the cessation of holding any
corporate office shall not discharge the liability of any person. The personal and individual liability shall
apply to every person holding a corporate office at the time the tax becomes or became due.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

110 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or KRS 275.150, 362.1-306(3) or predecessor law, or 362.2-
404(3) to the contrary, the managers of a limited liability company, the partners of a limited liability
partnership, and the general partners of a limited liability limited partnership or any other person holding
any equivalent office of a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited liability limited
partnership subject to Section 9 or 71 of this Act shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and
severally, for the fantasy sports service provider or prediction market operator taxes.
(5) Dissolution, withdrawal of the limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited liability
limited partnership from the state, or the cessation of holding any office shall not discharge the liability of
any person. The personal and individual liability shall apply to every manager of a limited liability
company, partner of a limited liability partnership, or general partner of a limited liability limited
partnership at the time the tax becomes or became due.
(6) A person shall not be personally and individually liable under this section if the person had no authority to
collect, truthfully account for, or pay over any tax at the time the taxes imposed become or became due.
(7) "Taxes," as used in this section, includes interest accrued at the rate provided by KRS 131.183, all
applicable penalties imposed under this chapter, and all applicable penalties imposed under KRS 131.180,
131.410 to 131.445, and 131.990.
Section 73. KRS 132.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local governmental entity" includes a county fiscal court and legislative body of a city, urban-county
government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, or
other taxing district; and
(b) "Next regular election" means the regular election that occurs immediately after all statutory
requirements for levying a property tax rate have been met, regardless of whether the election occurs in
the same or a subsequent calendar year as the levy of the property tax rate.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the portion of a tax rate levied by an
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a taxing district[ local governmental entity or district
board of education] subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023, 132.027, and
160.470, shall go into effect forty-five (45) days after its passage if a petition is not filed to
challenge the levy. If a petition is filed, the levy shall be suspended in accordance with
paragraph (e) of this subsection.
2. When a tax rate is levied by a[ district board of education or other] taxing district that is
primarily located in a county with a population of three hundred thousand (300,000) or more
inhabitants[containing an urban-county government or a consolidated local government], the
portion of a tax rate levied by an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a [district board of
education or other ]taxing district subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023,
132.027, and 160.470, shall go into effect fifty (50) days after its passage if a petition is not filed
to challenge the levy. If a petition is filed, the levy shall be suspended in accordance with
paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of this
subsection, any three (3) qualified voters, who reside in the area where the tax levy will be imposed,
may commence petition proceedings to protest the passage of the ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion levied by a taxing district by filing an affidavit with the county clerk. The affidavit shall state:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within the same forty-five (45)
day or fifty (50) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. For petition committees filing petitions in response to a tax rate levied by a[ district board of
education or other] taxing district that is primarily located in a county with a population of three
hundred thousand (300,000) or more inhabitants[containing an urban-county government or a

CHAPTER 161 111
consolidated local government], whether or not the petition committee is willing to incur all of
the expenses associated with electronic petition signatures. If the petition committee is not
willing to incur all of the expenses, then electronic petition signatures shall not be allowed for the
petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the filing of a valid petition under
this section;
2. Notify the petition committee that the clerk will publish a notice identifying the tax levy being
challenged and providing the names and addresses of the petition committee on the home page
of the clerk's website and in a newspaper of general circulation within the county, if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of publishing the notice in the
newspaper as determined in accordance with the provisions of KRS 424.160 at the time
of the filing of the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk shall publish the notice
within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the taxing district levying the tax[appropriate local
governmental entity or district board of education].
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and style and shall be assembled
in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more than one (1) voting
precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements of the Uniform Electronic
Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street address, birth month, and
birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. i. Except for petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a local[district] board
of education, The petition shall be signed by a number of registered and qualified
voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the
total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential election.
ii. For petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a local[district] board of
education, the petition shall be signed by at least five thousand (5,000) registered
and qualified voters residing in the affected jurisdiction or signed by a number of
registered and qualified voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at least
ten percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential
election, whichever is less.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining whether the required
number of petition signatures has been obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition signatures have been incurred
in accordance with paragraph (b)6. of this subsection;
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the requirements of this subsection;
and
iii. The petition was filed in response to a tax rate levied by a[ district board of
education or other] taxing district that is primarily located in a county with a
population of three hundred thousand (300,000) or more inhabitants[containing
an urban-county government or a consolidated local government].
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

112 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not invalidate the entire page
of the petition, but shall instead result in the invalid petition signature being stricken and
not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall be
suspended from going into effect until after the election referred to in subsection (3) of this section is
held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient and no further action may be taken
pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection.
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the presiding officer of the taxing district[appropriate local
governmental entity or district board of education] that the petition has been received and shall, within
thirty (30) days of the receipt of the petition, make a determination of whether the petition contains
enough signatures of qualified voters to place the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion before the
voters.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to the petition committee and
the taxing district[local governmental entity or district board of education] within the thirty (30) day
period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection that the petition is properly presented and in
compliance with the provisions of this section, and that the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion
levying the tax will be placed before the voters for approval.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within the thirty (30) day period
provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection, notify, in writing, the petition committee and the taxing
district levying the tax[local governmental entity or district board of education] of the specific
deficiencies found. Notification shall be sent by certified mail and shall be published on the home page
of the clerk's website and at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation within the county
containing the taxing district[local governmental entity or district board of education] levying the tax. If
there is not a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notification, then the notification
shall be posted at the courthouse door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final review by the Circuit Court
of the county in which the taxing district levying the tax[local governmental entity or district board of
education] is located, and shall be limited to the validity of the county clerk's determination. Any
petition challenging the county clerk's final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the
issuance of the clerk's final determination.
(j) The local governmental entity levying the tax[ or district board of education] may cause the
cancellation of the election by reconsidering and amending the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion
to levy a tax rate which will produce no more revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] from real property. The action by the
local governmental entity or local[district] board of education to cancel an election shall be valid only
if taken within fifteen (15) days following the date the clerk finds the petition to be sufficient.
(3) (a) If an election is necessary under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section:
1. The local governmental entity shall cause to be submitted to the voters of the district at the next
regular election, the question as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied; or
2. The local[district] board of education shall cause to be submitted to the voters of the district in a
called common school election not less than thirty-five (35) days nor more than forty-five (45)
days from the date the signatures on the petition are validated by the county clerk, or at the next
regular election, at the option of the local[district] board of education, the question as to whether
the property tax rate shall be levied. The cost of a called common school election shall be borne
by the school district holding the election. Any called common school election shall comply with
the provisions of KRS 118.025.
(b) If an election under paragraph (a) of this subsection is held in conjunction with a regular election, the
question as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied shall be submitted to the county clerk no
later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(c) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question shall be framed to ask whether
the voter is for the levy of the property tax rate. If a majority of the votes cast upon the question oppose
its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall not go into effect. If a majority of the votes

CHAPTER 161 113
cast upon the question favor its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall become
effective.
(d) If the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion fails to pass pursuant to an election held under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the property tax rate which will produce four percent (4%) more revenues from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], than the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010], shall be levied without
further approval by the local governmental entity or local[district] board of education.
(e) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial terms, for or against any
public question that appears on the ballot in this subsection. For purposes of this section, "local" means
and includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, charter county, or special district.
(4) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a taxing district[local governmental entity or
district board of education] has not established a final tax rate as of September 15, due to the recall provisions
of this section, KRS 68.245, 132.023, 132.027, or 160.470, regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in
KRS 133.220 for all districts having a tax rate established by that date; and a second set of bills shall be
prepared and collected in the regular manner, according to the provisions of KRS Chapter 132, upon
establishment of final tax rates by the remaining districts.
(5) If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to conform with the second billing date.
(6) All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the taxing district[ or districts] requiring the
second billing.
Section 74. KRS 160.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, a local[no district] board of education shall
not levy a general tax rate which will produce more revenue, exclusive of revenue from net assessment
growth as defined in KRS 132.010, than would be produced by application of the general tax rate that
could have been levied in the preceding year to the preceding year's assessment, except as provided in
subsections (10)[(9)] and (11)[(10)] of this section and KRS 157.440.
(b) If an election is held as provided for in KRS 132.017 and the question should fail, such failure shall not
reduce the "...general tax rate that could have been levied in the preceding year...," referred to in
subsection (1)(a) of this section, for purposes of computing the general tax rate for succeeding years.
In the event of a merger of school districts, the limitations contained in this section shall be based upon
the combined revenue of the merging districts, as computed under the provisions of this section.
(2) A local[No district] board of education shall not levy a general tax rate within the limits imposed in subsection
(1) of this section which respectively exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, except as
provided in subsections (10)[(9)] and (11)[(10)] of this section and[,] KRS 157.440[,] and[ KRS] 157.621,
until the local[district] board of education has complied with the provisions of subsection (8)[(7)] of this
section.
(3) Upon receipt of property assessments from the Department of Revenue, the commissioner of education shall
certify the following to each local[district] board of education:
(a) The general tax rate that a local[district] board of education could levy under the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced;
(b) The compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 for a district's general tax rate the amount of
revenue expected to be produced; and
(c) The general tax rate which will produce, respectively, no more revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced.
(4) Upon completion of action on property assessment data, the Department of Revenue shall submit certified
property assessment data as required in KRS 133.125 to the chief state school officer.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after the local[district] board of education has received its assessment data, the rates
levied shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Board of Education for its approval or disapproval. The failure of
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

114 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
the local[district] board of education to furnish the rates within the time prescribed shall not invalidate any
levy made thereafter.
(6) (a) Each local[district] board of education shall, on or before January 31 of each calendar year, formally
and publicly examine detailed line item estimated revenues and proposed expenditures for the
subsequent fiscal year. On or before May 30 of each calendar year, each local[district] board of
education shall adopt a tentative working budget which shall include a minimum reserve of two percent
(2%) of the total budget.
(b) Each local[district] board of education shall submit to the Kentucky Board of Education no later than
September 30, a close estimate or working budget which shall conform to the administrative regulations
prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) (a) A local board of education proposing to levy a general tax rate shall make the following information
public:
1. The general tax rate levied in the preceding year and the revenue produced by that rate;
2. The proposed tax rate for the current year and the revenue expected to be produced by that
rate;
3. A clear explanation if the proposed tax rate is expected to produce more or less revenue
generated for the school district than received from the general tax rate in the preceding year
and the general areas to which any increase in revenue will be allocated;
4. A specific reference to this section and Section 73 of this Act, along with a statement as to
whether any portion of the proposed tax rate, if adopted, would be subject to recall; and
5. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required publication of the
information contained herein.
(b) To make the information in paragraph (a) of this subsection public, the local board of education:
1. Shall publish the information for at least two (2) consecutive weeks on the home page of its
website and in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county in a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches;
2. Shall read the information into the record of the school board meeting in which the general
tax rate is adopted;
3. Shall post the information on its social media platforms; and
4. May issue a notice containing the information to the editor of all print media.
(8) (a) Except as provided in subsections (10)[(9)] and (11)[(10)] of this section and KRS 157.440, a
local[district] board of education proposing to levy a general tax rate within the limits of subsection (1)
of this section which exceeds[exceed] the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a
public hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be
held in the principal office of the taxing district or, in the event the taxing district does not have a[has
no office, or the office is not] suitable office to hold the[ for such a] hearing, the hearing shall be held in
a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) The local[district] board of education shall include the following information in the publication
required in subsection (7) of this section and advertisement of[advertise] the hearing[ by causing the
following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches]:
1. [The general tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by that rate;
2. The general tax rate for the current year, and the revenue expected to be produced by that rate;
3. ]The compensating general tax rate, and the revenue expected from it;
2.[4.] The revenue expected from new property and personal property;[
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in the preceding year is to
be allocated;]

CHAPTER 161 115
3.[6.] A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than seven (7) days nor more
than ten (10) days after the day that the second advertisement is published; and
4.[7.] The purpose of the hearing[; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required publication of the
advertisement and the information contained herein].
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices in the newspaper, a single notice containing the required
information required by subsection (7) of this section and paragraph (b) of this subsection may be
sent by first-class mail to each person owning real property, addressed to the property owner at his
residence or principal place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall be given an opportunity
to present oral testimony. The local[district] board of education may set reasonable time limits for
testimony.
(9)[(8)] (a) That portion of a general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (10)[(9)] and (11)[(10)] of
this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, levied by an action of a local[district] board of education
which will produce, respectively, revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property,
more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined
in KRS 132.010, shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the local[district] board of
education as provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in subsection (7) of
this section and paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The local[district] board of education shall, within seven (7) days following adoption of an ordinance,
order, resolution, or motion to levy a general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (10)[(9)] and
(11)[(10)] of this section and KRS 157.440, which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, cause the following to be
published, on the home page of its website and in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a
display type advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches:
1. The fact that the local[district] board of education has adopted such a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of new
property as defined in KRS 132.010, in excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the county or urban-county in
which the school district is located, with a notation to the effect that that official can provide the
necessary information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
(10)[(9)] (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school years beginning
after June 30, 1990, the board of education of each school district shall levy a minimum equivalent tax
rate of thirty cents ($0.30) for general school purposes. Equivalent tax rate is defined as the rate which
results when the income collected during the prior year from all taxes levied by the local[district] for
school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of property plus the assessment for motor
vehicles certified by the Department of Revenue. School districts collecting school taxes authorized by
KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], or 160.635 to 160.648 for less than twelve (12)
months during a school year shall have included in income collected under this section the pro rata tax
collection for twelve (12) months.
(b) Failure of a board to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection may constitute a forfeiture of office
by its members pursuant to KRS 415.050 and 415.060.
(11)[(10)] A local[district] board of education may levy a general tax rate that will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, that is four percent (4%) over the amount of the revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010.
Section 75. KRS 157.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school years beginning after July
1, 1990, the board of education of each school district may levy an equivalent tax rate as defined in
subsection (10)[(9)](a) of KRS 160.470 which will produce up to fifteen percent (15%) of those
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

116 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
revenues guaranteed by the program to support education excellence in Kentucky. The levy for the
1990-91 school year shall be made no later than October 1, 1989, and no later than October 1, 1990, for
the 1991-92 school year, and by October 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter. Effective with the
1990-91 school year, revenue generated by this levy shall be equalized at one hundred fifty percent
(150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment.
(b) To participate in the Facilities Support Program of Kentucky, the board of education of each school
district shall commit at least an equivalent tax rate of five cents ($0.05) to debt service, new facilities, or
major renovations of existing school facilities, or the purchase of land if approved by the commissioner
of education as provided in KRS 157.420(4)(b). The five cents ($0.05) shall be in addition to the thirty
cents ($0.30) required by KRS 160.470(10)[(9)] and any levy pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection. The levy shall be made no later than October 1 of each odd-numbered year. Eligibility for
equalization funds for the biennium shall be based on the district funds committed to debt service on
that date. The five cents ($0.05) shall be equalized at one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the statewide
average per pupil assessment. The equalization funds shall be committed to debt service to the greatest
extent possible, but any excess equalization funds not needed for debt service shall be deposited to a
restricted building fund account. The funds may be escrowed for future debt service or used to address
categorical priorities listed in the approved facilities plan pursuant to KRS 157.420.
(c) The board of education of each school district may contribute the levy equivalent tax rate of five cents
($0.05) and equalization funds for energy conservation measures under guaranteed energy savings
contracts pursuant to KRS 45A.345, 45A.352, and 45A.353. Use of these funds, as provided under KRS
45A.353, 56.774, and 58.600 shall be based on the following guidelines:
1. Energy conservation measures shall include facility alteration;
2. Energy conservation measures shall be identified in the district's approved facility plan pursuant
to KRS 157.420;
3. The current facility systems are consuming excess maintenance and operating costs;
4. The savings generated by the energy conservation measures are guaranteed;
5. The levy equivalent tax rate of five cents ($0.05) and equalization funds contributed to the
energy conservation measures shall be defined as capital cost avoidance as provided in KRS
45A.345(2) and shall be subject to the restrictions on usage as specified in KRS 45A.352(9); and
6. The equipment that is replaced has exceeded its useful life as determined by a life cycle cost
analysis.
(d) The rate levied by a local[district] board of education under the provisions of this subsection shall not
be subject to the public hearing provisions of KRS 160.470(8)[(7)] or to the recall provisions of KRS
160.470(9)[(8)].
(e) A school district which is at or above the equivalent tax rates permitted under the provisions of the
Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 476, shall not be required to levy an
equivalent tax rate which is lower than the rate levied during the 1989-90 school year.
(2) (a) A district may exceed the maximum provided by subsection (1) of KRS 160.470 provided that, upon
request of the board of education of the school district, the county board of elections shall submit to the
qualified voters of the district, in the manner of submitting and voting as prescribed in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, the question whether a rate which would produce revenues in excess of the maximum
provided by subsection (1) of KRS 160.470 shall be levied. The rate that may be levied under this
section may produce revenue up to no more than thirty percent (30%) of the revenue guaranteed by the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky plus the revenue produced by the tax authorized
by this section. Revenue produced by this levy shall not be equalized with state funds. If a majority of
those voting on the question favor the increased rate, the tax levying authority shall, when the next tax
rate for the district is fixed, levy a rate not to exceed the rate authorized by the voters.
(b) The election shall be held not less than fifteen (15) or more than thirty (30) days from the time the
request of the board is filed with the county clerk, and reasonable notice of the election shall be given.
The election shall be conducted and carried out in the school district in all respects as required by the
general election laws and shall be held by the same officers as required by the general election laws.
The expense of the election shall be borne by the school district.

CHAPTER 161 117
(3) For the 1966 tax year and for all subsequent years for levies which were approved prior to December 8, 1965,
no local[district] board of education shall levy a tax at a rate under the provisions of this section which
exceeds the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section and except that a rate which has been approved by the voters under this section but which was not
levied by the local[district] board of education in 1965 may be levied after it has been reduced to the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010, and except that in any school district where the rate levied
in 1965 was less than the maximum rate which had been approved by the voters, the compensating tax rate
shall be computed and may be levied as though the maximum approved rate had been levied in 1965 and the
amount of revenue which would have been produced from such maximum levy had been derived therefrom.
(4) Notwithstanding the limitations contained in subsection (3) of this section, no tax rate shall be set lower than
that necessary to provide such funds as are required to meet principal and interest payments on outstanding
bonded indebtedness and payments of rentals in connection with any outstanding school revenue bonds issued
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 162.
(5) The chief state school officer shall certify the compensating tax rate to the levying authorities.
Section 76. KRS 160.473 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For assessment years beginning before January 1, 2029, in the event that a general tax rate applicable
to real property levied by a local[district] board of education will produce a percentage increase in
revenue from personal property less than the percentage increase in revenue from real property, the
local[district] board of education may levy a general tax rate applicable to personal property which will
produce the same percentage increase in revenue from personal property as the percentage increase in
revenue from real property; however, in no event shall the general tax rate levied by the local[district]
board of education applicable to personal property exceed the prior year general tax rate applicable to
personal property levied by the respective local[district] board of education.
(b) For assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2029, in the event that a general tax rate
applicable to real property levied by a local board of education will produce a percentage increase in
revenue from personal property less than the percentage increase in revenue from real property, the
local board of education may levy a general tax rate applicable to personal property which will
produce the same percentage increase in revenue from personal property as the percentage increase
in revenue from real property; however, in no event shall the general tax rate levied by the local
board of education applicable to personal property exceed:
1. The prior year general tax rate applicable to personal property levied by the respective local
board of education; or
2. The general tax rate applicable to personal property levied by the respective local board of
education for the January 1, 2028, assessment year.
(2) The general tax rate applicable to personal property levied by a local[district] board of education under the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not be subject to the public hearing provisions of KRS
160.470(8)[(7)] and to the recall provisions of KRS 160.470(9)[(8)].
Section 77. KRS 160.607 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The school tax authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall be at a single uniform rate not to
exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) and shall continue from year to year until changed as prescribed in KRS
160.635 and 160.484.
(2) Any county having five[three] hundred thousand (500,000)[(300,000)] or more inhabitants is authorized to
increase the school tax rate to exceed the maximum set in subsection (1) of this section by one-quarter of one
percent (0.25%) before the effective date of this section of this Act.
(3) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027:
(a) A school tax is not authorized to be imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 in a school
district that does not already have one imposed; and
(b) The rate of a school tax imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall never increase.
Section 78. KRS 160.483 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

118 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) (a) The license fees imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 on businesses, trades, occupations, and
professions shall be at a single, uniform percentage rate not to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) of:
1.[(a)] Salaries, wages, and commissions, and other compensations earned by persons within the county
for work done and services performed or rendered in the county; and
2.[(b)] The net profits of all businesses, trades, occupations, and professions, for activities conducted in
the county.
(b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027:
1. A school tax is not authorized to be imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 in a
school district that does not already have one imposed; and
2. The rate of a school tax imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall never
increase.
(2) The license fees, once imposed, shall continue from year to year until changed as prescribed in KRS 160.484.
(3) [No public service company which pays an ad valorem tax is required to pay a license fee.
(4) ](a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue the exemption from local license fees and
occupational taxes that existed on January 1, 2006, for providers of multichannel video programming
services or communications services as defined in KRS 136.602 that were taxed under KRS 136.120
prior to January 1, 2006.
(b) To further this intent, no company providing multichannel video programming services or
communications services as defined in KRS 136.602 shall be required to pay a license fee. If only a
portion of an entity's business is providing multichannel video programming services or
communications services, including products or services that are related to and provided in support of
the multichannel video programming services or communications services, this exclusion applies only
to that portion of the business that provides multichannel video programming services or
communications services, including products or services that are related to and provided in support of
the multichannel video programming services or communications services.
(4)[(5)] No license fee shall be imposed upon or collected from:
(a) Any bank, trust company, combined bank and trust company, combined trust, banking and title business
in this state;
(b) Any savings and loan association whether state or federally chartered;
(c) Any income received by members of the Kentucky National Guard for active duty training, unit training
assemblies, and annual field training;[ or]
(d) Any income received by precinct workers for election training or work at election booths in state,
county, and local primary, regular, or special elections;
(e) A public service company which pays an ad valorem tax; or
(f) Any individual who is not a resident of the county of the tax-levying authority imposing the tax.[
(6) No license tax shall be collected from any individual who is not a resident of the county of the tax-levying
authority imposing the tax.]
(5)[(7)] Pursuant to this section, no tax-levying authority shall regulate any aspect of the manner in which any
duly ordained, commissioned, or denominationally licensed minister of religion may perform his or her duties
and activities as a minister of religion. Duly ordained, commissioned, or denominationally licensed ministers
of religion shall be subject to the same license fees imposed on others by the tax-levying authority on salaries,
wages, commissions, and other compensation earned for work done and services performed or rendered.
Section 79. KRS 160.484 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section the fiscal court has discretion to impose or
not impose the license fees authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488 at a percentage rate, not to exceed one-half
of one percent (0.5%), determined by the fiscal court. A fiscal court shall not proceed under this subsection
without first giving all boards of education in the county thirty (30) days notice of its intention.

CHAPTER 161 119
(2) If one (1) or more boards of education of school districts within the county which contain at least ninety
percent (90%) of county's inhabitants, in the same calendar year certify to the fiscal court requests for a license
fee at an identical percentage rate, not to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%), then the fiscal court shall
impose such license fees at the requested rate.
(3) Any license fees imposed under subsection[subsections] (1) or (2) of this section shall remain in full effect
from year to year until all boards of education within the county have certified to the fiscal court requests for a
reduction in the percentage rate theretofore imposed. Thereafter, the fiscal court shall reduce the rate to the
highest rate certified as yet necessary by any local board of education in the county. The fiscal court may
require each local board of education to make no more than one (1) certificate annually.
(4) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027:
(a) A school tax is not authorized to be imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 in a school
district that does not already have one imposed; and
(b) The rate of a school tax imposed under KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall never increase[In
any calendar year in which one (1) or more boards of education of school districts containing at least
ninety percent (90%) of the county's inhabitants make a certification pursuant to subsection (2) for a
rate which is at a higher percentage than any currently imposed, the fiscal court shall impose the license
fee at the higher rate and any rate imposed pursuant to subsections (1), (2), or (3) shall be rescinded
upon the date the new rate takes effect].
Section 80. KRS 160.505 is amended to read as follows:
KRS 160.500 to the contrary notwithstanding, if a tax authorized by KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to
160.617[160.633], and 160.635 to 160.648 shall be collected by a local board of education, the local board of
education shall appoint a person who shall be responsible for collection and administration of such tax. If one (1) or
more boards of education agree in writing to levy identical taxes authorized by the statutes mentioned hereinabove,
the boards of education so agreeing shall jointly appoint a person who shall be responsible for collection and
administration of such tax as provided for in KRS 160.593(2). The position may be full-time or part-time and his
compensation shall be fixed by the board and/or boards of education. The bond of this person shall be made to cover
his duties as tax collector.
Section 81. KRS 160.593 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any board of education of a school district may, after compliance with the public hearing requirement
contained in KRS 160.603, levy school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to
160.617[160.633], and 160.635 to 160.648. The imposition of any tax levied under the provisions of 160.593
to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], and 160.635 to 160.648 shall be limited to the territory of the school
district except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Two (2) or more boards of education may agree in writing to levy identical school taxes authorized by KRS
160.605 to 160.611 and[,] 160.613 to 160.617[, and 160.621 to 160.633]. After the levying in each district so
agreeing of a tax under the terms of such agreement, the receipts from said tax shall be held in a common fund
and disbursed therefrom to each district on the basis of average daily attendance, as set forth in KRS 160.644.
Any districts levying taxes under the terms of such an agreement shall be deemed to constitute a combined
taxing district for the purposes of reference in KRS Chapter 160.
Section 82. KRS 160.597 is amended to read as follows:
Any school tax authorized by KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], and 160.635 to 160.648 may
be recalled as follows:
(1) (a) The order or resolution levying any of the school taxes designated in this section shall go into effect not
less than forty-five (45) days nor more than ninety (90) days after its passage.
(b) During the forty-five (45) days immediately following the passage of the order or resolution, any five
(5) qualified voters who reside in the school district levying the tax may commence petition
proceedings to protest the passage of the order or resolution by filing with the county clerk an affidavit
stating that they constitute the petition committee and that they will be responsible for circulating the
petition and filing it in the proper form within forty-five (45) days from the passage of the order or
resolution. The affidavit shall state their names and addresses and specify the address to which all
notices to the committee are to be sent. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

120 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. At the time of filing of the affidavit, notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements
for the filing of a valid petition under this section;
2. At the time of the filing of the affidavit, notify the petition committee that the clerk will publish a
notice identifying the tax levy being challenged and providing the names and addresses of the
petition committee in a newspaper of general circulation within the county, if such publication
exists, if the petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of publishing the notice
determined in accordance with the provisions of KRS 424.160 at the time of the filing of the
affidavit. If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk shall publish the
notice within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the local board of education[school board] or combined taxing
district.
(c) The petition shall be filed with the county clerk within forty-five (45) days of the passage of the order
or resolution. All papers of the petition shall be uniform in size and style and shall be assembled in one
(1) instrument for filing. Each sheet of the petition shall contain the names of voters from one (1) voting
precinct only, and shall include the name, number and designation of the precinct in which the voters
signing the petition live. The inclusion of an invalid signature on a page shall not invalidate the entire
page of the petition, but shall instead result in the invalid signature being stricken and not counted. Each
signature shall be executed in ink or indelible pencil and shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, and Social Security number or birthdate of the person signing. The petition shall be signed by a
number of registered and qualified voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten
percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential election, except in
consolidated local governments, where the petition shall be signed by a number of registered and
qualified voters equal to at least five percent (5%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding
presidential election.
(d) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the order or resolution shall be suspended from
going into effect for that district until after the election provided for in subsection (2) of this section is
held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient and no further action may be taken
pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subsection.
(e) The county clerk shall immediately notify the local board of education[school board] or combined
taxing district that the petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the
petition, make a determination of whether the petition contains enough signatures of qualified voters to
place the order or resolution before the voters.
(f) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to the local board of
education[school board] or combined taxing district and the petition committee within the thirty (30)
day period provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection, that the petition is properly presented and in
compliance with the provisions of this section, and that the order or resolution levying the tax will be
placed before the voters for approval.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within the thirty (30) day period
provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection, notify, in writing, the petition committee and the school
district or combined taxing district levying the tax of the specific deficiencies found. Notification shall
be sent by certified mail, and shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county containing the school district levying the tax or, if there is no such
newspaper, shall be posted at the courthouse door.
(h) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final review by the Circuit Court
of the county in which the school district is located, and shall be limited to the validity of the county
clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the county clerk's final determination shall be filed
within ten (10) days of the issuance of the clerk's final determination.
(2) If the petition is sufficient, the county clerk shall, at the option of the local[district] board of education, either
submit the question to the voters of the school district at the next regular election or submit the question to the
voters of the school district at a called common school election, which is to be held not less than thirty-five
(35) days nor more than forty-five (45) days from the date the signatures on the petition are validated by the
county clerk. Any called common school election shall comply with the provisions of KRS 118.025. If the
election is to be held in conjunction with a regular election, the question shall be submitted to the county clerk
not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election. The question shall be so framed

CHAPTER 161 121
that the voter may by his vote answer, "for" or "against." If a majority of the votes cast in a district or
combined taxing district upon the question oppose its passage, the order or resolution shall not go into effect in
that district or combined taxing district. If a majority of the votes cast in a district or combined taxing district
upon the question favor its passage, the order or resolution shall go into effect in that district. If the election is
to be held in more than one (1) school district within a county, the votes shall be counted separately. The cost
of a called common school election shall be borne by the school district causing the election to be held.
(3) If any statute in existence on June 17, 1978, is found to be in conflict with any provision of this section, the
provisions of this section shall prevail.
Section 83. KRS 160.601 is amended to read as follows:
The school taxes authorized by KRS 160.605 to 160.611 and[,] 160.613 to 160.617[, and 160.621 to 160.633] shall
be known as an occupational license tax for schools and[,] a utility gross receipts tax for schools[, and an excise tax
for schools] as set out in the following sections.
Section 84. KRS 160.603 is amended to read as follows:
No local[school district] board of education shall levy any of the school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593 to
160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], and 160.635 to 160.648, except the levy required by KRS 160.614(3) and (6),
until after compliance with the following:
(1) The local[school district] board of education desiring to levy any one (1) of these taxes shall give notice of any
proposed levy of one (1) of the school taxes. Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, notice
shall be given by causing to be published, at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county or by posting at the courthouse door if there be no such newspaper, the fact that such levy is
being proposed. The advertisement shall state that the local[district] board of education will meet at a place
and on a day fixed in the advertisement, not earlier than one (1) week and not later than two (2) weeks from
the date of the advertisement, for the purpose of hearing comments and complaints regarding the proposed
increase and explaining the reasons for such proposal.
(2) The local[school district] board of education shall conduct a public hearing at the place and on the date
advertised for the purpose of hearing comments and complaints regarding the proposed levy and explaining
the reasons for such proposal.
(3) In the event that a combined taxing district desires to levy any one (1) of these taxes, the boards of education
shall make a joint advertisement and hold a joint hearing in the manner prescribed heretofore for an individual
school district.
Section 85. KRS 160.635 is amended to read as follows:
School taxes imposed under[ the provisions of] KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], and 160.635
to 160.648 shall remain in full force and effect from year to year until the local board of education reduces the rate in
effect; however, at the time the tax is first levied the board may set a date on which the tax shall expire.
Section 86. KRS 160.637 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) "Requesting school districts" shall mean those school districts for which the Department of Revenue is
requested to act as tax collector under the authority of KRS 160.627(2).
(2) ]Reasonable expenses not to exceed the actual costs of collection incurred by any tax collector, except the
Department of Revenue, for the administration or collection of the school taxes authorized by KRS 160.605 to
160.611 and[,] 160.613 to 160.617[, and 160.621 to 160.633] shall be reimbursed by the school local[district] boards
of education on a monthly basis or on the basis agreed upon by the boards of education and the tax collector. The
expenses shall be borne by the school districts on a basis proportionate to the revenue received by the districts.
[(3) The following shall apply only when the Department of Revenue is acting as tax collector under the authority
of KRS 160.627(2):
(a) When the department is initially requested to be the tax collector under KRS 160.627(2), the department
shall estimate the costs of implementing the administration of the tax so requested, and shall inform the
requesting school district of this estimated cost. The requesting school district shall pay to the
department ten percent (10%) of this estimated cost referred to as "start-up costs" within thirty (30) days
of notification by the department. Subsequent requesting school districts shall pay their pro rata share,
or ten percent (10%), whichever is less, of the unpaid balance of the initial "start-up costs" until the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

122 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
department has fully recovered the costs. The payment shall be made within thirty (30) days of
notification by the department.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall also be reimbursed by each school district for its proportionate share
of the actual operational expenses incurred by the department in collecting the excise tax. The expenses,
which shall be deducted by the Department of Revenue from payments to school districts made under
the provisions of KRS 160.627(2), shall be allocated by the department to school districts on a basis
proportionate to the number of returns processed by the Department of Revenue for each district
compared to the total processed by the Department of Revenue for all districts.
(c) All funds received by the department under the authority of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection
shall be deposited into an account entitled the "school tax fund account," an account created within the
restricted fund group set forth in KRS 45.305. The use of these funds shall be restricted to paying the
department for the costs described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. This account shall not
lapse.
(d) The department may retain a portion of the school tax revenues collected in a special account entitled
the "school tax refund account" which is an account created within the restricted fund group set forth in
KRS 45.305. The sole purpose of this account shall be to authorize the Department of Revenue to
refund school taxes. This account shall not lapse. Refunds shall be made in accordance with the
provisions in KRS 134.580(6), and when the taxpayer has made an overpayment or a payment where no
tax was due as defined in KRS 134.580(7), within four (4) years of payment.
(e) KRS 160.621 notwithstanding, when the department is acting as tax collector under the authority of
KRS 160.627(2), the requesting school district may enact the tax enumerated in KRS 160.621 only at
the following rates: five percent (5%), ten percent (10%), fifteen percent (15%), and twenty percent
(20%) on a school district resident's state individual income tax liability as computed under KRS
Chapter 141.
(f) Beginning August 1, 1982, any school district which requests the department to collect taxes under the
authority of KRS 160.627(2) shall inform the department of this request not less than one hundred fifty
(150) days prior to January 1.
(g) The department shall not be required to collect taxes authorized in KRS 160.621 of an individual when
the department is not pursuing collection of that individual's state income taxes. The department shall
not be required to collect or defend the tax set forth in KRS 160.621 in any board or court of this state.
(h) Any overpayments of the tax set forth in KRS 141.020 or payments made when no tax was due may be
applied to any tax liability arising under KRS 160.621 before a refund is authorized to the taxpayer. No
individual's tax payment shall be credited to the tax set forth in KRS 160.621 until all outstanding state
income tax liabilities of that individual have been paid.
(i) KRS 160.510 notwithstanding, the State Auditor shall be the only party authorized to audit the
Department of Revenue with respect to the performance of its duties under KRS 160.621.]
Section 87. KRS 160.640 is amended to read as follows:
Any person having custody of the proceeds of any school tax authorized by KRS 160.605 to 160.611 and[,] 160.613
to 160.617,[ and 160.621 to 160.633,] except the Department of Revenue, shall be required to secure a corporate
surety bond in an amount to be set by the Kentucky Board of Education. The cost of the surety bond shall be
considered a part of the cost of the administration of the school taxes authorized under KRS 160.605 to 160.611
and[,] 160.613 to 160.617[, and 160.621 to 160.633].
Section 88. KRS 160.642 is amended to read as follows:
Any person having custody of the proceeds of any school tax authorized by KRS 160.605 to 160.611 and[,] 160.613
to 160.617[, 160.621 to 160.633] shall be audited as provided by KRS 156.265 to 156.285.
Section 89. KRS 160.644 is amended to read as follows:
The school taxes and penalties collected under KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.617[160.633], 160.635 to
160.648 shall be distributed to the treasurer of the board of education of the school district. In the event that more
than one (1) local board of education within the county is participating in one (1) of these tax levies, the funds
collected shall be distributed in proportion to the tax rate levied and the number of pupils in average daily attendance
in the participating districts as shown by the final certification by the chief state school officer for the previous school
year pursuant to the provisions of KRS 157.310 to 157.440.

CHAPTER 161 123
Section 90. KRS 160.648 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person, individual, or corporation required by the provisions of KRS 160.605 to 160.611[ and 160.621 to
160.633] to file any return or report or furnish any information requested under the authority of KRS 160.605
to 160.611[ and 160.621 to 160.633] who fails to file such return or report or furnish such information on or
before the date required shall pay a penalty in the amount of ten dollars ($10) for each failure.
(2) Any person, individual, or corporation who fails to pay, on or before the due date, any school tax authorized
by KRS 160.605 to 160.611[ and 160.621 to 160.633] and levied by the local[district] board of education shall
pay a penalty of one percent (1%) per month of the amount of such tax past due until paid.
Section 91. KRS 157.621 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the levy required by KRS 157.440(1)(b) to participate in the Facilities Support Program of
Kentucky, local school districts that have made the levy required by KRS 157.440(1)(b) are authorized to levy
the following additional equivalent rates to support debt service, new facilities, or major renovations of
existing school facilities, which levies shall not be subject to recall under any provision of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes, or to voter approval under the provisions of KRS 157.440(2):
(a) 1. Prior to April 24, 2008, local school districts that have experienced student population growth
during a five (5) year period may levy an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate for debt
service and new facilities. The tax rate levied by the district under this provision shall not be
equalized by state funding, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection. Any levy
imposed under this paragraph prior to April 24, 2008, by a local school district shall continue
until removed by the local school district.
2. A local school district shall meet the following criteria in order to levy the tax provided in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph:
a. Growth of at least one hundred fifty (150) students in average daily attendance and three
percent (3%) overall growth for the five (5) preceding years;
b. Bonded debt to the maximum capability of at least eighty percent (80%) of capital outlay
from the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky funding program, all revenue from
the local facility tax, and all receipts from state equalization on the local facility tax;
c. Current student enrollment in excess of available classroom space; and
d. A local school facility plan that has been approved by the Kentucky Board of Education
and certified to the School Facilities Construction Commission;
(b) 1. In addition to the levy authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection, a local school district may
levy an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate under the same terms and conditions
established by paragraph (a) of this subsection beginning in fiscal year 2003-2004 if the levy was
made prior to April 24, 2008, and if the local school district:
a. Levied the five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate authorized by paragraph (a) of this
subsection; and
b. Still meets the requirements established by paragraph (a)2. of this subsection.
2. Any school district that imposes both the levy authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection and
the additional levy authorized by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall receive equalization
funding from the state for the levy imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection beginning in
fiscal year 2003-2004. Equalization shall be provided at one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
statewide average per pupil assessment, subject to subsection (6) of this section[the provision of
funding by the General Assembly]. Equalization funds shall be used as provided in KRS
157.440(1)(b).
3. Any levy imposed under this paragraph prior to April 24, 2008, by a local school district shall
continue until removed by the local school district; and
(c) 1. A local school district that meets the following conditions may levy an additional five cents
($0.05) equivalent rate on and after April 24, 2008:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

124 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. The local school district is located in a county that will have more students as a direct
result of the new mission established for Fort Knox by the Base Realignment and Closure
(BRAC) 2005 issued by the United States Department of Defense pursuant to the Defense
Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 100-526, Part A of Title XXIX of
104 Stat. 1808, 10 U.S.C. sec. 2687 note; and
b. The commissioner of education has determined, based upon the presentation of credible
data, that the projected increased number of students is sufficient to require new facilities
or the major renovation of existing facilities to accommodate the new students, and has
approved the imposition of the additional levy.
2. Any local school district that imposes both the levy authorized by paragraph (a) of this
subsection and the additional levy authorized by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, and that has
not received equalization funding under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, shall receive
equalization funding from the state for the levy imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection
beginning in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the levy authorized by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph is imposed. Equalization shall be provided at one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment, subject to subsection (6) of this
section[the provision of funding by the General Assembly]. Equalization funds shall be used as
provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b).
3. Any levy imposed under this paragraph by a local school district shall continue until removed by
the local school district.
(2) (a) Any local school district that, prior to April 27, 2016, levied an equivalent rate that:
1. Was subject to recall at the time it was levied; and
2. Included a rate of at least five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate for the purpose of debt service for
school construction or major renovation of existing school facilities;
shall be eligible for retroactive equalization from the state for that levy at one hundred fifty percent
(150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment beginning in fiscal year 2003-2004, subject to
subsection (6) of this section[the fiscal condition of the Commonwealth and the provision of funding
by the General Assembly]. Equalization funds shall be used as provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b).
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that for levies described in this subsection that are imposed on
or after April 27, 2016, equalization funds, if provided by the General Assembly, shall terminate upon
the earlier of June 30, 2038, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this
equalization funding are retired. Equalization shall be subject to subsection (6)(b) and (c) of this
section, the fiscal condition of the Commonwealth, and[ the provision of] funding by the General
Assembly.
(3) Any local school district that:
(a) Levied an equivalent tax rate as of April 24, 2008, that included at least ten cents ($0.10) that was
devoted to building purposes, or that had debt service corresponding to a ten cents ($0.10) equivalent
rate;
(b) Did not receive equalized growth funding pursuant to subsection (1)(b)2. of this section; and
(c) Has been approved by the commissioner of education;
shall be eligible for equalization from the state for that levy at one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
statewide average per pupil assessment beginning in fiscal year 2005-2006, subject to subsection (6)(b) and
(c) of this section and the provision of funding by the General Assembly. Equalization funds shall be used as
provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b). Equalization funds shall be available to a local school district pursuant to this
subsection until the earlier of June 30, 2038, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this
equalization funding are retired.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any local school district receiving equalization
funding prior to April 27, 2016, related to an equivalent rate levy described in subsection (1), (2), (3), or
(5) of this section shall continue to receive the equalization funding related to the applicable equivalent
rate levy, subject to subsection (6) of this section, the limitations established by subsections (1), (2),
(3), and (5) of this section,[ and subject to] the fiscal condition of the Commonwealth, and the provision
of funding by the General Assembly, until amended by subsequent action of the General Assembly. A

CHAPTER 161 125
local school district described in this paragraph shall not be eligible to receive equalization for any
additional equivalent rate levies made by it on or after April 27, 2016.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any local school district that has imposed an
equivalent rate levy described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (2) of this section prior to April 27, 2016,
that qualifies for equalization but that has not yet received equalization funding shall be eligible for
equalization funding as provided in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (2) of this section, subject to subsection
(6) of this section[the provision of funding by the General Assembly].
(c) On and after April 24, 2008, a local school district not included in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
shall be prohibited from imposing an equivalent rate levy under the provisions of subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, and shall not be eligible for equalization funding under the provisions of this section.
(d) On and after April 24, 2008, a local school district meeting the requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this
section may impose the levy authorized by subsection (1)(c) of this section, and shall qualify for
equalization as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section, subject to subsection (6) of this section[the
provision of funding by the General Assembly].
(5) (a) Any local school district that:
1. Had school facilities classified as Category 5 on May 18, 2010, by the Kentucky Department of
Education; and
2. Levied an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate prior to April 27, 2016, for debt
service, new construction, and major renovation beyond the five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate
required by KRS 157.440(1)(b), except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
shall be eligible for equalization from the state for that levy at one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
statewide average per pupil assessment beginning in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which
the levy was imposed subject to subsection (6) of this section. This levy shall be subject to the recall
provisions of KRS 132.017.
(b) School districts that levied a five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate for debt service, new construction,
and major renovation, beyond the rate required by KRS 157.440(1)(b) prior to May 18, 2010, shall not
be required to levy an additional tax to receive the equalization funds provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) If the school district utilizes the equalization funds to support a bond issue for construction purposes,
equalization funds shall be provided until the earlier of twenty (20) years or date the bonds are retired.
(d) In the event that a school district receives funding pursuant to this subsection to support construction of
a new school facility and subsequently, as a result of litigation, receives funding for the same facility for
which state funds were provided, that school district shall reimburse the Commonwealth an amount
equal to the amount provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Any funds received in this manner
shall be deposited in the budget reserve trust fund account established in KRS 48.705.
(6) (a) For equivalent tax rates levied under this section prior to January 1, 2026, equalization funds
authorized under this section shall terminate upon the earlier of twenty (20) years or the date the
bonds supported by the equalization funding are retired. Equalization shall be subject to the fiscal
condition of the Commonwealth and funding by the General Assembly.
(b) For equivalent tax rates levied under this section on or after January 1, 2026, equalized funds shall
not be authorized under this section or provided by the state.
(c) The commissioner of education shall compile a list of every equivalent tax rate levied by a school
district under the authority of this section, the bonds or debt service to which the equivalent tax rate
revenues and any related equalized funds are dedicated, and the date those bonds or debt service are
scheduled to be retired. This list shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue Committee by September 1
of each year until the equalization funds are terminated under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Section 92. KRS 11A.211 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

126 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest shall file with the commission within ten
(10) days following the engagement of an executive agency lobbyist, an initial registration statement showing
all of the following:
(a) The name, business address, and occupation of the executive agency lobbyist;
(b) The name and business address of the employer and of any real party in interest on whose behalf the
executive agency lobbyist is acting, if it is different from the employer. However, if a trade association
or other charitable or fraternal organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is the employer, the statement need not list the names and
addresses of every member of the association or organization, so long as the association or organization
itself is listed;
(c) A brief description of the executive agency decision to which the engagement relates;
(d) The name of the executive agency or agencies to which the engagement relates;
(e) Certification by the employer and executive agency lobbyist that the information contained in the
registration statement is complete and accurate;
(f) Compensation paid to, or received by, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in
interest as part of the engagement; and
(g) Certification that the employer and agent have complied with KRS 11A.236.
(2) In addition to the initial registration statement required by subsection (1) of this section, each executive agency
lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest shall file with the commission, not later than the last day of July
of each year, an updated registration statement that confirms the continuing existence of each engagement
described in an initial registration statement, that lists the specific executive agency decisions the executive
agency lobbyist sought to influence under the engagement during the period covered by the updated statement,
and the compensation paid to, or received by, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in
interest as part of the engagement, and with it any statement of expenditures required to be filed by KRS
11A.216 and any details of financial transaction required to be filed by KRS 11A.221.
(3) Compensation paid under subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be reported after it is received by, or paid to,
each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as determined by the terms of the
engagement, and shall be listed by the amount paid or received, the intervals on which the payment is paid or
received, and shall include any other compensation received or paid as part of the engagement.
(4) If an executive agency lobbyist is engaged by more than one (1) employer, the executive agency lobbyist shall
file a separate initial and updated registration statement for each engagement and list compensation paid to, or
received by each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as part of the engagement. If
an employer engages more than one (1) executive agency lobbyist, the employer shall file only one (1) updated
registration statement under subsection (2) of this section, which shall contain the information required by
subsection (2) of this section regarding all executive agency lobbyists engaged by the employer.
(5) (a) A change in any information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (2) of this section shall be
reflected in the next updated registration statement filed under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Within thirty (30) days following the termination of an engagement, the executive agency lobbyist who
was employed under the engagement shall file written notice of the termination with the commission.
(6) Each employer of one (1) or more executive agency lobbyists, and each real party in interest, shall pay a
registration fee of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)[five hundred dollars ($500)] upon the filing of an
updated registration statement. All fees collected by the commission under the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a trust and agency fund account to the credit of the commission.
These agency funds shall be used to supplement general fund appropriations for the operations of the
commission and shall not lapse. No part of the trust and agency fund account shall revert to the general funds
of this state.
(7) Upon registration pursuant to this section, an executive agency lobbyist shall be issued a card annually by the
commission showing the executive agency lobbyist is registered. The registration card shall be valid from the
date of its issuance through the thirty-first day of July of the following year.
(8) The commission shall review each registration statement filed with the commission under this section to
determine if the statement contains all of the required information. If the commission determines the

CHAPTER 161 127
registration statement does not contain all of the required information or that an executive agency lobbyist,
employer, or real party in interest has failed to file a registration statement, the commission shall send written
notification of the deficiency by certified mail to the person who filed the registration statement or to the
person who failed to file the registration statement regarding the failure. Any person so notified by the
commission shall, not later than fifteen (15) days after receiving the notice, file a registration statement or an
amended registration statement that includes all of the required information. If any person who receives a
notice under this subsection fails to file a registration statement or an amended registration statement within
the fifteen (15) day period, the commission may initiate an investigation of the person's failure to file. If the
commission initiates an investigation pursuant to this section, the commission shall also notify each elected
executive official and the secretary of each cabinet listed in KRS 12.250 of the pending investigation.
(9) In the biennial report published under KRS 11A.110(13), the commission shall, in the manner and form the
commission determines, include a report containing statistical information on the registration statements filed
under this section during the preceding biennium.
(10) If an employer who engages an executive agency lobbyist, or a real party in interest on whose behalf the
executive agency lobbyist was engaged is the recipient of a contract, grant, lease, or other financial
arrangement pursuant to which funds of the state or of an executive agency are distributed or allocated, the
executive agency or any aggrieved party may consider the failure of the real party in interest, the employer, or
the executive agency lobbyist to comply with this section as a breach of a material condition of the contract,
grant, lease, or other financial arrangement.
(11) Executive agency officials may require certification from any person seeking the award of a contract, grant,
lease, or financial arrangement that the person, his or her employer, and any real party in interest are in
compliance with this section.
SECTION 93. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 363.510 TO 363.850 IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, an electric vehicle power dealer shall not operate an electric vehicle charging
station without first obtaining a retail electric vehicle charging license from the department. A retail electric
vehicle charging license shall be valid from the date of issuance until January 31 of the following calendar
year.
(2) The department shall collect an annual license fee in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per electric
vehicle charging port located at an electric vehicle charging station from the license holder to be deposited
in the fund established in subsection (3) of this section for the purpose of implementing and administering
of the retail electric vehicle charging program established by this section.
(3) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the
retail electric vehicle charging station license fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from
the license fee imposed in subsection (2) of this section, state appropriations, gifts, grants, and
federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the implementation and administration of the
electric vehicle charging station inspection program established by this section and for no other
purpose.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, beginning January 1, 2027, the department shall
inspect each licensed electric vehicle charging station owned or leased by an electric vehicle power dealer at
least once every two (2) years. The inspection shall include determinations of compliance with the standards
in the current edition of the National Institute of Standards and Technology's Handbook 44 or other
applicable standards relating to:
(a) The accuracy of the meters and displays of the electric vehicle charging ports from which electricity
is sold, including with regard to the electrical rate, the charging speed, and the real-time charging
status of the customer's electric vehicle;
(b) Electrical and safety standards;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

128 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Output voltages from electric vehicle charging port connectors;
(d) Security of payment methods and customer data; and
(e) Any physical security or cybersecurity measures that the department may require.
(5) Electric vehicle charging stations constructed using funds from the National Electric Vehicle
Infrastructure Funding Program established under the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act,
Pub. L. No. 117-58, shall not be subject to the licensure or inspection requirements of this section or
administrative regulations promulgated under this section until five (5) years have elapsed from the initial
date of operation of the electric vehicle charging station and the long-term stewardship requirement under
23 C.F.R. sec. 680.106 has expired.
(6) Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this section of this Act, the department shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish electric vehicle charging
station inspection standards and to carry out and enforce this section.
Section 94. KRS 363.510 is amended to read as follows:
As[When] used in KRS 363.510 to 363.850:
(1) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Agriculture;
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture;
(3) "Division" means the Division of Regulation and Inspection;
(4) (a) "Weights and measures" means all weights and measures of every kind, instruments and devices for
weighing and measuring, and any appliances and accessories associated with any of the instruments and
devices.
(b) The term shall include instruments and devices used to measure internal moisture or density levels in
unprocessed bulk tobacco if that moisture or density determination is used as a condition of sale or as
part of a contractual sales agreement.
(c) The term shall not include meters for the measurement of electricity, gas (natural or manufactured), or
water when they are operated in a public utility system. Electricity, gas, and water meters are
specifically excluded from the purview of KRS 363.510 to 363.850, and none of the provisions of KRS
363.510 to 363.850 shall apply to those meters or to any appliances or accessories associated with those
meters. However, this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the department from regulating or
inspecting electric vehicle charging stations or any associated electric meters under Section 93 of this
Act or the administrative regulations promulgated under Section 93 of this Act;
(5) "Sell" and "sale" mean barter and exchange;
(6) "Director" means the state director of the Division of Regulation and Inspection;
(7) "Inspector" means a state inspector of weights and measures;
(8) "Intrastate commerce" means all commerce or trade that is begun, carried on, and completed wholly within the
limits of the State of Kentucky, and the phrase "introduced into intrastate commerce" defines the time and
place at which the first sale and delivery of a commodity is made within the state, the delivery being made
either directly to the purchaser or to a common carrier for shipment to the purchaser;
(9) "Commodity in package form" means a commodity put up or packaged in any manner in advance of sale in
units suitable for either wholesale or retail sale, exclusive of any auxiliary shipping container enclosing
packages that individually conform to the requirements of KRS 363.510 to 363.850. An individual item or lot
of any commodity not in package form as defined in this section, but on which there is marked a selling price
based on an established price per unit of weight or of measure, shall be considered a commodity in package
form;
(10) "Consumer package" or "package of consumer commodity" means a commodity in package form that is
customarily produced or distributed for sale through retail sales agencies or instrumentalities for consumption
by individuals or use by individuals for the purposes of personal care or in the performance of services
ordinarily rendered in or about the household or in connection with personal possessions;

CHAPTER 161 129
(11) "Nonconsumer package" or "package of nonconsumer commodity" means any commodity in package form
other than a consumer package, and particularly a package designed solely for industrial or institutional use or
for wholesale distribution only;
(12) (a) "Barrel," when used in connection with fermented liquor, means a unit of thirty-one (31) gallons.
(b) "Ton" means a unit of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois weight.
(c) "Cord," when used in connection with wood intended for fuel purposes, means the amount of wood that
is contained in a space of one hundred twenty-eight (128) cubic feet when the wood is ranked and well
stowed;[ and]
(13) "Weight," as used in connection with any commodity, means net weight. If any commodity is sold on the basis
of weight, the net weight of the commodity shall be used, and all contracts concerning commodities shall use
net weight as their basis of weight;
(14) "Electric vehicle" has the same meaning as in KRS 186.010;
(15) "Electric vehicle charging port" means the system at an electric vehicle charging station that can provide
power to charge only one (1) electric vehicle at a time, even though it may have multiple connectors;
(16) "Electric vehicle charging station" means any place with electric vehicle supply equipment that has an
electrical power charging capacity of twenty (20) kilowatts or more and that:
(a) Is accessible to general public vehicular traffic; and
(b) Sells electricity at retail to charge a battery or other storage device of an electric vehicle;
(17) "Electric vehicle power dealer" means a person who owns or leases an electric vehicle charging station;
and
(18) "Electric vehicle supply equipment" means any device or system designed and used specifically to transfer
electrical energy to an electric vehicle, either as charge transferred via physical or wireless connection, by
loading a fully charged battery, or by other means.
Section 95. KRS 138.477 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(b) "Distribute" means the delivery or transfer of electric power into the battery or other energy storage
device of an electric vehicle at a location in this state;
(c) "Electric vehicle power" means electrical energy distributed into the battery or other energy storage
device of an electric vehicle to be used to power the vehicle;
(d) "Electric vehicle power dealer" means a person who:
1. Owns or leases an electric vehicle charging station with a charging capacity of twenty (20)
kilowatts or more; or
2. Receives payment for charges for power distributed through an electric vehicle charging
station;
(e) "Electric vehicle" has the same meaning as in KRS 186.010;
(f) "Electric vehicle charging station" means any place accessible to general public vehicular traffic where
electric power may be used to charge a battery or other storage device of a licensed electric vehicle; and
(g) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.010.
(2) On or after January 1, 2024:
(a) An excise tax with an initial base rate of three cents ($0.03) per kilowatt hour is imposed on electric
vehicle power distributed in this state by an electric vehicle power dealer for the purpose of charging
electric vehicles in this state; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

130 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) A surtax with an initial base rate of three cents ($0.03) per kilowatt hour is imposed on electric vehicle
power distributed in this state by an electric vehicle power dealer when the electric vehicle charging
station is located on state property.
(3) (a) On or before December 1 of each year[, 2024, and on or before each December 1 thereafter,] the
department shall compare the most current quarterly National Highway Construction Cost Index 2.0
(NHCCI 2.0) value and determine the percentage change in relation to the NHCCI 2.0 value from the
same quarter for the previous year.
(b) 1. The tax rate on January 1, 2025, and on each January 1 thereafter, shall be adjusted by the
change in the NHCCI 2.0 determined by paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the change is:
a. Greater than a five percent (5%) increase, in which case the taxes shall be one hundred
five percent (105%) of the tax rates in effect at the close of the previous calendar year; or
b. Greater than a five percent (5%) decrease, in which case the taxes shall be ninety-five
percent (95%) of the tax rates in effect at the close of the previous calendar year.
2. Notwithstanding subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the tax rate shall not be less than the initial
base rate identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) Adjustments to the tax rate shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one cent ($0.001).
(4) At least twenty (20) days in advance of the first day of each calendar year, the department shall provide
notification of:
(a) The adjusted electric vehicle power tax rate for the upcoming calendar year to all electric vehicle power
dealers; and
(b) The adjusted electric vehicle ownership fee imposed under KRS 138.475 for the upcoming calendar
year to all county clerks.
(5) This tax shall be:
(a) Administered by the department; and
(b) Transferred to the road fund as defined in KRS 48.010.
(6) (a) The tax shall be added to the selling price charged by the electric vehicle power dealer at the electric
vehicle charging station on electric vehicle power sold in this state.
(b) If there is no selling price at the charging station, the electric vehicle power dealer shall be responsible
for paying the tax on the electric power distributed by the electric vehicle charging station, except in the
case of an electric vehicle charging station installed prior to July 1, 2022.
(7) (a) The tax imposed shall be paid by the electric vehicle power dealer to the State Treasurer.
(b) The electric vehicle power dealer is liable for the electric vehicle power tax.
(8) Every electric vehicle power dealer shall, by the twenty-fifth day of each month, transmit to the department
reports, on the forms the department may prescribe, on the total kilowatt hours distributed and the amount of
tax collected. Payment of the tax shall be due with the report.
(9) The electric vehicle power dealer shall keep and preserve an accurate record of all receipts of electricity and
tax together with invoices or other pertinent records and papers required by the department for five (5) years.
(10) (a) No dealer or other person shall fail or refuse to make the returns and pay the tax prescribed by this
section, or refuse to permit the department or its representatives appointed by the commissioner of the
department in writing to examine his or her records, papers, files, and equipment pertaining to the
taxable business.
(b) No person shall make an incomplete, false, or fraudulent return, or attempt to do anything to avoid a full
disclosure of the amount of business done or to avoid the payment of the whole or any part of the tax or
penalties due.
(c) No person shall fail to keep and preserve records of electric vehicle power distributed to make reports
as required by this section.
(11) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the uniform civil penalties imposed
pursuant to KRS 131.180 and interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.183.

CHAPTER 161 131
(12) (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the president, vice president,
secretary, treasurer, or any other person holding any equivalent corporate office of any corporation
subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and
severally, for the taxes imposed under this chapter, and neither the corporate dissolution nor withdrawal
of the corporation from the state nor the cessation of holding any corporate office shall discharge the
foregoing liability of any person.
(b) The personal and individual liability shall apply to each and every person holding the corporate office at
the time the taxes become or became due.
(c) No person will be personally and individually liable pursuant to this section who had no authority in the
management of the business or financial affairs of the corporation at the time that the taxes imposed by
this chapter become or became due.
(13) (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, KRS 275.150, 362.1-306(3) or predecessor law,
or 362.2-404(3) to the contrary, the managers of a limited liability company, the partners of a limited
liability partnership, and the general partners of a limited liability limited partnership or any other
person holding any equivalent office of a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or
limited liability limited partnership subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be personally and
individually liable, both jointly and severally, for the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(b) Dissolution or withdrawal of the limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability limited partnership from the state, or the cessation of holding any office shall not discharge the
liability of any person.
(c) The personal and individual liability shall apply to each and every manager of a limited liability
company, partner of a limited liability partnership, and general partner of a limited liability limited
partnership at the time the taxes become or became due.
(d) No person shall be personally and individually liable under this subsection who had no authority to
collect, truthfully account for, or pay any tax imposed by this chapter at the time that the taxes imposed
by this chapter become or became due.
(14) "Taxes" as used in this section shall include interest accrued at the rate provided by KRS 131.183, all
applicable penalties imposed under this chapter, and all applicable penalties and fees imposed under KRS
131.180, 131.410 to 131.445, and 131.990.
(15) The department may prescribe forms and promulgate administrative regulations to execute and administer the
provisions of this section.
Section 96. KRS 138.446 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Bus companies [and taxicab companies ]operating under a certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281 and
senior citizen programs which utilize Title III funds of the Older Americans Act in the provision of
transportation services shall be entitled to a refund of seven-ninths (7/9) of the amount of KRS Chapter 138
taxes paid on motor fuels used in their regularly scheduled operations in Kentucky.
(2) A[No] person shall not be entitled to a refund pursuant to this section unless he or she shall have first filed
with the department a bond issued by a surety company authorized to do business in Kentucky in an amount of
not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to be determined by
the department, conditioned upon faithful compliance with this section and upon the payment to the
Commonwealth of any refunds to which he was not entitled.
(3) Applications for refund shall be filed with the department on a calendar quarter or calendar year basis on forms
and in the manner prescribed by it for refund of tax paid on motor fuel used by buses[ or taxicabs]. Each
application for a refund shall show the number of gallons of motor fuel purchased during the quarter for use in
buses[ or taxicabs]; the date and quantity of each purchase; the vendor from whom the fuel was purchased; the
number of gallons on which refund is claimed; and other information the department may require.[ Invoices
shall be attached to applications from taxicab companies.]
(4) [The department may require any gasoline dealer or any dealer's authorized agent to identify gasoline sold by
him for taxicab use by adding any chemical or substance, which shall be furnished by the department and used
in the manner as prescribed by the department. ]The department [also ]may require that the dealer keep a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

132 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
complete record of all the gasoline sold by him or her, which records shall give the date of each sale, the
number of gallons sold, the name of the person to whom sold, and the sale price.
(5) The department shall audit the application and make any other investigation it deems necessary to determine
whether it constitutes a proper claim. When the department is satisfied that a refund is proper, it shall authorize
seven-ninths (7/9) of the amount of the tax paid to be refunded as other refunds are made and the amount
refunded shall be deducted from current motor fuel tax receipts. The tax shall be refunded with interest at the
tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010[(6)].
(6) When the department finds that an application for a refund contains a false or fraudulent statement or that a
refund has been fraudulently obtained, the department shall refuse to grant any refunds to the person making
the false or fraudulent statement or fraudulently obtaining a refund for a period of two (2) years from the date
of the findings.
(7) The department may prescribe, promulgate and enforce administrative regulations relating to the
administration and enforcement of this section[.
(8) The refund provided for in this section shall be effective on motor fuel purchased on or after July 1, 1978].
Section 97. KRS 138.210 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 138.210 to 138.448[138.220 to 138.446], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Accountable loss" means loss or destruction of "received" gasoline or special fuel through wrecking of
transportation conveyance, explosion, fire, flood or other casualty loss, or contaminated and returned to
storage. The loss shall be reported within thirty (30) days after discovery of the loss to the department in a
manner and form prescribed by the department, supported by proper evidence which in the sole judgment of
the department substantiates the alleged loss or contamination and which is confirmed in writing to the
reporting dealer by the department. The department may make any investigation deemed necessary to establish
the bona fide claim of the loss;
(2) "Agricultural purposes" means purposes directly related to the production of agricultural commodities and the
conducting of ordinary activities on the farm;
(3) "Annual survey value" means the average of the quarterly survey values for a fiscal year, as determined by the
department, based upon surveys taken during the first month of each quarter of the fiscal year;
(4) "Average wholesale price" means the weighted average per gallon wholesale price of gasoline, based on the
quarterly survey value as determined by the department, and as adjusted by KRS 138.228;
(5) "Bulk storage facility" means gasoline or special fuels storage facilities of not less than twenty thousand
(20,000) gallons owned or operated at one (1) location by a single owner or operator for the purpose of storing
gasoline or special fuels for resale or delivery to retail outlets or consumers;
(6) "Cellulosic ethanol" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.422;
(7) "Dealer" means any person who is:
(a) Regularly engaged in the business of refining, producing, distilling, manufacturing, blending, or
compounding gasoline or special fuels in this state;
(b) Regularly importing gasoline or special fuel, upon which no tax has been paid, into this state for
distribution in bulk to others;
(c) Distributing gasoline from bulk storage in this state;
(d) Regularly engaged in the business of distributing gasoline or special fuels from bulk storage facilities
primarily to others in arm's-length transactions;
(e) In the case of gasoline, receiving or accepting delivery within this state of gasoline for resale within this
state in amounts of not less than an average of one hundred thousand (100,000) gallons per month
during any prior consecutive twelve (12) months' period, when in the opinion of the department, the
person has sufficient financial rating and reputation to justify the conclusion that he or she will pay all
taxes and comply with all other obligations imposed upon a dealer; or
(f) Regularly exporting gasoline or special fuels;
(8)[(7)] "Department" means the Department of Revenue;

CHAPTER 161 133
(9)[(8)] "Diesel fuel":
(a) Means any liquid other than gasoline that, without further processing or blending, is suitable for use as a
fuel in a diesel powered highway vehicle; and[. Diesel fuel ]
(b) Does not include unblended kerosene, No. 5[,] and No. 6 fuel oils[oil] as described in ASTM
specification D 396, or F-76 Fuel Naval Distillate MILL-F-166884;
(10)[(9)] "Dyed diesel fuel" means diesel fuel that is required to be dyed under United States Environmental
Protection Agency rules for high sulfur diesel fuel, or is dyed under the Internal Revenue Service rules for low
sulfur fuel, or pursuant to any other requirements subsequently set by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency or the Internal Revenue Service;
(11) "Ethanol" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.422;
(12) "Ethanol flex fuel" means an ethanol fuel blend of ethanol and gasoline that meets the current ASTM
specification D5798;
(13)[(10)] "Financial instrument" means a bond issued by a corporation authorized to do business in Kentucky, a
line of credit, or an account with a financial institution maintaining a compensating balance;
(14) "Fuel grade ethanol" includes ethanol, cellulosic ethanol, and ethanol flex fuel;
(15)[(11)] "Gasoline":
(a) Means all liquid fuels, including liquids ordinarily, practically, and commercially usable in internal
combustion engines for the generation of power, and all distillates of and condensates from petroleum,
natural gas, coal, coal tar, vegetable ferments, and all other products so usable which are produced,
blended, or compounded for the purpose of operating motor vehicles, showing a flash point of one
hundred ten (110) degrees Fahrenheit or below, using the Eliott Closed Cup Test, or when tested in a
manner approved by the United States Bureau of Mines, are prima facie commercially usable in internal
combustion engines;[.]
(b) Includes[The term "gasoline" as used herein shall include] casing head, absorption, natural gasoline,
fuel grade ethanol, and condensates when used without blending as a motor fuel, sold for use in motors
direct, or sold to those who blend for their own use; and[, ]
(c) Does[but shall] not include[:] propane, butane, or other liquefied petroleum gases;[,] kerosene;[,]
cleaner solvent;[,] fuel oil;[,] diesel fuel;[,] crude oil; or casing head, absorption, natural gasoline, fuel
grade ethanol, and condensates when sold to be blended or compounded with other less volatile liquids
in the manufacture of commercial gasoline for motor fuel;[,] industrial naphthas;[,] rubber solvents;[,]
Stoddard solvent;[,] mineral spirits;[,] VM and P [& ]naphthas;[,] turpentine substitutes;[,] pentane;[,]
hexane;[,] heptane;[,] octane;[,] benzene;[,] benzine;[,] xylol;[,] toluol;[,] aromatic petroleum
solvents;[,] alcohol;[,] and liquefied gases which would not exist as liquids at a temperature of sixty
(60) degrees Fahrenheit and a pressure of fourteen and seven tenths (14.7) pounds per square inch
absolute, unless the products are used wholly or in combination with gasoline as a motor fuel;
(16)[(12)] "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, machine, or mechanical contrivance propelled by an internal
combustion engine and licensed for operation and operated upon the public highways and any trailer or
semitrailer attached to or having its front end supported by the motor vehicles;
(17)[(13)] "Public highways" means every way or place generally open to the use of the public as a matter or right
for the purpose of vehicular travel, notwithstanding that they may be temporarily closed or travel thereon
restricted for the purpose of construction, maintenance, repair, or reconstruction;
(18)[(14) (a)] "Quarterly survey value":
(a) Means a value determined by the department for each calendar quarter of the weighted average per
gallon wholesale price of gasoline, determined from information available through independent
statistical surveys of gasoline prices or, if requested, from information furnished by licensed gasoline
dealers. The department shall determine, within twenty (20) days following the end of the first month of
each calendar quarter, the weighted average of per gallon wholesale selling prices of gasoline for the
previous month. That value shall be the quarterly survey value for the beginning of the following
calendar quarter; and[.]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

134 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) ["Quarterly survey value" ]Shall be determined exclusive of any federal gasoline tax and any fee on
imported oil imposed by the Congress of the United States;
(19)[(15)] "Received," [or ]"received gasoline," or "received special fuels" means[shall have the following
meanings]:
(a) 1. Gasoline and special fuels produced, manufactured, or compounded at any refinery in this state
or acquired by any dealer and delivered into or stored in refinery, marine, or pipeline terminal
storage facilities in this state shall be deemed to be received when it has been loaded for bulk
delivery into tank cars or tank trucks consigned to destinations within this state.
2. For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter and to prevent the evasion of the tax
and to enforce the duty of the dealer to collect the tax, it shall be presumed that all gasoline and
special fuel loaded by any licensed dealer within this state into tank cars or tank trucks is
consigned to destinations within this state, unless the contrary is established by the dealer,
pursuant to administrative regulations prescribed by the department; and
(b) 1. Gasoline and special fuels acquired by any dealer in this state, and not delivered into refinery,
marine, or pipeline terminal storage facilities, shall be deemed to be received when it has been
placed into storage tanks or other containers for use or subject to withdrawal for use, delivery,
sale, or other distribution.
2. Dealers may sell gasoline or special fuels to licensed bonded dealers in this state in transport
truckload, carload, or cargo lots, withdrawing it from refinery, marine, pipeline terminal, or bulk
storage tanks, without paying the tax. In these instances, the licensed bonded dealer purchasing
the gasoline or special fuels shall be deemed to have received that fuel at the time of withdrawal
from the seller's storage facility and shall be responsible to the state for the payment of the tax
thereon;
(20)[(16)] "Refinery" means any place where gasoline or special fuel is refined, manufactured, compounded, or
otherwise prepared for use;
(21)[(17)] "Retail filling station" means any place accessible to general public vehicular traffic where gasoline or
special fuel is or may be placed into the fuel supply tank of a licensed motor vehicle;
(22)[(18)] "Special fuels" means and includes all combustible gases and liquids capable of being used for the
generation of power in an internal combustion engine to propel vehicles of any kind upon the public highways,
including diesel fuel, and dyed diesel fuel used exclusively for nonhighway purposes in off-highway
equipment and in nonlicensed motor vehicles, except that it does not include gasoline, aviation jet fuel,
kerosene unless used wholly or in combination with special fuel as a motor fuel, or liquefied petroleum gas as
defined in KRS 234.100;
(23)[(19)] "Storage" means all gasoline and special fuels produced, refined, distilled, manufactured, blended, or
compounded and stored at a refinery storage or delivered by boat at a marine terminal for storage, or delivered
by pipeline at a pipeline terminal, delivery station, or tank farm for storage;
(24)[(20)] "Transporter" means any person who transports gasoline or special fuels on which the tax has not been
paid or assumed; and
(25)[(21)] "Wholesale floor price" means[:
(a) Prior to April 1, 2015, one dollar and seventy-eight and six-tenths cents ($1.786) per gallon; and
(b) On and after April 1, 2015,] two dollars and seventeen and seven-tenths cents ($2.177) per gallon.
SECTION 98. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 246 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the Friends of
Kentucky Agriculture fund. The fund shall consist of the special license plate EF fees associated with the
issuance of the Friends of Kentucky Agriculture license plate pursuant to Section 99 of this Act, state
appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Agriculture.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for agricultural programs administered by the department and
for no other purpose.

CHAPTER 161 135
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse, but
shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Section 99. KRS 186.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and in KRS 186.043, 186.164, 186.166, 186.1722, and 186.174:
(a) "Special license plate" means a unique license plate issued under this chapter to a group or organization
that readily identifies the operator of the motor vehicle or motorcycle bearing the plate as a member of a
group or organization, or a supporter of the work, goals, or mission of a group or organization. The term
shall not include regular license plates issued under KRS 186.240;
(b) "Street rod" means a modernized private passenger motor vehicle manufactured prior to the year 1949,
or designed or manufactured to resemble a vehicle manufactured prior to 1949;
(c) "SF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is dedicated for
use by the Transportation Cabinet;
(d) "CF" means the county clerk's fee for issuing a motor vehicle registration as established under KRS
186.040(1). If a CF amount is charged for a license plate listed in this section, the applicant for that
plate shall also pay the fees identified in KRS 186.040(6). If a CF amount is not charged, the applicant
shall not be required to pay those fees; and
(e) "EF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is mandated by
this chapter to be dedicated for use by a particular group or organization.
(2) The initial purchase fee and renewal fee for a special license plate created under this chapter shall be as
established in this subsection and includes the name of group or organization and the total initial and renewal
fee required for the plate. The amount in parentheses indicates how the total fee is required to be divided:
(a) Disabled veterans who receive assistance to purchase a vehicle from the United States Department of
Veterans' Affairs, veterans declared by the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs to be one
hundred percent (100%) service-connected disabled, and recipients of the Congressional Medal of
Honor:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
(b) Former prisoners of war, recipients of the Purple Heart, and survivors of Pearl Harbor:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(c) Members of the Kentucky National Guard[ and recipients of the Purple Heart]:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the National Guard Association of
Kentucky[veterans' program trust fund established under KRS 40.460]).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the National Guard Association of
Kentucky[veterans' program trust fund established under KRS 40.460]).
(d) Members of the Civil Air Patrol; active, retired, veteran, reserve, or auxiliary members of the United
States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard; Merchant Marines who
served between December 7, 1941, and August 15, 1945; recipients of the Silver Star Medal, the Legion
of Merit Medal, the Distinguished Flying Cross, the Air Medal, the Combat Action Badge, the Combat
Infantry Badge, or the Bronze Star Medal; persons who wish to receive Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star
Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plates beyond the two (2) exempted from fees under KRS
186.041(6); individuals eligible for a special military service academy license plate under KRS
186.041(8); individuals eligible for a special military unit license plate under KRS 186.163; and
disabled veterans who have been declared to be between fifty percent (50%) and ninety-nine percent
(99%) service-connected disabled by the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

136 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(e) Recipients of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross:
1. Initial Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(f) Disabled license plates:
1. Initial Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(g) Historic vehicles:
1. Initial Fee for two plates: $56 ($50 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: Do not renew annually.
(h) Members of Congress:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(i) Firefighters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters
Association).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters
Association).
(j) Emergency management:
1. Initial Fee: $31 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(k) Fraternal Order of Police:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
(l) Law Enforcement Memorial:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
(m) Personalized plates for a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under the provisions of KRS
186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), or a motorcycle required to be registered under the provisions of KRS
186.050(2):
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(n) Street rods:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

CHAPTER 161 137
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(o) Nature plates:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land
Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land
Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
(p) Amateur radio:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(q) Kentucky General Assembly:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(r) Kentucky Court of Justice:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(s) Masons:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky).
(t) Collegiate plates:
1. Initial Fee: $53 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the
university whose name will be borne on the plate).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the
university whose name will be borne on the plate).
(u) Independent Colleges:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent
Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds of the
Association's members).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent
Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds of the
Association's members).
(v) Child Victims:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims' trust fund
established under KRS 41.400).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims' trust fund
established under KRS 41.400).
(w) Kentucky Horse Council:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council).
(x) Ducks Unlimited:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

138 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited).
(y) Spay neuter:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control and care fund
established under KRS 258.119).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control and care fund
established under KRS 258.119).
(z) Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
3. A person may receive a maximum of two (2) plates under this paragraph free of charge and may
purchase additional plates for fees as established in subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(aa) I Support Veterans:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Department of
Veterans' Affairs).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Department of
Veterans' Affairs).
(ab) Gold Star Siblings, Gold Star Sons, or Gold Star Daughters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(ac) POW/MIA Awareness:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(ad) Personalized plates for a recreational vehicle that is required to be registered under the provisions of
KRS 186.050(11):
1. Initial Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(ae) Friends of Kentucky Agriculture:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Friends of Kentucky
Agriculture fund established under Section 98 of this Act[agricultural program trust fund
established under KRS 246.247]).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the Friends of Kentucky Agriculture
fund established under Section 98 of this Act[agricultural program trust fund established under
KRS 246.247]).
(af) Special license plates established under KRS 186.164:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
(3) Any special license plate may be combined with a personalized license plate for a twenty-five dollar ($25)
state fee in addition to all other fees for the particular special license plate established in this section and in
KRS 186.164(3). The twenty-five dollar ($25) fee required under this subsection shall be divided between the
cabinet and the county clerk of the county where the applicant is applying for the license plate with the cabinet
receiving twenty dollars ($20) and the county clerk receiving five dollars ($5).

CHAPTER 161 139
(4) (a) A sponsoring organization of any special license plate issued under this section or any special license
plate established under the provisions of KRS 186.164 may petition the cabinet for the production of
that special license plate for motorcycles.
(b) The cabinet shall make all of the special military license plates in this section available for motorcycles
owned or leased by eligible individuals.
(c) Owners and lessees of motorcycles registered under KRS 186.050(2) may be eligible to receive special
license plates approved by the cabinet under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. Applicants for a
special license plate for a motorcycle shall be required to pay the fee for a special plate as prescribed in
this section or in KRS 186.164. The fee paid for the special plate for a motorcycle shall be in lieu of the
registration fee required under KRS 186.050(2).
(5) The Transportation Cabinet shall:
(a) Identify the cost of issuing a child victims' trust fund special license plate under subsection (2)(v) of this
section; and
(b) Transfer any revenue received from the initial or renewal SF fee that is in excess of the cost identified
in paragraph (a) of this subsection to the child victims' trust fund established under KRS 41.400.
Section 100. KRS 186.164 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The SF portion of the fee required under KRS 186.162 shall include the fee to reflectorize all license plates
under KRS 186.240. All EF fees required under KRS 186.162 shall be collected at the time of an initial or
renewal application by the county clerk who shall forward the EF fee to the cabinet. The cabinet shall remit EF
fees to the fund, group, or organization identified in KRS 186.162 on a quarterly basis. The cabinet may retain
any investment income earned from holding EF fees designated to be remitted under this subsection to offset
administrative costs incurred by the cabinet in the administration of EF fees.
(2) A special license plate shall be the color and design selected by the group or organization identified in
subsection (13) of this section, contingent upon the approval of the Transportation Cabinet. In addition to the
design selected for a special license plate, the name "Kentucky," an annual renewal decal, and any
combination of letters or numerals required by the cabinet in the design shall also appear on the plate.
(3) An actual metal special license plate shall be issued on the same schedule as regular license plates are issued
under KRS 186.240. The cabinet shall have the discretion to extend the time period that will exist between the
date a metal special license plate is issued and the date that regular plates are issued under KRS 186.240. A
renewal registration decal shall be issued all other years during the owner's or lessee's birth month, except as
provided in KRS 186.041(2) and 186.042(5). A person seeking a special license plate for a vehicle provided as
part of the person's occupation shall conform to the requirements of KRS 186.050(14).
(4) (a) If a special license plate issued under this chapter deteriorates to the point that the lettering, numbering,
or images on the face of the plate are not legible, the plate shall be replaced free of charge, if the owner
or lessee has not transferred the vehicle to which the plate was issued during the current licensing
period.
(b) If a special license plate issued under this chapter is lost, stolen, or damaged in an accident, the county
clerk shall issue a new plate upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee, if the owner or lessee
has not transferred the vehicle to which the plate was issued during the current licensing period.
(5) Upon the sale, transfer, or termination of a lease of a vehicle with any special license plate issued under this
chapter, the owner or lessee shall remove the special plate and return it and the certificate of registration to the
county clerk. The county clerk shall reissue the owner or lessee a regular license plate and a certificate of
registration upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee. If the owner or lessee requests, the county
clerk shall reissue the special plate upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee for use on any other
vehicle of the same classification and category owned, leased, or acquired by the person during the current
licensing period. If the owner or lessee has the special plate reissued to a vehicle which has been previously
registered in this state, the regular license plate that is being replaced shall be returned to the county clerk who
shall forward the plate to the Transportation Cabinet.
(6) A special license plate may be issued to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered
under KRS 186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), except a special license plate shall not be issued to a taxicab,
limousine, or U-Drive-It registered and licensed under this chapter or KRS Chapter 281. A person applying for
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

140 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a special license plate shall apply in the office of the county clerk in the county of the person's residence,
except as provided in KRS 186.168(3). All special license plates issued under this chapter may be combined
with a personalized license plate under the provisions of KRS 186.174. The fee to combine a special license
plate with a personalized license plate shall be as established in KRS 186.162(3).
(7) Within thirty (30) days of termination from election to, appointment to, or membership with any group or
organization, an applicant to whom a special license plate was issued under this chapter shall return the special
license plate to the county clerk of the county of his or her residence, unless the person is merely changing his
or her status with the group or organization to retired.
(8) A group wanting to create a special license plate that is not authorized under this chapter on June 27, 2019,
shall comply with the following conditions before being eligible to apply for a special license plate:
(a) The group shall be nonprofit and based, headquartered, or have a chapter in Kentucky;
(b) The group may be organized for, but shall not be restricted to, social, civic, or entertainment purposes;
(c) The message to be placed on the license plate, if created, shall not discriminate against any race, color,
religion, sex, or national origin, and shall not be construed, as determined by the cabinet, as an attempt
to victimize or intimidate any person due to the person's race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;
(d) The plate shall not represent a political party and shall not have been created primarily to promote a
specific political belief;
(e) The plate shall not have as its primary purpose the promotion of any specific faith, religion, or
antireligion;
(f) The plate shall not be the name of a special product or brand name, and shall not be construed, as
determined by the cabinet, as promoting a product or brand name; and
(g) The plate's lettering, logo, image, or message to be placed on the license plate, if created, shall not be
obscene, as determined by the cabinet.
(9) If the cabinet denies to issue a group a special license plate based upon the conditions specified in subsection
(8) of this section, the cabinet shall, immediately upon denying to issue a group a special license plate, notify
in writing the chairperson of both the House and Senate standing committees on transportation of the denial
and the reasons upon which the cabinet based the denial.
(10) If the cabinet approves a request for a special license plate, the cabinet shall begin designing and printing the
plate after:
(a) The group collects a minimum of nine hundred (900) applications with each application being
accompanied by a fee as set forth in KRS 186.162. The applications and accompanying fee shall be
submitted to the cabinet at one (1) time as a whole and shall not be submitted individually or
intermittently; and
(b) The group submits to the cabinet the programming and production costs for the plate.
(11) A group that is approved for a special license plate shall maintain a minimum number of five hundred (500)
registrations annually for the cabinet to continue production of the plate.
(12) An initial applicant for, or an applicant renewing, his or her registration for a special license plate shall, at the
time of application, make a contribution that the county clerk shall forward to the cabinet as set forth in KRS
186.162. The cabinet shall, on an annual basis, remit the contributions to the appropriate group identified to be
used for the declared purpose stated under subsection (13) of this section. The cabinet may retain any
investment income earned from holding contributions designated to be remitted under this subsection to offset
administrative costs incurred by the cabinet in the administration of the contributions. Any group or
organization that receives a mandatory EF fee under KRS 186.162 shall maintain the information required
under subsection (13)(a) and (c) of this section with the Transportation Cabinet.
(13) The group shall, at the time the nine hundred (900) applications are submitted to the Transportation Cabinet,
also submit a notarized affidavit to the cabinet attesting to:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number for the group or organization. If the group or organization
does not have its headquarters in the Commonwealth, then the name, address, and telephone number for
the group or organization's Kentucky state chapter shall be required. The names of the officers of the
group or organization shall also be required. If the entity receiving funds under subsection (12) of this

CHAPTER 161 141
section is not a state governmental agency, a program unit within a state governmental agency, or is a
group or organization that does not have a statewide chapter, then a donation for use by the group or
organization shall be prohibited;
(b) The amount of the monetary donation the group wants to receive when a person purchases the group or
organization's special license plate; and
(c) The purpose for which the donated funds will be used by the group or organization. Donated funds shall
not be limited for use by members of the group or organization, and shall not be used for administrative
or personnel costs of the group or organization.
(14) (a) All funds received by a group or organization under subsection (12) of this section shall be deposited
into an account separate from all other accounts the group or organization may have.
(b) If the amount of money received in any fiscal year by a group or organization under subsection (12)
of this section is:
1. Equal to or greater than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000),[ and] the account shall be
audited yearly at the expense of the group or organization, and[.] the completed audit shall be
forwarded to the Transportation Cabinet; or
2. Less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), the group or organization shall submit a
form to the cabinet attesting to its compliance with this section[in Frankfort].
(c) One hundred percent (100%) of the funds received by a group or organization under subsection (12) of
this section shall be used for the express purpose identified by the group in subsection (13) of this
section.
(d) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, any agency, group, or organization that
receives a mandatory EF fee under KRS 186.162 shall comply with[ the provisions of] this subsection.
(e) If a mandatory EF fee under Section 99 of this Act is directed into a fund established in statute, the
agency controlling the fund shall not be required to keep the EF fee proceeds in a separate account.
(15) (a) No later than October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter, any group or organization that
receives funds under this section or EF fees under Section 99 of this Act, or any agency that
administers a fund established in statute that receives funds under this section or EF fees under
Section 99 of this Act, shall submit a report on the use of these funds in the previous fiscal year to
the:
1. Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue; and
2. Auditor of Public Accounts.
(b) The report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include:
1. The total receipts of the fund;
2. The sources of those receipts;
3. An accounting of all expenditures from the fund;
4. A detailed summary of the activities supported by EF fee proceeds, including the amount of
money spent on each activity;
5. The identification of any unexpended funds and the reason why the funds were not expended;
and
6. An explanation of how all expenditures align with program objectives.
(16) The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with[under] KRS Chapter 13A to establish additional rules to implement the issuance of special license plates
issued under this chapter, including but not limited to:
(a) Documentation that will be required to accompany an application for a special license plate to provide
proof of:
1. Election to the United States Congress or the Kentucky General Assembly;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

142 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Election or appointment to the Kentucky Court of Justice;
3. Membership in a Masonic Order, Fraternal Order of Police, or emergency management
organization;
4. Eligibility for membership in the Gold Star Mothers of America;
5. Eligibility as a father for associate membership in the Gold Star Mothers of America;
6. Eligibility for membership in the Gold Star Wives of America;
7. Ownership of an amateur radio operator license;
8. Receipt of the Silver Star Medal;
9. Receipt of the Bronze Star Medal;
10. Receipt of the Air Medal;
11. Receipt of the Distinguished Flying Cross;
12. Receipt of the Combat Action Badge;
13. Receipt of the Combat Infantry Badge;
14. Eligibility for a Gold Star Siblings license plate for a person whose sibling died while serving the
country in the United States Armed Forces. As used in[For the purposes of] this subparagraph,
"sibling" means a sibling by blood, a sibling by half-blood, a sibling by adoption, or a
stepsibling; or
15. Eligibility for a Gold Star Sons or Gold Star Daughters license plate for a person whose parent or
stepparent died while serving the country in the United States Armed Forces;
(b) The time schedule permissible for a group or organization to request a design change for the special
license plate; and
(c) The procedures for review of proposed license plates and the standards by which proposed special
license plates are approved or rejected in accordance with subsection (10) of this section.
(17)[(16)] Any individual, group, or organization that fails to audit any funds as required[received] under this
section[chapter], or that intentionally uses any funds received in any way other than attested to under
subsection (13) of this section or for administrative or personnel costs in violation of subsection (13) of this
section, shall be guilty of a Class D felony and upon conviction shall, in addition to being subject to criminal
penalties, be assessed a mandatory five thousand dollar ($5,000) fine.
Section 101. KRS 186.041 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each initial and renewal application by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (a) of this section and
each initial application by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of this section for a
special military license plate shall be accompanied by proof as set forth in subsection (10) of this section that
the person is associated with the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United
States Marine Corps, United States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, United States Coast Guard
Auxiliary, Kentucky National Guard, Merchant Marines with service between December 7, 1941, and August
15, 1945, or Civil Air Patrol in one (1) of the following ways:
(a) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(b) A retired member;
(c) A member of the National Guard or Reserve component who has completed his or her term of service,
or has retired with a minimum of twenty (20) years of service; or
(d) A veteran who received a discharge under honorable conditions, or the veteran's surviving spouse, and:
1. Performed one hundred eighty (180) days of active-duty service;
2. Received an early release due to injuries or other medical condition, or at the convenience of the
service;
3. Received a hardship discharge;
4. Was separated or retired due to a disability; or

CHAPTER 161 143
5. Was determined to have a service-connected disability incurred during the enlistment.
(2) The member, retired member, veteran, reservist, or his or her spouse who is eligible under subsection (9) of
this section may purchase an unlimited number of special military-related license plates described in
subsection (1) of this section, annually for vehicles they own or lease. A disabled veterans license plate shall
expire on July 31.
(3) A recipient of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross shall be eligible for a Service
Cross license plate upon submission of an application to the Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs. The
recipient shall be required to include with the initial application for a Service Cross license plate a copy of the
general order that authorized the award and the recipient's Department of Defense form number 214. The
Department of Veterans' Affairs shall verify the documentation submitted with the application for a Service
Cross license plate, and if the individual applying for the plate is confirmed to be a recipient of the
Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross, the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall submit
the applicant's name to the Transportation Cabinet's Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing not later than
September 1 preceding the year that the Service Cross license plate is to be initially issued or renewed. When
the Service Cross license plate is ready, the plate shall be sent to the county clerk in the county of the
applicant's residence. The Transportation Cabinet's Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing shall inform each
applicant in writing that the Service Cross license plate is ready and may be picked up at the county clerk's
office. The Transportation Cabinet shall prescribe the type of application form required by this subsection and
shall supply the Department of Veterans' Affairs with the application form required by this subsection.
(4) A person who is a former prisoner of the enemy during World War I, World War II, the Korean War, or the
Vietnam War, or the spouse of a deceased former prisoner of war, shall be eligible for a former prisoner of war
license plate by submitting written proof from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other
appropriate federal agency stating the period of time the person or person's spouse was a prisoner of war. If a
former prisoner of war dies with a vehicle licensed as authorized under this section, the person's surviving
spouse may retain the license plate for use on the same vehicle or on another vehicle that complies with KRS
186.164(7).
(5) A person who is certified by the Kentucky chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association as being a
survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor shall be eligible for a Pearl Harbor license plate and shall be required to
attach to the special military-related license plate application written evidence from the Kentucky chapter of
the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association that the person:
(a) Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;
(b) Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m., Hawaii time, at Pearl
Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three (3) miles;
(c) Was discharged honorably from the United States Armed Forces; and
(d) Is certified by the Kentucky chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association.
(6) A person who is eligible to receive a Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plate
under KRS 186.164(16)(a)[(15)(a)] may receive up to two (2) Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold
Star Spouses license plates free of charge and may purchase additional license plates by paying the same fee as
for special military-related plates issued under KRS 186.162(2)(d) annually for vehicles he or she owns or
leases.
(7) The surviving spouse of a Purple Heart recipient, or a Kentucky National Guard member or a retired member,
who possessed a vehicle licensed with the Purple Heart recipient special license plate or the Kentucky National
Guard special license plate, may retain the license plate for use on the same vehicle or another vehicle that
complies with KRS 186.164(7). The surviving spouse may renew the license plate indefinitely, provided the
appropriate registration fee is paid annually.
(8) A person who is attending or who is a graduate of the United States Air Force Academy, the United States
Military Academy, the United States Naval Academy, the United States Coast Guard Academy, or the United
States Merchant Marine Academy shall be eligible for a special military service academy license plate. A
special military service academy license plate under this subsection shall use the same plate template as the
standard special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section, with stickers to identify the various
service academies. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

144 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Chapter 13A to establish the proof required to demonstrate current attendance at or graduation from a service
academy. An eligible applicant may receive up to two (2) special military service academy license plates.
(9) (a) The legally married spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who meets the
criteria for a special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section shall be eligible for a
special military license plate. A special military license plate under this subsection shall use the same
template as the standard special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section, with a sticker
identifying the plate as that of a military spouse.
(b) An applicant who is eligible for a special military license plate under this subsection shall present as
proof of eligibility an original or copy of his or her marriage certificate establishing marriage to the
member of the Armed Forces of the United States and an original or copy of one (1) of the following:
1. His or her unexpired DD-1173 form; or
2. Any identification document outlined in subsection (10) of this section issued to his or her
spouse.
(10) Prior to receiving a special military-related plate requested under subsection (1) of this section, the applicant
shall present as proof of eligibility, an original or copy of his or her:
(a) Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification Card issued by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(b) DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, DD-257, or NGB-22 form; or
(c) Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Defense.
Section 102. KRS 186.166 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall, unless directed otherwise by the General Assembly, perpetually produce the
following special license plates: military license plates, military unit license plates, U.S. Congressional license
plates, firefighter license plates, emergency management license plates, Fraternal Order of Police license
plates, Law Enforcement Memorial license plates, street rod license plates, nature license plates, amateur radio
license plates, Kentucky General Assembly license plates, Kentucky Court of Justice license plates, Masonic
Order license plates, collegiate license plates, independent college and university license plates, child victims'
trust fund license plates, Kentucky Horse Council license plates, Ducks Unlimited license plates, Gold Star
Mothers, Fathers, and Spouses license plates, Gold Star Siblings, Sons, and Daughters license plates, Silver
Star Medal license plates, Legion of Merit Medal license plates, Bronze Star Medal license plates, Air Medal
license plates, Distinguished Flying Cross license plates, Combat Action Badge license plates, Combat
Infantry Badge license plates, POW/MIA Awareness license plates, spay neuter license plates, service
academy license plates, Friends of Kentucky Agriculture license plates, and I Support Veterans license plates.
(2) The design of the plates identified for perpetual production under this section may be revised upon request of a
group or organization requesting a design revision under the provisions of KRS 186.164(16)[(15)].
(3) (a) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall not include any representation of the word "Kentucky"
that is a registered trademark or slogan which appears on a general issue license plate.
(b) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall include a representation of the Purple Heart medal and
the words "Combat Wounded."
Section 103. KRS 143.022 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A taxpayer engaged in severing or processing coal within this Commonwealth that has paid the tax imposed
under KRS 143.020 may apply for a refund equal to the amount of tax paid under KRS 143.020 if the coal is
transported directly to a market outside of the United States of[North] America.
(2) To apply for the refund allowed under subsection (1) of this section the taxpayer shall file an application for
refund with the department and submit all information and documentation necessary to substantiate that the tax
was paid upon the coal which was transported directly to a market outside of the United States of[North]
America.
(3) The refund process allowed under subsection (1) of this section is available beginning on or after August 1,
2020, but before July 1, 2028[2026], and limited during any calendar year to the export of a combined total of:
(a) Ten million (10,000,000) tons of coal subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143.020 and exported
through United States coal export terminals to markets outside of North America; and

CHAPTER 161 145
(b) Two million five hundred thousand (2,500,000) tons of coal subject to the tax imposed under KRS
143.020 and exported through United States coal export terminals to markets outside of the United
States of America and within North America.
(4) (a) By November 1, 2026, and each November 1 thereafter as long a refund is issued under this section,
the department shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue:
1. By destination:
a. The total tons of coal in which refunds were granted under subsection (3)(a) of this
section for the taxable year; and
b. The total tons of coal in which refunds were granted under subsection (3)(b) of this
section for the taxable year;
2. By county:
a. The total number of refunds requested for the taxable year;
b. The total dollar amount of the refunds requested for the taxable year;
c. The total number of refunds issued for the taxable year; and
d. The total dollar amount of the refunds issued for the taxable year; and
3. By taxpayer:
a. The name and location of the taxpayer requesting the refund as listed on the tax return;
and
b. The total dollar amount of the refund issued for the taxable year.
(b) The information required to be reported under this section shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 104. KRS 278.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of maintaining the commission, including the payment of salaries and all other expenses, and
the cost of regulation of the utilities subject to its jurisdiction, the Department of Revenue shall each year
assess the utilities in proportion to their earnings or receipts derived from intrastate business in Kentucky for
the preceding calendar year as modified by KRS 278.150, and shall notify each utility on or before July 1 of
the amount assessed against it. The total amount[ so] assessed shall be twenty-three hundredths of one
percent (0.23%) of[not in any year exceed two (2) mills on] intrastate receipts as so modified, which shall be
deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the general fund. The sum by each utility shall not be less
than fifty dollars ($50) in any one (1) year.
(2) The assessments provided for in this section shall be in lieu of all other fees or assessments levied by any city
or other political subdivision for the control or regulation of utilities.
(3) The commission, upon application by a utility, shall authorize the utility to adjust its rates to recover, within
not more than one (1) year, any change in the annual assessment and any costs imposed by commission order
for the fees and expenses of consultants. The application, and any hearing or other proceedings thereon, shall
be limited to the amount of such adjustment.
Section 105. KRS 278.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall, on or before June 1, certify to the Department of Revenue and the Finance and
Administration Cabinet the amount of intrastate business of each utility in the state subject to its jurisdiction
during the previous calendar year. The commission shall, when certifying the intrastate sales of retail electric
suppliers, deduct from such sales one-half (1/2) of the applicable wholesale power costs, provided the utility
from which such wholesale power purchases were made pays assessment on the full wholesale value of its
gross intrastate sales in Kentucky. When certifying the intrastate sales of retail electric suppliers not subject to
the jurisdiction of the commission for rates, the commission shall deduct one-half (1/2) of their actual
intrastate sales. All utilities classified as retail electric suppliers shall pay assessments based on the amount of
intrastate sales less deductions as certified by the commission.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

146 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, on or before June 10, establish the assessment rate and give
written notification thereof to the Department of Revenue and the commission. ]The Department of Revenue
shall collect and pay the assessment into the State Treasury to the credit of the general expenditure fund. All
such assessments shall be paid into the State Treasury through the Department of Revenue on or before July 31
of the year in which the assessments are made.
(3) If any amount in the special fund for the maintenance of the commission remains unexpended at the end of any
fiscal year, that amount shall not lapse, but shall remain credited to the account of the commission and may be
used during any succeeding year.
Section 106. KRS 117.322 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any candidate for any elected office whose appearance, action, or speech is altered through the use of
synthetic media in an electioneering communication may seek injunctive or other equitable relief
against the sponsor of the electioneering communication requiring that the communication includes a
disclosure that is clear and conspicuous and included in, or alongside and associated with, the content in
a manner that is likely to be noticed by the user.
(b) The court may award a prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and costs. This paragraph does not
limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.
(2) In any action brought under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The plaintiff shall:
1. File in Circuit Court of the county in which he or she resides; and
2. Bear the burden of establishing the use of synthetic media by clear and convincing evidence; and
(b) The following shall not be liable except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
1. The medium disseminating the electioneering communication; and
2. An advertising sales representative of such medium.
(3) Failure to comply with an order of the court to include the required disclosure herein shall be subject to the
penalties set forth in KRS 121.990(3) for violation of KRS 121.190(1).
(4) It is an affirmative defense for any action brought under subsection (1) of this section that the electioneering
communication containing synthetic media includes a disclosure that is clear and conspicuous and included in,
or alongside and associated with, the content in a manner that is likely to be noticed by the user.
(5) Except when a licensee, programmer, or operator of a federally licensed broadcasting station transmits an
electioneering communication that is subject to 47 U.S.C. sec. 315, a medium or its advertising sales
representative may be held liable in a cause of action brought under subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The person intentionally removes any disclosure described in subsection (4) of this section from the
electioneering communication it disseminates and does not remove the electioneering communication
or replace the disclosure when notified; or
(b) Subject to affirmative defenses described in subsection (4) of this section, the person with intent to
deceive or mislead changes the content of an electioneering communication in a manner that results in
it qualifying as synthetic media.
(6) (a) A provider or user of an interactive computer service shall not be treated as the publisher or speaker of
any information provided by another information content provider.
(b) An interactive computer service may be held liable in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(c) An interactive computer service shall be exempt as provided by the Communications Decency Act of
1996, as amended, 47 U.S.C. sec. 230.
(7) Courts are encouraged to determine matters under this section expediently.
Section 107. KRS 154.30-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Activation date" means:

CHAPTER 161 147
(a) For all projects except those described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the date established any time
within a two (2) year period after the commencement date. The Commonwealth may extend the two (2)
year period to no more than four (4) years upon written application by the agency requesting the
extension; and
(b) For signature projects approved under KRS 154.30-050(3)(a), the date established any time within a ten
(10) year period after the commencement date.
For all projects established after July 14, 2018, the activation date is the date on which the time period for the
pledge of incremental revenues shall commence. To implement the activation date, the minimum capital
investment must be met and the agency that is a party to the tax incentive agreement shall notify the office;
(2) "Agency" means:
(a) An urban renewal and community development agency established under KRS Chapter 99;
(b) A development authority established under KRS Chapter 99;
(c) A nonprofit corporation;
(d) A housing authority established under KRS Chapter 80;
(e) An air board established under KRS 183.132 to 183.160;
(f) A local industrial development authority established under KRS 154.50-301 to 154.50-346;
(g) A riverport authority established under KRS 65.510 to 65.650; or
(h) A designated department, division, or office of a city or county;
(3) (a) "Approved public infrastructure costs" means costs associated with the acquisition, installation,
construction, or reconstruction of public works, public improvements, and public buildings, including
planning and design costs associated with the development of the public amenities.
(b) "Approved public infrastructure costs" includes but is not limited to costs incurred for the following:
1. Land preparation, including demolition and clearance work;
2. Buildings;
3. Sewers and storm drainage;
4. Curbs, sidewalks, promenades, and pedways;
5. Roads;
6. Street lighting;
7. The provision of utilities;
8. Environmental remediation;
9. Floodwalls and floodgates;
10. Public spaces or parks;
11. Parking;
12. Easements and rights-of-way;
13. Transportation facilities;
14. Public landings;
15. Amenities, including fountains, benches, and sculptures; and
16. Riverbank modifications and improvements;
(4) "Approved signature project costs" means:
(a) The acquisition of land for portions of the project that are for infrastructure; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

148 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Costs associated with the acquisition, installation, development, construction, improvement, or
reconstruction of infrastructure, including planning and design costs associated with the development of
infrastructure, including but not limited to parking structures, including portions of parking structures
that serve as platforms to support development above;
that have been determined by the commission to represent a unique challenge in the financing of a project such
that the project could not be developed without incentives intended by this chapter to foster economic
development;
(5) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;
(6) "Capital investment" means:
(a) Obligations incurred for labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in
connection with the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project;
(b) The cost of acquiring land or rights in land within the development area on the footprint of the project,
and any cost incident thereto, including recording fees;
(c) The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the
course of acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project which is not
paid by the contractor or contractors or otherwise provided;
(d) All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans,
specifications, preliminary investigations, supervision of construction, and the performance of all the
duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and
rehabilitation of a project;
(e) All costs that are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction,
installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project; and
(f) All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection that occur after preliminary
approval;
(7) "City" means any city, consolidated local government, or urban-county government;
(8) "Commencement date" means the final approval date or the date on which a tax incentive agreement is
executed;
(9) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(10) "County" means any county, consolidated local government, charter county, unified local government, or
urban-county government;
(11) "CPI" means the nonseasonally adjusted Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, all items, base year
computed for 1982 to 1984 equals one hundred (100), published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics;
(12) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(13) "Development area" means an area established under KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053;
(14) "Economic development projects" means projects which are approved for tax credits under Subchapter 20, 22,
23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 34, or 48 of KRS Chapter 154;
(15) "Financing costs" means principal, interest, costs of issuance, debt service reserve requirements, underwriting
discount, costs of credit enhancement or liquidity instruments, and other costs directly related to the issuance
of bonds or debt for approved public infrastructure costs or approved signature project costs for projects
approved pursuant to KRS 154.30-050;
(16) "Footprint" means the actual perimeter of a discrete, identified project within a development area. The
footprint shall not include any portion of a development area outside the area for which actual capital
investments are made and must be contiguous;
(17) "Governing body" means the body possessing legislative authority in a city or county;
(18) "Increment bonds" means bonds and notes issued for the purpose of paying the costs of one (1) or more
projects;
(19) "Incremental revenues" means:

CHAPTER 161 149
(a) The amount of revenues received by a taxing district, as determined by subtracting old revenues from
new revenues in a calendar year with respect to a development area, or a project within a development
area; or
(b) The amount of revenues received by the Commonwealth as determined by subtracting old revenues
from new revenues in a calendar year with respect to the footprint;
(20) "Local participation agreement" means the agreement entered into under KRS 65.7063;
(21) "Local tax revenues" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.7045;
(22) "Modified new revenues for income tax" means the amount of individual income tax included in state tax
revenues that is:
(a) The result of multiplying the portion of state tax revenues from individual income taxes by the
modifier;
(b) Used for calculating state tax revenues in calendar years 2023 to 2048[2026]; and
(c) For projects approved prior to January 1, 2023;
(23) "Modifier" means the result of:
(a) 1. Dividing the individual income tax rate of five percent (5%), in effect as of December 31, 2022,
by:
2. The individual income tax rate under KRS 141.020 for the calendar year in which the new
revenues for income tax are being computed; and
(b) Subtracting from the result of paragraph (a) of this subsection the number one (1);
(c) Multiplying the result of paragraph (b) of this subsection by twenty-five percent (25%); and
(d) Adding to the result of paragraph (c) of this subsection the number one (1);
(24) "New revenues" means:
(a) The amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing district with respect to a development area in any
calendar year beginning with the year in which the activation date occurred; and
(b) The amount of state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth with respect to the footprint in any
calendar year beginning with the year in which the activation date occurred.
For projects approved prior to January 1, 2023, any state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth from
individual income tax shall be computed using modified new revenues for income tax;
(25) "Old revenues" means:
(a) The amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing district with respect to a development area as of
December 31 of the year of preliminary approval; or
(b) 1. The amount of state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth within the footprint as of
December 31 of the year of preliminary approval. If the authority determines that the amount of
state tax revenues received as of December 31 of the last calendar year prior to the
commencement of preliminary approval does not represent a true and accurate depiction of
revenues, the authority may consider revenues for a period of no longer than three (3) calendar
years prior to the year of preliminary approval, so as to determine a fair representation of state
tax revenues. The amount determined by the authority shall be specified in the tax incentive
agreement. If state tax revenues were derived from the footprint prior to the year of preliminary
approval, old revenues shall increase each calendar year by:
a. The percentage increase, if any, of the CPI or a comparable index; or
b. An alternative percentage increase that is determined to be appropriate by the authority.
The method for increasing old revenues shall be set forth in the tax incentive agreement.
2. If state revenues were derived from the footprint prior to the year of preliminary approval, the
calculation of incremental revenues shall be based on the value of old revenues as increased
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

150 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
using the method prescribed in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to reflect the same calendar
year as is used in the determination of new revenues;
(26) "Outstanding" means increment bonds that have been issued, delivered, and paid for by the purchaser, except
any of the following:
(a) Increment bonds canceled upon surrender, exchange, or transfer, or upon payment or redemption;
(b) Increment bonds in replacement of which or in exchange for which other increment bonds have been
issued; or
(c) Increment bonds for the payment, redemption, or purchase for cancellation prior to maturity, of which
sufficient moneys or investments, in accordance with the ordinance or other proceedings or any
applicable law, by mandatory sinking fund redemption requirements, or otherwise, have been deposited,
and credited in a sinking fund or with a trustee or paying or escrow agent, whether at or prior to their
maturity or redemption, and, in the case of increment bonds to be redeemed prior to their stated
maturity, notice of redemption has been given or satisfactory arrangements have been made for giving
notice of that redemption, or waiver of that notice by or on behalf of the affected bond holders has been
filed with the issuer or its agent;
(27) "Preliminary approval" means the action taken by the authority preliminarily approving an eligible project for
incentives under this subchapter;
(28) "Project" means any property, asset, or improvement located in a development area and certified by the
governing body as:
(a) Being for a public purpose; and
(b) Being for the development of facilities for residential, commercial, industrial, public, recreational, or
other uses, or for open space, including the development, rehabilitation, renovation, installation,
improvement, enlargement, or extension of real estate and buildings; and
(c) Contributing to economic development or tourism; and
(d) Meeting the additional requirements established by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060;
(29) "Signature project" means a project approved under KRS 154.30-050;
(30) "State real property ad valorem tax" means real property ad valorem taxes levied under KRS 132.020(1)(a);
(31) "State tax revenues" means revenues received by the Commonwealth from one (1) or more of the following
sources:
(a) State real property ad valorem taxes;
(b) Individual income taxes levied under KRS 141.020, other than individual income taxes that have
already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area;
(c) Corporation income taxes levied under KRS 141.040, other than corporation income taxes that have
already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area;
(d) Limited liability entity taxes levied under KRS 141.0401, other than limited liability entity taxes that
have already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area;
and
(e) Sales taxes levied under KRS 139.200, excluding sales taxes already pledged for:
1. Approved tourism attraction projects, as defined in KRS 148.851, within the development area;
and
2. Projects which are approved for sales tax refunds under Subchapter 20 of KRS Chapter 154
within the development area;
(32) "Tax incentive agreement" means an agreement entered into in accordance with KRS 154.30-070; and
(33) "Termination date" means:
(a) For a tax incentive agreement satisfying the requirements of KRS 154.30-040 or 154.30-060, a date
established by the tax incentive agreement that is no more than twenty (20) years from the activation
date. However, the termination date for a tax incentive agreement shall in no event be more than forty

CHAPTER 161 151
(40) years from the establishment date of the development area to which the tax incentive agreement
relates; and
(b) For a project grant agreement satisfying the requirements of KRS 154.30-050, a date established by the
tax incentive agreement that is no more than thirty (30) years from the activation date. However, the
termination date for a tax incentive agreement shall in no event be more than forty (40) years from the
establishment date of the development area to which the tax incentive agreement relates.
Section 108. KRS 132.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before any person's name shall appear before the voters on election day as a candidate for the office of
property valuation administrator in any primary or general election, except a current property valuation
administrator already qualified as a candidate to succeed himself or herself in office, or before that
person may be appointed property valuation administrator, except as an interim appointee as provided
by KRS 132.375, that person shall hold a certificate issued by the department, showing that he or she
has been examined by the department and is qualified for the office.
(b) All certificates issued shall expire one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(c) The examinations shall be written and formulated so as to test fairly the ability and fitness of the
applicant to serve as property valuation administrator.
(d) The department shall hold the examination at a central location during the month of November of each
year immediately preceding each year in which property valuation administrators are to be elected.
(e) The department shall, at least thirty (30) days prior to the examination, issue a statewide press release
announcing the examination and post the announcement on the department's Web site.
(f) Any person desiring to take an examination shall appear at the time and place designated.
(2) (a) If, after the giving of the examination, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, there is no person
qualified to be a candidate in the county, the department shall hold a second examination.
(b) Applicants from only those counties having no person qualified shall be eligible to take the
examination.
(c) Notice of the second examination shall be made by issuing a press release in those counties and posting
an announcement for the examination on the department's Web site at least fourteen (14) days prior to
the second examination.
(3) (a) If no qualified candidate files for the office, a special examination shall be given at a time determined
by the department.
(b) Notice of and registration for the special examination shall be provided in the same manner as provided
in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) (a) Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of property valuation administrator to be filled by
appointment or by election, and there is not more than one (1) person holding a valid certificate and
eligible for appointment or election, the department shall hold a special examination for applicants
seeking a certificate for the office.
(b) If, after the giving of a special examination, only one (1) person is qualified, the county judge/executive
may request a second examination.
(c) Notice of and registration for the special examination shall be provided in the same manner as provided
by subsection (2) of this section.
(5) (a) Examinations shall be given and graded in accordance with rules of the department published at the
time of the examination.
(b) Within ten (10) days after the examination, a certificate of fitness and qualification to fill the office of
property valuation administrator shall be issued by the department to each person passing the
examination.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (2) to (5) of this section, if there is not a qualified candidate for property
valuation administrator of a county before the filing deadline for the primary election, the department shall
continuously hold the examination until the earlier of:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

152 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) At least two (2) persons for that county are certified by the department; or
(b) Thirty (30) days prior to the certification of candidates for the regular election under KRS 118.215.
(7) Examination records shall be preserved by the department for twelve (12) months after the examination, and
the record of any person who took the examination may be seen by him or her at the office of the department
in Frankfort, Kentucky.
SECTION 109. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 211 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a restricted fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys received from donations, grants, gifts, state appropriations, and federal
funds.
(3) The fund shall be administered by the Department for Public Health.
(4) Moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund until appropriated by the General Assembly.
(5) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
SECTION 110. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a restricted fund to be known as the out-of-home care
program fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys received from donations, grants, gifts, state appropriations, and federal
funds.
(3) The fund shall be administered by the Department for Community Based Services.
(4) Moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund until appropriated by the General Assembly.
(5) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
SECTION 111. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 224A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a revolving account to be known as the residential
housing infrastructure fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts,
grants, federal funds, and all repayment, interest or other return on the investment of fund dollars.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making low interest loans to local
governments for building, upgrading, renovation, or expansion of infrastructure owned, maintained, or
operated by the local government seeking funding.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
Section 112. KRS 196.288 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) The department shall measure and document cost savings resulting from amendments to or creation of statutes
in KRS Chapters 27A, 196, 197, 431, 439, 532, 533, and 534 contained in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2. Measured and
documented savings shall be reinvested or distributed as provided in this section.
(2) The department shall establish a baseline for measurement using the average number of inmates incarcerated
at each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and at local jails in fiscal year 2010-2011.
(3) The department shall determine the average cost of:
(a) Incarceration for each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and for local jails, including
health care costs, transportation costs, and other related costs, for one (1) inmate for one (1) year for the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(b) Providing probation and parole services for one (1) parolee for one (1) year for the immediately
preceding fiscal year; and
(c) Reentry services and peer support as a condition of parole for those with opiate addiction and other
substance abuse disorders.

CHAPTER 161 153
(4) Beginning with the budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, savings shall be estimated from the
baseline established in subsection (2) of this section as follows:
(a) The estimated average reduction of inmates due to mandatory reentry supervision as required by KRS
439.3406 multiplied by the appropriate average cost as determined in subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(b) The estimated average reduction of inmates due to accelerated parole hearings as required by KRS
439.340 multiplied by the appropriate average cost as determined in subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(c) The estimated average increase of parolees due to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection multiplied
by the average cost as determined in subsection (3)(b) of this section; and
(d) The estimated average reduction of parolees due to parole credit for good behavior as provided in KRS
439.345 multiplied by the average cost as determined in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(5) ]Beginning in fiscal year 2026-2027, the following amounts shall be allocated or distributed by the secretary
of the Justice Cabinet[from the estimated amount of savings that would otherwise remain in the general fund]:
(1)[(a)] Four million six hundred thirty thousand two hundred dollars ($4,630,200)[Twenty-five percent
(25%)] shall be distributed to the local corrections assistance fund established by KRS 441.207;
(2)[(b)] Sixteen million three hundred eighty-three thousand five hundred dollars ($16,383,500)[Fifty percent
(50%)] shall be distributed for the following purposes:
(a)[1.] To the department to provide or to contract for the provision of substance abuse treatment in county
jails, regional jails, or other local detention centers that employ evidence-based practices in behavioral
health treatment or medically assisted treatment for nonstate inmates with opiate addiction or other
substance abuse disorders;
(b)[2.] For KY-ASAP programs operating under KRS Chapter 15A in county jails or in facilities under the
supervision of county jails that employ evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically
assisted treatment for inmates with opiate addiction or other substance abuse disorders;
(c)[3.] To KY-ASAP to provide supplemental grant funding to community mental health centers for the
purpose of offering additional substance abuse treatment resources through programs that employ
evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically assisted treatment;
(d)[4.] To KY-ASAP to address neonatal abstinence syndrome by providing supplemental grant funding to
community substance abuse treatment providers to offer residential treatment services to pregnant
women through programs that employ evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically assisted
treatment;
(e)[5.] To provide supplemental funding for traditional KY-ASAP substance abuse programming under KRS
Chapter 15A;
(f)[6.] To the department for the purchase of FDA-approved medication-assisted treatment products as a
component of evidence-based treatment for inmates with opioid dependence, opioid use disorder, or
other substance abuse disorders, for use in substance abuse treatment programs operated or supervised
by the department. In purchasing such FDA-approved products, the department shall consider products
and treatments that may minimize the risk of diversion;
(g)[7.] To the Department of Public Advocacy to provide supplemental funding to the Social Worker Program
for the purpose of creating additional social worker positions to develop individualized alternative
sentencing plans; and
(h)[8.] To the Prosecutors Advisory Council to enhance the use of rocket docket prosecutions in controlled
substance cases[; and
(c) In enacting the budget for the department and the judicial branch, beginning in the 2012-2014 fiscal
biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the General Assembly shall:
1. Determine the estimated amount necessary for reinvestment in:
a. Expanded treatment programs and expanded probation and parole services provided by or through the
department; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

154 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
b. Additional pretrial services and drug court case specialists provided by or through the Administrative
Office of the Courts; and
2. Shall allocate and appropriate sufficient amounts to fully fund these reinvestment programs.
(6) The amount of savings shall be estimated each year of the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, and for each year
of each fiscal biennium thereafter, as specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(7) (a) In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium
thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount of savings measured under this section and shall
request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.
(b) In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter,
the judicial branch shall request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided
in subsection (5) of this section].
Section 113. KRS 441.207 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The local corrections assistance fund is created as a separate revolving fund to be administered by the
department. The fund shall consist of amounts transferred to the fund pursuant to KRS 196.288, along with
any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for purposes of
the fund.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(3) Any interest earnings from the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.
(4) Moneys in the fund shall be distributed to the counties each year. Amounts distributed from the fund shall
be used to support local correctional facilities and programs, including the transportation of prisoners, as
follows:
(a) In each fiscal year, the first $3,000,000 received by the fund, or, if the fund receives less than
$3,000,000, the entire balance of the fund, shall be divided equally among all counties; and
(b) Any moneys remaining after making the distributions required by paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be distributed to each county based on a ratio, the numerator of which shall be the county's
county inmate population on the second Thursday in January during the prior fiscal year, and the
denominator of which shall be the total counties' county inmate population for the entire state on the
second Thursday in January during the prior fiscal year[Moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund
and shall be retained in the fund until the General Assembly establishes a statutory process and method
for distributing the funds to local correctional facilities and programs].
Section 114. KRS 217.2202 is amended to read as follows:
A kratom processor or kratom retailer shall not:
(1) Distribute, dispense, sell, or make available for sale any kratom, kratom extract, or kratom product[ to an
individual who is under twenty-one (21) years of age]; or
(2) Prepare, manufacture, distribute, dispense, sell, or make available for sale any kratom, kratom extract, or
kratom product[ that:
(a) Is adulterated with a dangerous nonkratom substance that affects the quality or strength of the kratom
extract or kratom product to such a degree that it may injure a consumer;
(b) Contains a poisonous or otherwise harmful nonkratom ingredient, including but not limited to any
controlled substance as defined in KRS Chapter 218A;
(c) Contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater than two percent (2%)
of the overall alkaloid composition of the product;
(d) Contains any synthetic alkaloid, including synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or
any other synthetically derived compound of the plant Mitragyna speciosa;
(e) Contains levels of residual solvents higher than those permitted under the United States Pharmacopeia
Chapter 467; or

CHAPTER 161 155
(f) Does not meet the labeling requirements established pursuant to KRS 217.2203 or any administrative
regulation promulgated thereunder].
Section 115. KRS 217.2207 is amended to read as follows:
A kratom processor or kratom retailer who violates KRS 217.2202 [or 217.2203 or any administrative regulation
promulgated thereunder ]shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand[hundred] dollars
($5,000)[($500)] for a first offense and not more than ten[one] thousand dollars ($10,000)[($1,000)] for a second or
subsequent offense.
Section 116. KRS 139.495 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Educational or charitable institution" means[The taxes imposed by this chapter shall apply to]:
1.[(a)] A resident, nonprofit educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] institution that has[institutions
which have] qualified for exemption from income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code; or[and]
2.[(b)] Any resident, single member limited liability company that is:
a.[1.] Wholly owned and controlled by a resident or nonresident, nonprofit educational or[,]
charitable[, or religious] institution that[which] has qualified for exemption from income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
b.[2.] Disregarded as an entity separate from the resident or nonresident, nonprofit educational
or[,] charitable[, or religious] institution for federal income tax purposes pursuant to 26
C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-2; and
(b) "Religious institution" means:
1. A resident nonprofit religious institution that has qualified for exemption from income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
2. Any resident, single member limited liability company that is:
a. Wholly owned and controlled by a resident or nonresident, nonprofit religious
institution that has qualified for exemption from income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
b. Disregarded as an entity separate from the resident or nonresident, nonprofit religious
institution for federal income tax purposes pursuant to 26 C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-2; or
3. A resident nonprofit religious institution that has chosen not to apply to the Internal Revenue
Service for a Section 501(c)(3) designation but would otherwise qualify for that designation by
demonstrating that the institution has:
a. A recognized creed and form of worship;
b. A distinct religious history;
c. Ordained minister that ministers to the congregation of believers;
d. An established place of worship where worship services are held in the same location on
a regular basis;
e. A congregation of who regularly attend worship services; and
f. Regularly scheduled and promoted religious services for the public to attend[
as provided in this section].
(2) (a) For educational or charitable institutions, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
taxes imposed by this chapter do[Tax does] not apply to any of the following:
1. Purchases[Sales] of tangible personal property, digital property, or services made by[to] these
institutions[ or limited liability companies described in subsection (1) of this section], provided
the tangible personal property, digital property, or service is to be used solely in this state within
the educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] function;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

156 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Sales of food to students in school cafeterias or lunchrooms;
3. Sales by school bookstores of textbooks, workbooks, and other course materials;
4. Sales by nonprofit, school sponsored clubs and organizations, provided the[such] sales do not
include tickets for athletic events;
5. Sales of admissions, including the sales of admissions to a golf course when the admission is the
result of a fundraising event, by[ nonprofit] educational or[,] charitable[, or religious]
institutions[ described in subsection (1) of this section]. All other sales of admissions to a golf
course by these institutions are not exempt from tax under this section; or
6. a. Fundraising event sales made by [nonprofit ]educational or[,] charitable[, or religious]
institutions[ and limited liability companies described in subsection (1) of this section].
b. As used in[For the purposes of] this subparagraph, "fundraising event sales" does not
include sales related to the operation of a retail business, including but not limited to thrift
stores, bookstores, surplus property auctions, recycle and reuse stores, or any ongoing
operations in competition with for-profit retailers.
(b) The exemptions provided in subparagraphs 5. and 6. of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply
to sales generated by or arising at a tourism development project approved under KRS 148.851 to
148.860.
(3) (a) An educational or charitable[An] institution shall be entitled to a refund equal to twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax collected on its sale of donated goods if the refund is used exclusively as
reimbursement for capital construction costs of additional retail locations in this state, provided the
institution:
1.[(a)] Routinely sells donated items;
2.[(b)] Provides job training and employment to individuals with workplace disadvantages and
disabilities;
3.[(c)] Spends at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its annual revenue on job training, job placement,
or other related community services;
4.[(d)] Submits a refund application to the department within sixty (60) days after the new retail location
opens for business; and
5.[(e)] Provides records of capital construction costs for the new retail location and any other
information the department deems necessary to process the refund.
The maximum refund allowed for any location shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(b) As used in this subsection, "capital construction cost":
1. Means the cost of construction of any new facilities or the purchase and renovation of any
existing facilities; and[, but]
2. Does not include the cost of real property other than real property designated as a brownfield site
as defined in KRS 65.680(4).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, refunds under subsection (3) of this section shall
be made directly to the institution. Interest shall not be allowed or paid on the refund. The department may
examine any refund within four (4) years from the date the refund application is received. Any overpayment
shall be subject to the interest provisions of KRS 131.183 and the penalty provisions of KRS 131.180.
(5) All other sales made by [nonprofit ]educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] institutions[ or limited liability
companies described in subsection (1) of this section] are taxable and the tax may be passed on to the
purchaser as provided in KRS 139.210.
(6) For religious institutions, the taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to any of the following:
(a) Sales of tangible personal property, digital property, or services made by a religious institution,
provided the tangible personal property, digital property, or service is sold in this state within the
religious function; or

CHAPTER 161 157
(b) Purchases of tangible personal property, digital property, or services made by a religious institution,
provided the tangible personal property, digital property, or service is to be used solely in this state
within the religious function.
Section 117. KRS 132.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When any real or personal property which is exempt from taxation is leased or possession is otherwise
transferred to a natural person, association, partnership, or corporation in connection with a business
conducted for profit, the leasehold or other interest in the property shall be subject to state and local taxation at
the rate applicable to real or personal property levied by each taxing jurisdiction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to interests in:
(a) Industrial buildings, as defined under KRS 103.200, owned and financed by a tax-exempt governmental
unit or tax-exempt statutory authority under the provisions of KRS Chapter 103, the taxation of which is
provided for under the provisions of KRS 132.020 and 132.200;
(b) Federal property for which payments are made in lieu of taxes in amounts equivalent to taxes which
might otherwise be lawfully assessed;
(c) Property of any state-supported educational institution;
(d) Vending stand locations and facilities operated by blind persons under the auspices of the Division of
Kentucky Business Enterprise, regardless of whether the property is owned by the federal, state, or a
local government;
(e) Property of any free public library;
(f) Property in Fayette County, Kentucky, administered by the Department of Military Affairs, Bluegrass
Station Division;
(g) All privately owned leasehold interests in residential property when the residential property is owned in
fee simple by a purely public charity as of July 1, 2020:
1. When the real property includes a residential property unit that is:
a. Leased by the purely public charity for a period of at least one (1) year to an individual
person who is fifty-five (55) years of age or older;
b. Maintained as the individual person's permanent residence under a lease agreement that:
i. Prohibits the lessee from subleasing the unit; and
ii. Provides that the lessee's possessory interest in the unit is terminable by the lessor
upon the death of the lessee, the physical or mental inability of the lessee to
continue to reside in the unit, or the lessee's relocation to a nursing home or similar
assisted living facility; and
c. Constructed on or before July 1, 2020, or constructed after July 1, 2020, on land that was
privately owned in fee simple by the purely public charity on or before July 1, 2020;
2. If the fee simple ownership is transferred by the purely public charity after July 1, 2020, it shall
be transferred to another purely public charity and the requirements established for the residential
property unit in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be maintained; and
3. The taxation of which is provided for under KRS 132.020 and 132.200;[ or]
(h) All privately owned leasehold interests in residential property owned in fee simple by a purely public
charity, which is exempt from ad valorem taxation under Kentucky Constitution Section 170, when the
residential property unit is leased by the purely public charity to an individual person who is:
1. Receiving medical or educational supportive services from the purely public charity; and
2. a. A postsecondary educational participant;
b. A minor;
c. Sick, disabled, or impoverished; or
d. Over the age of sixty-five (65);
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

158 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(i) Public-private partnership projects or property developed, acquired, or leased in accordance with
KRS 45A.077 or 65.028; or
(j) Real property owned by the Kentucky Housing Corporation under KRS Chapter 198A:
1. That is acquired and leased in connection with an activity, including new construction, that
would result in an increase of forty-eight (48) units or more to the stock of residential
multifamily housing;
2. Subject to an extended use agreement in favor of the Kentucky Housing Corporation; and
3. The county judge/executive and the mayor of the applicable political subdivisions have
provided written consent of the acquisition and lease.
(3) Taxes shall be assessed to lessees of exempt real or personal property and collected in the same manner as
taxes assessed to owners of other real or personal property, except that taxes due under this section shall not
become a lien against the property. When due, such taxes shall constitute a debt due from the lessee to the
state, county, school district, special district, or urban-county government for which the taxes were assessed
and if unpaid shall be recoverable by the state as provided in KRS Chapter 134.
Section 118. KRS 65.494 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Existing development area" means a development area established by a county containing a city of the
first class or by a city of the first class prior to March 23, 2007, that is subject to the provisions of a
grant contract, Interlocal Cooperation Agreement, or Master Agreement executed prior to March 23,
2007; and
(b) "New development area" means a development area that:
1. Is created within an existing development area; and
2. Exists for a period of thirty (30) years, and may be extended for a period not to exceed an
additional twenty-five (25) years to accommodate the pilot program term permitted pursuant to
KRS 65.4931.
(2) The provisions of KRS 65.490 to 65.499 shall apply only to:
(a) Existing development areas; and
(b) New development areas, provided that:
1. The project for the existing development area is amended to remove the new development area
from the existing development area;
2. All contracts regarding the application of increment derived from the new development area
require not less than:
a. Ten percent (10%) of the increment be paid to the agency for which the existing
development area was established;
b. Eighty percent (80%) of the increment be paid to the developer of the new development
area; and
c. Ten percent (10%) shall be retained by the Commonwealth or local government, as
applicable;
3. Notwithstanding KRS 65.495 to the contrary, the payment to the agency under subparagraph 2.
of this paragraph shall not be taken into account in determining whether thresholds within the
contract have been met;[ and]
4. The amendment of the project for an existing development area is approved by:
a. i. The county containing a city of the first class; or
ii. The city of the first class;
in which the existing development area is located;
b. The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority[state];

CHAPTER 161 159
c. The agency for which the existing development area was established; and
d. If applicable, the insurer of any bonds issued for the benefit of the agency for which the
existing development area was established; and
5. Any negotiation or agreement made related to an existing development area or a new
development area shall be approved by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance
Authority.
Section 119. KRS 141.438 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, there is hereby established the Endow Kentucky tax
credit.
(2) A taxpayer providing an endowment gift to a permanent endowment fund of a qualified community
foundation, or county-specific component fund, or affiliate community foundation, which has been certified
under KRS 147A.325, and meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, may claim a credit
against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401. The ordering of the credit shall be as
provided in KRS 141.0205.
(3) The credit shall be equal to twenty percent (20%) of the value of the endowment gift provided by the taxpayer,
not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(4) The credit shall be nonrefundable, but any amount of credit that a taxpayer is not able to utilize during a
particular taxable year may be carried forward for use in a subsequent taxable year, for a period not to exceed
five (5) years.
(5) No tax credit claimed under this section may be sold or transferred. If the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not
subject to tax under KRS 141.040, the amount of approved credit shall be applied against the tax imposed by
KRS 141.0401 at the entity level, and shall also be distributed to each partner, member, or shareholder based
on the partner's, member's, or shareholder's distributive share of the income of the pass-through entity.
(6) The total amount of tax credit that may be awarded under this section shall be limited to:
(a) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in each fiscal year beginning on or before July 1, 2015;[ and]
(b) One million dollars ($1,000,000) in each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2016, and prior to
July 1, 2026; and[.]
(c) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
(7) A taxpayer pursuing a tax credit under this section shall:
(a) File an application for preliminary authorization of the tax credit with the department;
(b) After receiving preliminary authorization from the department, provide an endowment gift to a
qualified community foundation, county-specific component fund, or affiliate community foundation
which has been certified under KRS 147A.325 within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice of
authorization for the tax credit from the department; and
(c) Within ten (10) days of making the gift, report to the department proof of the endowment gift.
(8) (a) The department shall:
1. Create the application required to be filed by the taxpayer seeking preliminary approval for the
tax credit; and
2. Publish on its Web site the amount of total credit allocated to date, the date the last processed
application for preliminary approval was received, and the remaining credit available.
(b) 1. Upon receipt of an application for preliminary approval submitted under subsection (7) of this
section, the department shall review the application and, if approved, the department shall issue a
notice of preliminary approval to the requesting taxpayer.
2. The notice of preliminary approval shall include the amount of credit, shall notify the taxpayer
that the proposed gift must be made within thirty (30) days of the date reflected on the notice of
authorization, and that the taxpayer must notify the department that the gift has been made, in the
form and format determined by the department, within ten (10) days of making the gift.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

160 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Upon preliminary approval of an application for credit, the department shall reduce the
outstanding available credit cap amount to reflect the preliminary approved credit.
(c) Upon timely receipt of notification from a taxpayer preliminarily approved for a credit that the
investment has been timely made, the department shall verify the information provided and, if the
information is accurate, the department shall issue a final tax credit letter to the taxpayer.
(d) If a taxpayer fails to make the required investment or provide proof of the investment to the department
within the time frames established by this subsection and subsection (7) of this section, the department
shall void the preliminary approval and shall restore the allocated amounts to the tax credit cap.
Section 120. KRS 278.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 278.010 to 278.450, 278.541 to 278.544, 278.546 to 278.5462, and 278.990, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Corporation" includes private, quasipublic, and public corporations, and all boards, agencies, and
instrumentalities thereof, associations, joint-stock companies, and business trusts;
(2) "Person" includes natural persons, partnerships, corporations, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or
common interest;
(3) "Utility" means any person except a regional wastewater commission established pursuant to KRS 65.8905
and, for purposes of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this subsection, a city or a municipal interlocal gas
utility, who owns, controls, operates, or manages any facility used or to be used for or in connection with:
(a) The generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electricity to or for the public, for
compensation, for lights, heat, power, or other uses;
(b) The production, manufacture, storage, distribution, sale, or furnishing of natural or manufactured gas, or
a mixture of same, to or for the public, for compensation, for light, heat, power, or other uses;
(c) The transporting or conveying of gas, crude oil, or other fluid substance by pipeline to or for the public,
for compensation;
(d) The diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing, or furnishing of water to or for the
public, for compensation;
(e) The transmission or conveyance over wire, in air, or otherwise, of any message by telephone or
telegraph for the public, for compensation; or
(f) The collection, transmission, or treatment of sewage for the public, for compensation, if the facility is a
subdivision collection, transmission, or treatment facility plant that is affixed to real property and is
located in a county containing a city of the first class or is a sewage collection, transmission, or
treatment facility that is affixed to real property, that is located in any other county, and that is not
subject to regulation by a metropolitan sewer district or any sanitation district created pursuant to KRS
Chapter 220;
(4) "Retail electric supplier" means any person, firm, corporation, association, or cooperative corporation,
excluding municipal corporations, engaged in the furnishing of retail electric service;
(5) "Certified territory" shall mean the areas as certified by and pursuant to KRS 278.017;
(6) "Existing distribution line" shall mean an electric line which on June 16, 1972, is being or has been
substantially used to supply retail electric service and includes all lines from the distribution substation to the
electric consuming facility but does not include any transmission facilities used primarily to transfer energy in
bulk;
(7) "Retail electric service" means electric service furnished to a consumer for ultimate consumption, but does not
include wholesale electric energy furnished by an electric supplier to another electric supplier for resale;
(8) "Electric-consuming facilities" means everything that utilizes electric energy from a central station source;
(9) "Generation and transmission cooperative" or "G&T" means a utility formed under KRS Chapter 279 that
provides electric generation and transmission services;
(10) "Distribution cooperative" means a utility formed under KRS Chapter 279 that provides retail electric service;

CHAPTER 161 161
(11) "Facility" includes all property, means, and instrumentalities owned, operated, leased, licensed, used,
furnished, or supplied for, by, or in connection with the business of any utility;
(12) "Rate" means any individual or joint fare, toll, charge, rental, or other compensation for service rendered or to
be rendered by any utility, and any rule, regulation, practice, act, requirement, or privilege in any way relating
to such fare, toll, charge, rental, or other compensation, and any schedule or tariff or part of a schedule or tariff
thereof;
(13) "Service" includes any practice or requirement in any way relating to the service of any utility, including the
voltage of electricity, the heat units and pressure of gas, the purity, pressure, and quantity of water, and in
general the quality, quantity, and pressure of any commodity or product used or to be used for or in connection
with the business of any utility, but does not include Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service;
(14) "Adequate service" means having sufficient capacity to meet the maximum estimated requirements of the
customer to be served during the year following the commencement of permanent service and to meet the
maximum estimated requirements of other actual customers to be supplied from the same lines or facilities
during such year and to assure such customers of reasonable continuity of service;
(15) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission of Kentucky;
(16) "Commissioner" means one (1) of the members of the commission;
(17) "Demand-side management" means any conservation, load management, or other utility activity intended to
influence the level or pattern of customer usage or demand, including home energy assistance programs;
(18) "Affiliate" means a person that controls or that is controlled by, or is under common control with, a utility;
(19) "Control" means the power to direct the management or policies of a person through ownership, by contract,
or otherwise;
(20) "CAM" means a cost allocation manual which is an indexed compilation and documentation of a company's
cost allocation policies and related procedures;
(21) "Nonregulated activity" means the provision of competitive retail gas or electric services or other products or
services over which the commission exerts no regulatory authority;
(22) "Nonregulated" means that which is not subject to regulation by the commission;
(23) "Regulated activity" means a service provided by a utility or other person, the rates and charges of which are
regulated by the commission;
(24) "USoA" means uniform system of accounts which is a system of accounts for public utilities established by the
FERC and adopted by the commission;
(25) "Arm's length" means the standard of conduct under which unrelated parties, each party acting in its own best
interest, would negotiate and carry out a particular transaction;
(26) "Subsidize" means the recovery of costs or the transfer of value from one (1) class of customer, activity, or
business unit that is attributable to another;
(27) "Solicit" means to engage in or offer for sale a good or service, either directly or indirectly and irrespective of
place or audience;
(28) "USDA" means the United States Department of Agriculture;
(29) "FERC" means the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(30) "SEC" means the Securities and Exchange Commission;
(31) "Commercial mobile radio services" has the same meaning as in 47 C.F.R. sec. 20.3 and includes the term
"wireless" and service provided by any wireless real time two (2) way voice communication device, including
radio-telephone communications used in cellular telephone service, personal communications service, and the
functional or competitive equivalent of a radio-telephone communications line used in cellular telephone
service, a personal communications service, or a network radio access line;[ and]
(32) "Voice over Internet Protocol" or "VoIP" has the same meaning as in federal law; and
(33) "Municipal interlocal gas utility" has the same meaning as in Section 121 of this Act.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

162 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 121. KRS 65.230 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 65.210 to 65.300, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Interlocal agency" means a separate legal or administrative entity with a governing board that is created in an
agreement entered into by public agencies pursuant to the provisions of KRS 65.210 to 65.300;
(2) "Local government" means any:
(a) City;
(b) County;
(c) Consolidated local government;
(d) Urban-county government;
(e) Charter county government; or
(f) Unified local government;
(3) "Municipal interlocal gas utility" means an interlocal agency whose membership is only composed of city
governments formed for the purpose of constructing and operating a system that is capable of acquiring,
distributing, transmitting, furnishing, or selling natural gas to a federal military installation, municipal
utilities, and other industrial and commercial customers; and
(4) "Public agency" means:
(a) Any local government;
(b) Any political subdivision of this state or of another state;
(c) Any agency, board instrumentality, or commission created by a local government;
(d) Any taxing district as defined by KRS 65.180;
(e) Any special purpose government entity as defined in KRS 65A.010(9)(a) to (c), including those entities
that are exempt from the definition of special purpose governmental entity under the provisions of KRS
65A.010(9)(d)7. to 9.;
(f) Any interlocal agency;
(g) The Commonwealth or any agency or instrumentality of the state government or of the United States,
including but not limited to a state-supported institution of higher education;
(h) Any county school district or independent school district; and
(i) Any private institution of higher education entering into an agreement authorized by KRS 65.240(4)
with another public agency.
SECTION 122. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 65.210 TO 65.300 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) In addition to the city government members that form a municipal interlocal gas utility, the
governing body of a municipal interlocal gas utility shall include one (1) nonmember ex officio
representative of each county and city government in the Commonwealth that:
1. Is served by the municipal interlocal gas utility;
2. Contains any infrastructure used by the municipal interlocal gas utility to provide natural gas
utility service;
3. Contains any easements or rights-of-way used by the municipal interlocal gas utility to provide
natural gas utility service; or
4. Contains any land for which the municipal interlocal gas utility has requested an easement or
right-of-way that will be used to provide natural gas utility service.
(b) The county judge/executive of a county described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall select one
(1) county representative for the municipal interlocal gas utility governing body and the mayor of a
city described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall select one (1) city representative.
Representatives selected under this paragraph shall not vote on any matter before the municipal
interlocal gas utility except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.

CHAPTER 161 163
(c) For any proposed municipal interlocal gas utility action directly impacting an unincorporated area of
any county represented on the governing body, county representatives may, if every county
representative on the governing body votes unanimously for the same outcome, cast a single
combined vote to be counted with the votes of the member city governments on whether the
municipal interlocal gas utility may undertake the action.
(2) A municipal interlocal gas utility shall not provide natural gas utility service to a residential customer
except:
(a) As provided in KRS 278.485, in which case the natural gas utility service shall be furnished at rates
and minimum monthly charges as determined by the Public Service Commission as required by KRS
278.485(1); and
(b) A municipal interlocal gas utility may furnish natural gas to a municipal utility that provides natural
gas utility service to residential customers.
Section 123. KRS 65.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any powers, privileges, or authorities exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be
exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state, and jointly with any public agency of
any other state or of the United States to the extent that the laws of the United States permit such joint exercise
or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting jointly with any public agency may exercise
and enjoy all of the powers, privileges and authority conferred by KRS 65.210 to 65.300 upon a public agency.
(2) Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint or cooperative
action pursuant to the provisions of KRS 65.210 to 65.300, including but not limited to for the sharing of
revenues and physical assets. Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to law, of the
governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall be necessary before any such agreement may enter
into force.
(3) Any public agency may enter into agreements with another public agency or agencies pursuant to KRS 65.210
to 65.300 to acquire by purchase or lease, any real or personal property, or any interest, right, easement, or
privilege therein, outside of its municipal or jurisdictional boundaries, in connection with the acquisition,
construction, operation, repair, or maintenance of any water, sewage, wastewater, natural gas, or storm water
facilities, notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes restricting, qualifying, or
limiting their authority to do so, except as set forth in KRS Chapter 278.
(4) A private institution of higher education and one (1) or more county school districts or independent school
districts may enter into agreements under KRS 65.210 to 65.300 for the purposes of establishing and operating
a program or facility, including a center for child learning and study, designed to help one (1) or more schools
meet the goals set out in KRS 158.6451, or for the investment of funds if the Attorney General determines that
the proposal is compatible with the United States Constitution as part of the review of the agreement provided
in KRS 65.260(2), notwithstanding any other provision of the statutes restricting, qualifying or limiting their
authority to do so.
Section 124. KRS 96.5375 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of subsection (4) of this section and KRS 96.045 and 96.538, any city that owns and
operates a municipal system for the acquisition, distribution, or transmission of natural gas may extend the
system or construct a new system as authorized in KRS 96.170 and 96.542, to[ into and] furnish and sell
natural gas to any person or entity within the boundaries of the city or within any territory outside of the city's
boundaries. Municipal interlocal gas utilities shall have the same authority to extend existing natural gas
systems or construct new systems to furnish and sell natural gas in territory inside or outside of their
constituent cities' boundaries. In exercising the authority provided by this subsection, the city may install the
necessary apparatus to provide natural gas distribution or transmission service and may also condemn or
otherwise acquire rights-of-way as private utilities may do. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all
cities of this Commonwealth transporting or distributing natural gas as well as any board, commission, or
agency thereof.
(2) A city, other than a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, may acquire the entire plant of an
existing natural gas distribution system only under the same process and subject to the same limitations
established by KRS 96.580, 96.590, and 96.600.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

164 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) No property owned or operated by an existing natural gas distribution system located within the
Commonwealth may be condemned by a city from another state.
(4) A natural gas utility, which, for purposes of this subsection, means a public, private or municipally owned gas
utility distributing or transporting natural gas to customers within this Commonwealth, shall not:
(a) Extend its system for the purposes of furnishing or selling natural gas to any person or entity that is
currently being served by another natural gas utility; or
(b) Extend its system to furnish or sell natural gas to any person or entity when there is another natural gas
utility in closer proximity to the person or entity to be served, unless the natural gas utility in closer
proximity has declined to provide service.
(5) The provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall only apply to extension of service issues between a
municipally owned natural gas utility servicing customers located outside its municipal boundaries and a
private or investor-owned natural gas utility. The term "municipally owned" shall include systems distributing
or transporting natural gas that are owned by a city from another state.
(6) As used in this section, "municipal interlocal gas utility" has the same meaning as in Section 121 of this
Act.
Section 125. KRS 164.2847 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition and mandatory student fees for any undergraduate or graduate program of any Kentucky public
postsecondary institution, including all four (4) year universities and colleges and institutions of the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System, shall be waived for a Kentucky foster or adopted child who is a
full-time or part-time student if the student meets all entrance requirements and maintains academic eligibility
while enrolled at the postsecondary institution, and if:
(a) The student's family receives state-funded adoption assistance under KRS 199.555;
(b) The student is currently committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS
610.010(5) and placed in a family foster home or is placed in accordance with KRS 605.090(3);
(c) The student is in an independent living program and the placement is funded by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services;
(d) The student who is an adopted child was in the permanent legal custody of and placed for adoption by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. A student who meets the eligibility criteria of this
paragraph and lives outside of Kentucky at the time of application to a Kentucky postsecondary
institution may apply for the waiver up to the amount of tuition for a Kentucky resident;[ or]
(e) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services was the student's legal custodian on his or her eighteenth
birthday; or
(f) The student was adjudicated dependent, neglected, or abused under KRS Chapter 620, removed from
parental custody, and subsequently adopted by a relative.
(2) Tuition and mandatory student fees for any undergraduate program of any Kentucky public postsecondary
institution, including all four (4) year universities and colleges and institutions of the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System, shall be waived for a Department of Juvenile Justice foster child who is a full-
time or part-time student if the student meets all entrance requirements and maintains academic eligibility
while enrolled at the postsecondary institution and obtains a recommendation for participation from an official
from the Department of Juvenile Justice, and if:
(a) The student has not been sentenced to the Department of Juvenile Justice under KRS Chapter 640;
(b) The student has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a period of at least twelve
(12) months;
(c) The student is in an independent living program and placement is funded by the Department of Juvenile
Justice;
(d) The parental rights of the student's biological parents have been terminated; or
(e) The student was committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services prior to a commitment to the
Department of Juvenile Justice.

CHAPTER 161 165
(3) Upon request of the postsecondary institution, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall confirm the
eligibility status under subsection (1) of this section and the Department of Juvenile Justice shall confirm the
eligibility status and recommendations under subsection (2) of this section of the student seeking to participate
in the waiver program. Release of this information shall not constitute a breach of confidentiality required by
KRS 199.570, 610.320, or 620.050.
(4) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and
eligibility for state and federal financial aid programs. If the sum of the tuition waiver plus other student
financial assistance, except loans and the work study program under 42 U.S.C. secs. 2751-2756b, from all
sources exceeds the student's total cost of attendance, as defined in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1087ll, the tuition waiver
shall be reduced by the amount exceeding the total cost of attendance.
(5) Except when extended in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, the student shall be eligible for the
tuition waiver:
(a) For entrance to the institution for a period of no more than four (4) years after the date of graduation
from high school or obtaining a high school equivalency diploma; and
(b) For one hundred fifty (150) consecutive or nonconsecutive credit hours earned, after first admittance to
any Kentucky institution if satisfactory progress is achieved or maintained up to age twenty-eight (28).
(6) The expiration of a student's eligibility under subsection (5)(a) of this section shall be extended by the number
of academic terms the institution determines the student was unable to enroll for or complete due to serving:
(a) On active duty status in the United States Armed Forces;
(b) As an officer in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health Service; or
(c) On active service in the Peace Corps Act or the Americorps.
The original age limitation under subsection (5)(b) of this section shall be extended by the total number of
years during which the student was on active duty status. The number of months served on active duty status
shall be rounded up to the next higher year to determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
(7) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall report nonidentifying data on graduation rates of students
participating in the tuition waiver program by November 30 each year to the Legislative Research
Commission.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Guarantee acceptance of or entrance into any postsecondary institution for a foster or adopted child;
(b) Limit the participation of a foster or adopted student in any other program of financial assistance for
postsecondary education;
(c) Require any postsecondary institution to waive costs or fees relating to room and board; or
(d) Restrict any postsecondary institution, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services from accessing other sources of financial assistance, except loans, that may be
available to a foster or adopted student.
Section 126. KRS 154.32-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Activation date" means the date established in the tax incentive agreement that is within two (2) years of final
approval;
(2) "Affiliate" means the following:
(a) Members of a family, including only brothers and sisters of the whole or half blood, spouse, ancestors,
and lineal descendants of an individual;
(b) An individual, and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of
which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(c) An individual, and a limited liability company of which more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital
interest or profits are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(d) Two (2) corporations which are members of the same controlled group, which includes and is limited
to:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

166 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. One (1) or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common
parent corporation if:
a. Stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of
shares of all classes of stock of each of the corporations, except the common parent
corporation, is owned by one (1) or more of the other corporations; and
b. The common parent corporation owns stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of
the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty
percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of at least one (1) of the
other corporations, excluding, in computing the voting power or value, stock owned
directly by the other corporations; or
2. Two (2) or more corporations if five (5) or fewer persons who are individuals, estates, or trusts
own stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all
classes of stock of each corporation, taking into account the stock ownership of each person only
to the extent the stock ownership is identical with respect to each corporation;
(e) A grantor and a fiduciary of any trust;
(f) A fiduciary of a trust and a fiduciary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;
(g) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of that trust;
(h) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;
(i) A fiduciary of a trust and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock
of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the
trust;
(j) A fiduciary of a trust and a limited liability company more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital
interest, or the interest in profits, of which is owned directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for
a person who is a grantor of the trust;
(k) A corporation, a partnership, or a limited partnership if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the profits interest, in the partnership or
limited partnership;
(l) A corporation and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability
company;
(m) A partnership or limited partnership and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits in the partnership or limited
partnership; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability
company;
(n) An S corporation and another S corporation if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in
value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S corporation designation being the same as that
designation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(o) An S corporation and a C corporation, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in value
of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S and C corporation designations being the same as those
designations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or
(p) Two (2) or more limited liability companies, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) of
the capital interest or are entitled to more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital profits in the limited
liability companies;

CHAPTER 161 167
(3) "Agribusiness" means the processing of raw agricultural products, including but not limited to timber and
industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;
(4) "Alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces alternative transportation
fuels for sale. The alternative fuel production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function
of the operations remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;
(5) "Alternative transportation fuels" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(6) "Approved company" means an eligible company that has received final approval to receive incentives under
this subchapter;
(7) "Approved costs" means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority at final approval;
(8) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;
(9) "Biomass resources" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(10) "Capital lease" means a lease classified as a capital lease by the Statement of Financial Accounting Standards
No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976, as
amended;
(11) "Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline" means the in-state portion of a pipeline, including
appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is used exclusively for the purpose of transporting
carbon dioxide or hydrogen to the point of sale, storage, or other carbon or hydrogen management
applications;
(12) "Coal severing and processing" means activities resulting in the eligible company being subject to the tax
imposed by KRS Chapter 143;
(13) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(14) "Confirmed approved costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects, the documented eligible costs incurred on or before the
activation date; or
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. The documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date; and
2. Estimated rent to be incurred by the approved company throughout the term of the tax incentive
agreement.
For both owned and leased economic development projects, "confirmed approved costs" may be less than
approved costs, but shall not be more than approved costs;
(15) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(16) "Economic development project" means:
(a) The acquisition, leasing, or construction of a new facility;
(b) The acquisition, leasing, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing facility; or
(c) The installation and equipping of a facility;
by an eligible company. "Economic development project" does not include any economic development project
that will result in the replacement of facilities existing in the Commonwealth, except as provided in KRS
154.32-060;
(17) (a) "Eligible company" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership,
sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity with a proposed economic development project
that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the
Commonwealth:
1. Manufacturing;
2. Agribusiness;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

168 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Nonretail service or technology;
4. Headquarters operations, regardless of the underlying business activity of the company;
5. Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or renewable energy production;
6. Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline;
7. Coal severing and processing; or
8. Hospital operations.
(b) "Eligible company" does not include companies where the primary activity to be conducted within the
Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of utilities, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade,
real estate, rental and leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, or public
administration services;
(18) "Eligible costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Nonrecurring obligations incurred for labor and nonrecurring payments to contractors,
subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection with the economic development project;
3. The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording
fees;
4. The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary for
completion of an economic development project which is not paid by a contractor or otherwise
provided for;
5. All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimated
plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as
for the performance of all the duties required for construction of the economic development
project;
6. All costs which are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the economic
development project;
7. All costs incurred for construction activities, including site tests and inspections; subsurface site
work; excavation; removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions;
filling, grading, and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities such as
water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications, and similar facilities; off-site
construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation
of railroad spurs as needed to connect the economic development project to existing railways; or
similar activities as the authority may determine necessary for construction of the economic
development project; and
8. All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this paragraph, including but not
limited to investments in:
a. Laboratory equipment;
b. Computer servers;
c. Software;
d. Capitalized leases; and
e. Leasehold improvements;
when the costs are integral to the operation of research and development, headquarters, high-
technology operations, or service sector facilities[above]; and
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Building/leasehold improvements;[ and]

CHAPTER 161 169
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the estimated annual rent for each year of the tax incentive agreement;
and
4. Investments in:
a. Laboratory equipment;
b. Computer servers;
c. Software; and
d. Capitalized leases;
when the costs are directly related to the establishment or expansion of research and
development, headquarters, high-technology operations, or service sector facilities.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for economic development projects that are not in
enhanced incentive counties, the cost of equipment eligible for recovery as an eligible cost shall not exceed
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each new full-time job created as of the activation date;
(19) "Employee benefits" means payments by an approved company for its full-time employees for health
insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;
(20) "Energy-efficient alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that produces for sale energy-
efficient alternative fuels;
(21) "Energy-efficient alternative fuels" means homogeneous fuels that:
(a) Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resources; and
(b) Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resource;
(22) "Enhanced incentive counties" means counties certified by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.32-050;
(23) "Final approval" means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive
incentives under this subchapter;
(24) (a) "Full-time job" means a job held by a person who:
1. Is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week; and
2. a. Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS 141.020; or
b. Works remotely away from the economic development project if the job meets all of the
following conditions:
i. Is held by a Kentucky resident;
ii. Was created as a result of the economic development project; and
iii. The payroll of this job is expensed to the economic development project.
(b) "Full-time job" does not include a job held by a resident of any state with a reciprocal agreement
between the Commonwealth and the other state as described in KRS 141.070;
(25) "Gasification process" means a process that converts any carbon-containing material into a synthesis gas
composed primarily of carbon monoxide and hydrogen;
(26) "Gasification production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces for sale:
(a) Alternative transportation fuels;
(b) Synthetic natural gas;
(c) Chemicals;
(d) Chemical feedstocks; or
(e) Liquid fuels;
from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a gasification process. The
gasification production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

170 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical
feedstocks, or liquid fuels;
(27) "Headquarters" means the principal office where the principal executives of the entity are located and from
which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or entities are controlled;
(28) "Hospital" means a facility licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS Chapter 216B
for the operation of a hospital and the basic services provided by a hospital;
(29) "Incentives" means the incentives available under this subchapter, as listed in KRS 154.32-020(3);
(30) "Job target" means the annual average number of new full-time jobs that the approved company commits to
create and maintain at the economic development project, which shall not be less than ten (10) new full-time
jobs;
(31) "Kentucky gross receipts" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(32) "Kentucky gross profits" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(33) "Lease agreement" means an agreement between an approved company and an unrelated entity conveying the
right to use a facility, the terms of which reflect an arms' length transaction. "Lease agreement" does not
include a capital lease;
(34) "Leased project" means an economic development project site occupied by an approved company pursuant to
a lease agreement;
(35) "Manufacturing" means any activity involving:
(a) Processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in
the conditions of the property and any activity related to the processing, assembling, or production of
property, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities; or
(b) Production of vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce
personal protective equipment;
(36) (a) "Nonretail service or technology" means any activity where service or technology is provided
predominantly outside the Commonwealth and designed to serve a multistate, national, or international
market.
(b) "Nonretail service or technology" includes but is not limited to call centers, centralized administrative
or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment
centers, data processing centers, research and development facilities, and other similar activities;
(37) "Owned project" means an economic development project owned in fee simple by the approved company or
an affiliate, or possessed by the approved company or an affiliate pursuant to a capital lease;
(38) "Personal protective equipment" means protective clothing, helmets, gloves, face shields, goggles, face masks,
respirators, and other equipment designed to protect the user from injury or the spread of infection or illness;
(39) "Preliminary approval" means the action taken by the authority preliminarily approving an eligible company
for incentives under this subchapter;
(40) "Renewable energy production" means a Kentucky operation that utilizes wind power, biomass resources,
landfill methane gas, hydropower, solar power, or other similar renewable resources to generate electricity for
sale to unrelated entities;
(41) "Rent" means the actual annual rent or fee paid by an approved company under a lease agreement;
(42) "Start-up costs" means nonrecurring costs incurred to furnish and equip a facility for an economic
development project, including costs incurred for:
(a) Computers, furnishings, office equipment, manufacturing equipment, and fixtures;
(b) The relocation of out-of-state equipment;[ and]
(c) Cost of fixed telecommunications equipment; and
(d) Investments in:
1. Laboratory equipment;

CHAPTER 161 171
2. Computer servers;
3. Software;
4. Capitalized leases; and
5. Leasehold improvements;
when the costs are necessary to accommodate research and development, headquarters, high-
technology operations, or service sector facilities;
as certified to the authority in accordance with KRS 154.32-030;
(43) "Synthetic natural gas" means the same thing as in KRS 152.715;
(44) "Tax incentive agreement" means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.32-040 between the
authority and an approved company;
(45) "Term" means the period of time for which a tax incentive agreement may be in effect, which shall not exceed
fifteen (15) years for an economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10)
years for an economic development project not located in any other county;
(46) "Vital medications" means any drug or biologic used to prevent or treat a serious life-threatening disease or
medical condition for which there is no other available source with sufficient supply of that drug or biologic or
alternative drug or biologic;
(47) "Wage" means the per hour earnings of a full-time employee, including wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and
commissions, as reflected on the employee's federal form W-2 wage and tax statement, but excludes employee
benefits; and
(48) "Wage target" means the average total hourly compensation amount, including the minimum wage and
employee benefits, that the approved company commits to meet for all new full-time jobs created and
maintained as a result of the economic development project, which shall not be less than:
(a) One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties;
or
(b) One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in all other counties.
SECTION 127. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 11 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Pursuant to KRS 11.026(1), if a statue, monument, or object of art is privately funded and created depicting
or representing United States Senator Addison Mitchell McConnell, and that statue, monument, or object of
art is offered to the Commonwealth of Kentucky as a donation, the state curator shall accept that statue,
monument, or object of art for display in the New State Capitol rotunda.
(2) Notwithstanding the authority granted to the Historic Properties Advisory Commission in KRS 11.027(3),
the commission shall reserve a place in one (1) of the four (4) corners of the first floor of the New State
Capitol rotunda for the installation and permanent display of the statue, monument, or object of art
referred to in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Pursuant to KRS 11.027(3)(a) and (d)1., the General Assembly hereby identifies and authorizes the
installation and permanent display of the statue, monument, or object of art referred to in subsection (1) of
this section in the place designated in subsection (2) of this section, and the commission and the
Department for Facilities and Support Services in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall take
whatever action is required to install and display the statue, monument, or object of art upon the reopening
of the New State Capitol after completion of its renovation.
SECTION 128. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 139 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Facility operator" means a person who owns or operates a venue;
(b) "Professional sporting event":
1. Means an organized, competitive event, governed by rules and a sporting body, where
participants compete for compensation beyond actual expenses; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

172 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Excludes minor league sporting events;
(c) "Qualifying attraction" means a series of professional sporting events which is:
1. Held at a venue over a duration of at least three (3) consecutive days;
2. Hosted by a sponsoring entity pursuant to an agreement with a facility operator that
authorizes the sponsoring entity to conduct one (1) or more series of a professional sporting
event; and
3. Open to the public upon purchase of tickets, with attendance totaling at least one hundred
thousand (100,000) admissions over the duration of each series of professional sporting
events; and
(d) "Sponsoring entity" means the person hosting a qualifying attraction; and
(e) "Venue" means:
1. Public property located in a consolidated local government or in an urban-county government
that is owned, operated, or controlled by the consolidated local government, urban-county
government;
2. A park located in a consolidated local government that is:
a. Open to the general public; and
b. Owned, operated, or controlled by any nonprofit corporation established under the
provisions of KRS 273.161 to 273.390;
3. Property located in a consolidated local government or in an urban-county government that is
owned, operated, or controlled by a public university; or
4. Privately owned property located in a consolidated local government or in an urban-county
government that is suitable for hosting professional sporting events and qualifying attractions.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 134.580 and 139.770:
(a) A sponsoring entity shall be granted a sales tax incentive equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the
Kentucky sales tax generated by the sale of admissions to a qualifying attraction held at a venue, and
the sales of tangible personal property and services related to the qualifying attraction, including but
not limited to the sale of:
1. Food and beverage concessions;
2. Souvenirs;
3. Parking;
4. Suites;
5. Sponsorships; and
6. Other hospitality services;
sold at the qualifying attraction.
(b) One hundred percent (100%) of the sales tax incentive authorized in paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be paid to the sponsoring entity of the qualifying attraction from which the sales taxes were
generated;
(c) Only one (1) incentive request shall be made for each qualifying attraction each year;
(d) The sponsoring entity shall have no obligation to refund or otherwise return any amount of the sales
tax incentive to the persons from whom the sales tax was collected;
(e) The sales tax incentive shall be reduced by the vendor compensation allowed under KRS 139.570;
and
(f) Interest shall not be allowed or paid on any sales tax incentive payment made under this section.
(3) The department shall accept initial applications for sales tax incentives under this section for qualifying
attractions held on or after July 1, 2026.

CHAPTER 161 173
(4) To be eligible for a sales tax incentive under this section, the sponsoring entity shall file an initial
application with the department, which:
(a) Includes sufficient information regarding the qualifying attraction to demonstrate whether it
qualifies for the sales tax incentive; and
(b) Is filed at least sixty (60) days prior to the date of the first professional sporting event constituting the
qualifying attraction.
(5) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the initial application, the department shall notify the sponsoring entity
of its preliminary approval or denial of the qualifying attraction.
(6) If the initial application is denied, the department shall provide the reason for the denial.
(7) After approval of its initial application and the completion of the qualifying attraction, a sponsoring entity
shall apply for a sales tax incentive no earlier than thirty (30) days following the end of the month during
which sales taxes that were generated from the qualifying attraction are collected. The application may
aggregate eligible sales taxes from previous months if the events comprising the qualifying attraction were
held in more than one (1) month.
(8) The department shall review each application for a sales tax incentive and determine if it meets the
requirements of this section, pending the verification of required attendance.
(9) In determining eligibility for a sales tax incentive authorized under this section, the department shall waive
the duration and attendance requirements listed in subsection (1)(c)1. and 3. of this section if the person
requesting an incentive demonstrates that any delays, cancellations, or postponements were due to
inclement weather or other extraordinary events beyond the control of the parties involved and that the
weather or other extraordinary events rendered the satisfaction of the requirement impossible.
(10) Both the initial application and the sales tax incentive application shall be in the form prescribed by the
department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A.
(11) The department shall verify the amount of sales tax incentive and pay the allocations determined to be due
in accordance with subsection (2)(b) of this section within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the later of:
(a) The application submitted under subsection (7) of this section; or
(b) All necessary supporting information required by the department to determine that the sponsoring
entity is eligible for the incentive.
(12) (a) Prior to November 1, 2027, and continuing each November 1 thereafter to November 1, 2037, the
department shall provide an annual report detailing information related to each qualifying attraction
receiving incentives during the fiscal year concluding on June 30 of the reporting period.
(b) The department shall include the following information in the report:
1. The name of the qualifying attraction;
2. The venue where the qualifying attraction was held;
3. The name of the facility operator;
4. The name of the sponsoring entity;
5. The duration of the qualifying attraction and the number of admissions over that duration;
6. The amount of incentive paid to the facility operator; and
7. The amount of incentive paid to the sponsoring entity.
(c) The information required to be reported under this subsection shall not be considered confidential
taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
(13) The provisions of this section shall expire on November 30, 2036, and a qualifying attraction held after
November 30, 2036, shall not be eligible for the incentives authorized in this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

174 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(14) The General Assembly is committed to the research and development of tourism policies, including the
aspiration to hold other professional sporting events across the Commonwealth and especially in rural
Kentucky.
SECTION 129. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 171 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, but before January 1, 2031, a taxpayer completing
a certified rehabilitation of a certified historic structure containing a minimum of twenty-five (25) stories
shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401, with the
ordering of the credit as provided in KRS 141.0205 for projects in which the total qualified rehabilitation
expenses exceed one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000).
(2) The credit shall be equal to the lesser of:
(a) The percentage of qualified rehabilitation expenses as provided in Section 59 of this Act; or
(b) The amount of federal credit allowed under 26 U.S.C. sec. 47 for the same qualified rehabilitation
expenses that generated the tax credit under this section.
(3) (a) The credit shall not:
1. Exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000); or
2. Be subject to the maximum credit amounts allowed in Section 59 of this Act.
(b) Any project approved for credit under this section shall not be considered in determining whether the
certified rehabilitation credit cap has been met for any taxable year and therefore not subject to the
percentage of the credit cap allocated to owner-occupied residential property or other property that is
not owner-occupied residential property as provided in Section 57 of this Act.
(4) A taxpayer seeking the credit under this section shall file an application in accordance with Section 59 of
this Act.
(5) Unless otherwise stated in this section, the provisions of Section 59 of this Act shall apply to this section.
Section 130. Notwithstanding KRS 45.777, a postsecondary institution’s governing board may elect to sell
or dispose of real property purchased in whole or in part with capital construction funds, or equipment purchased in
whole or in part with state moneys. If the governing board elects to sell the real property or equipment, a detailed
accounting of the cost of the real property or equipment, the maintenance of the property or equipment using moneys
from an asset preservation pool appropriation, and the proceeds from the sale of the real property or equipment shall
be submitted to the Office of State Budget Director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
within 30 days from the sale of the real property or equipment. Proceeds from the sale of the real property or
equipment shall be designated by the postsecondary institution, on a proportionate basis, based on the funding
sources used for the acquisition and maintenance of the real property or equipment sold.
Section 131. Urgent Needs School Assistance: If authorized in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part I, A., 28., (5),
2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part I, C., 1., (19), 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part I, A., 28., (4) and (5), 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169,
Part I, A., 27., (3), or 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part I, A,. 28., (3), and subsequently, as a result of litigation or
insurance, it receives funds for the original facility, the school district shall reimburse the Commonwealth an amount
equal to that received for such purposes. If the litigation or insurance receipts are less than the amount received, the
district shall reimburse the Commonwealth an amount equal to that received as a result of litigation or insurance less
the district’s costs and legal fees in securing the judgment or payment. Any funds received in this manner shall be
deposited in the General Fund.
Section 132. The staff of the Legislative Research Commission is directed to complete a study on the
taxation structure of depository financial institutions. The study shall include an analysis of other state's statutes,
regulations, and policies and federal government regulations and guidance. The study shall be submitted to the
Legislative Research Commission no later than December 1, 2026, for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the Interim Joint Committee on Banking and Insurance.
Section 133. The following KRS sections are repealed:
160.621 Excise tax on individual income for schools.
160.625 Excise tax returns -- Payment -- Form.
160.627 Information on state income tax liability of school district residents -- Department of Revenue as tax
collector.

CHAPTER 161 175
160.633 Deposit of excise tax proceeds.
Section 134. The following KRS sections are repealed:
211.390 Definitions for KRS 211.392.
211.392 Fluidized bed combustion technology tax exemption certificate.
217.2203 Labeling requirements.
217.2205 Administrative regulations.
217.2209 Federal regulation to supersede.
Section 135. Sections 1, 11 to 17, 45, 95 to 97, and 116 of this Act take effect August 1, 2026.
Section 136. Sections 9, 10, 71, 72, 107 to 115 and 117 of this Act take effect January 1, 2027.
Section 137. Sections 120 to 124 shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2020.
Section 138. Sections 98 to 102 of this Act shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2026.
Section 139. Section 128 of this Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Section 140. Whereas funding the operations of state government is an essential part of the
Commonwealth's budget, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 18 to 21, 33 to 35, 57 to 70, 73 to 91, 108 to
113, 119, 127, and 130 to 133 of this Act take effect upon passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Vetoed in Part and Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version